May 4, 2005    cons tips extremely easy on carpet and if you have a lot of cds stacked at the top  poorly designed, it is a vertical cd rack that doesnt have individual slots for cds, so if you want a cd from the bottom of a stack you have basically pull the whole stack to get to it  putting it together was a pain, the one i bought i had to break a piece of metal just to fit it in its guide holes.  again..poorly designed... doesnt even fit cds that well, there are gaps, and the cd casses are loose fitting  pros .......... i guess it can hold a lot of cds.... February 11, 2006    I used a 25 pack of these doing DVD backups, and the last 5 or so failed. I thought it was my software, so I got new software. Guess what? My first disc out of the new package of 25 that I bought failed, too.  It's not my burner as another reviewer suggested, implying that people should learn to read, as it's brand new and doesn't require the firmware upgrade they mention. They just suck and have a high failure rate.  So the consensus seems to be that TDK or Sony are best. I'm buying some now and save myself the frustration April 28, 2006    While I read the reviews on this machine, it is clear to me that Lexar has some serious quality control problems. For some people it worked, for others it was a miserable failure. I am in the latter group. Sigh.  Mine was dead on arrival. I tried the device with BOTH of my Windows XP machines and in both cases, it was unrecognized. Lexar tech support subsequently proved to be a contradiction in terms as they would not return my email requests for help February 15, 2006    I have a collection of over 1500 disks so I have bought many cd/dvd cases over the years and this brand is the worst quality on any that I have purchased.  I would avoid this brand.  ... June 21, 2006    I purchased dvd express and it never worked. I spent endless time with tech support. The old story about, "It must be your computer." did not fly either, my machine is a media type and it far exceeds the system requirements advertised by ADS. I exchanged the item and it was supposedly checked out before I got it. Same problems. Tech support told me I was the only person having trouble with this product. They need to check out a few websites that review products there are hundreds of bad reviews very few good ones. My only mistake was not reading them before I wasted my time and money. ADS also told me it would not work with Ulead's Movie Factory 3, some of the software it came bundled with, but that was Uleads problem. I should use Cap Wiz  Their program  DUH!!! Guess what, it did not work with their program either. Ulead said they had several complaints with ADS's product. Their final solution hold on to the product and maybe they will have a new version of cap wiz and that might work. Save yourself time money and aggravation buy another product! P.S. Since ADS doesn't consider the product defective they will not refund your money or allow you trade it in for an upgrade. I don't think they want a product like that either. The only reason I gave one star is.....it was packed well. JU March 10, 2006    When I purchased these batteries, I was very pleased, but that wore off after a couple of months. I don't use my camera all that often, but when I do, I expect ther batteries to have some charge. I recharge them per instructions, and they do not hold a charge any longer.I know Monster makes good products, but I am a little disappointed in this one August 8, 2005    In the ten minutes since I've had it out of the box two pieces have fallen off.  More importantly, It can't handle large manuals as advertised.  The reason I purchased this particular book holder  My 1000 page manual only fits if you happen to only want to read the middle chapter.  Based on that I estimate that this is a totally worthless product to anyone needing to go through a manual or training book more than five or six hundred pages.  If you don't anticipate needing it for a book that big then just glue the rubber feet on, keep an eye on the page retainers these are the parts that fell off and you should be ok.  As for me, I'm off to read Amazon's return policy and see if I can get rid of this useless hunk of plastic November 10, 2006    I am still awaiting resolution of a problem I have with these drives. In writing DVDs I get verification errors. This proboem arises if the drives are used in an external firewire enclosure. The drive works fine if internal in your computer attached to the IDE bus, but there is an issue if attached to your computer by firewire June 27, 2006    I ordered this item after reading the positive reviews here. BIG MISTAKE. Upon setting everything up, it all worked great for about two hours... then the dreaded "UNPLUG/PROTECT" screen came up. Now it won't turn on but for a few moments before returning to protect mode. and no, it's not a short in the wires or overheating... it protects even when stone cold, and with no speakers plugged in I called sony and they say it is a short in the box. So now my two options are to unhook everything, repack EXACTLY the way it came to me and reship back to the online store I bought it from with enormous hastle and expense or take the receiver in to a sony authorized service center which happens to be across town, and only open monday friday, 9 5pm. So much for being convenient. This thing is brand new and already needs repairs!!  On top of that, even out of the box, NONE of the video inputs worked. Audio was fine, but video was dead as a doornail, right from the start.  And even on top of the fact that this machine CAME broken... it sucks even when it works right! The DVDs take forever to load, and it comes with HDMI out, but NO HDMI IN! So if you're an HDMI user, I hope you have multiple HDMI inputs on your television... one for your cable box, one for this crappy system.  This is a piece of junk. For the love of god, don't waste your money July 19, 2006    Overall the recorder worked OK. A moderate inconvenience was that once in a while the recorded DVDs could not be finalized for unexplained reasons. However, that is irrelevant now. A few weeks ago, the unit stop working. I does not turn on at all. What a waist! It is out of warranty now November 5, 2006    I have been charged however I did not get a copy of the policy to date. November 3, 2006    This is a poorly designed remote. I have six devices connected to my HD television set. The software depends on the user assigning positions to the various inputs to the TV and, in my case, routinely activated the wrong device when I used the remote. I purchased a Logistics Harmony remote and it works perfectly. At this point the only thing that I use the remote for is to remotely turn on my satellite receiver at a certain time during the day to record to Replay TV which cannot turn the TV on and off. June 28, 2006    I've got a LITE ON DVDRW SOHW 1673S burner Revision JS02 in my fast G4 Mac running OS X Tiger and burning with Toast Titanium 7. Although my burner is nominally 16X capable, it only burns at about 6X in my setup, probably due to the slow ATA 33 bus it's on.    I've used a number of different brands of 8X and 16X disks, both R and  R, and have had a verification failure rate of less than 2%    so few, in fact, that I often don't bother verifying video DVD's anymore when burning TDK or Maxell discs. I always verify data DVD's, since errors in those are not ignorable. But with Memorex, I've gotten about 20% failures, including a couple of aborted burns! In one case, the disc had a blank band between two burned ones!    The Memorex discs I'm referring to have Manufacturer ID "CMC MAG, AM3". According to videohelp.com, these are sold under at least 7 different brand names. The reviews there are rather mixed, which is not IMHO good enough!    I have not, BTW, have had any problems with the Memorex DVDR discs I've tried. But I stopped using them because one of my players won't recognize the R format November 6, 2006    While the silicon used in the construction of the sleeve is very nice feels grippy but not sticky if you know what I mean, some of the features are just wrong.  For instance, the opening for the hold switch on top was apparently cut wrong and does not line up with the switch at all   requiring you to have to push the cover around so you can flip the hold on or off.  Also, for whatever reason, the edge of the sleeve is right at the headphone jack which causes it to be somewhat difficult to keep some headphones seated during use the sleeve can work its way in and pop the jack out.   The armband is satisfactory at best   it's just a standard, no frills, velcro armband August 30, 2006    The Tomtom has great features.  But I returned mine.  First, the maps are very dated.  This makes it iffy at best.  It has terrific potential, if it worked.  You can use a PDA stylus on the map sitting at home outside on batteries to plan a trip.  It's amazing.  But I wanted to plan a 600 mile trip myself using it's internal maps and waypoints.  But I tried a local test first.  I used roads as waypoints, main roads.  This way I can force the Tomtom to use MY routes.  I did not like it's choices, since it is a dated map database.  I set up a local route, and started to follow it.  It took me to the first road/waypoint no problem.  But it would not go past the first waypoint.  I would go down the road first waypoint then it would tell me to take a u turn!.  I did.  Then it said take another u turn.  It had me going in circles.  Perhaps it's not made to use roads as waypoints, but all indications it gave were that it would.  The manual was no help.  Support was no help.  So it went back.  I have ordered a Garmin i2.  Hope this is ok.  I have taken the same trip from SE FL USA to SC USA with a Garmin C330.  The Garmin has maps that you cannot update, but got me to my destination no problem.  I don't recommend this TomTom.  Do research.  Go to manufactures websites and look at unit manuals.  Hope this helps November 12, 2006    I have read all 181 reviews and decided that half the reviewers did not get the model that I did.  Or else they wrote their review too soon.  I bought mine in June 2006.  It failed before the store warranty ran out.  One down.  The replacement lasted a month or two before it hung and wouldn't boot.  Two down.  Sandisk honored their 1 year warranty with a prompt free RMA.  That one also failed.  Three down.  They replaced it with both a m230 AND a 2GB c150.  The c150 hung after about 2 weeks.  Four down.  I have been using the m230 for two weeks now and hope it lasts until the c150 replacement arrives.  I have gotten quite good at the RMA game and intend to keep playing it either until my warranty runs out or I get one of those that other people rave about.  I don't think I'll buy another SanDisk   unless it is free and has a lifetime warranty.  I suggest that everyone with a failed m230 to exercise thier warranty rights.  Sandisk needs to know the true reliability of their products.  July 8, 2006    Replaced first spindle and still junk. Will always stick with Verbatim from now on January 10, 2004    They totally misrepresent this product. It does not work with Macs. I feel cheated and lied to by Memorex, shame on you November 21, 2006    The card works as advertised but SanDisk does not send in Mail in Rebate. Even though I mailed it in with the UPC Barcode, SanDisk sent me a post card stating that I needed to resubmit it with the barcode. How can I resubmit when they already have the barcode?  In my experience with SanDisk, I got rebate back on one of two cards that I submitted   so you get mail in rebate 50% of the time with SanDisk. I think mail in rebate is a big hoax perpetrated by these companies. Don't trust it! February 10, 2004    I bought the ADS upconverter because I bought a HDTV only to find out that my cable co. didn't offer HDTV and after 3 failed attempts to switch to a satellite provider that did offer HDTV too many trees around my house.  I wasn't expecting the upconverter to magically turn my standard signals into an amazing HDTV picture, but for $550 I was expecting the upconverter to do something that was actually noticable.  When I first turned in on I asked my wife to look at the picture and tell me what she thought.  She looked at the TV and said okay I'm ready turn it on.  I said &quot;it IS ON!!&quot; This is pretty much the reaction I had also when I looked at it.  The image I got for my digital cable was certianly different, but that's all it was, different.  It was NOT noticably better.  In fact, in some instances I though the picture was worse.  I called ADS tech support and they kept insisting I try it with my DVD because that is what the product is best for even though that's not what I got it for.  So I did and to be honest I really preferred the picture I got directly from my DVD over the picture I got after running it thru the upconverter.  It didn't matter what display format I put it in it just didn't do anything to improve the picture.  Save your money.  If you can't get HDTV don't expect this box to give you anything close to the next best thing February 1, 2005    I purchased this item and was excited to get them, but burning my first DVDs.. they're all coasters! ARG.. pass Memorex and go for a more expensive media, like Verbatim August 11, 2006    BAD DISC ERROR   possible fix  After about 8 months just like the other reviewer it stopped working.  I kept getting bad disc error on a new DVD I bought. I tried good discs that worked before but now got the same Bad Disc error.  This is not the first time I had problems loading. Previously, unplugging and plugging it in again sometimes corrected the problem.  This time after two weeks of Bad Disc errors, I was about to toss it when I decided what the heck, I'll check inside to see if it's dirty or something.  FIRST I UNPLUGGED THE UNIT.  I removed the 6 screws holding the cover. You may have to pull the sides out a bit if it catches to lift it off.  With my expertise knowledge. eyeroll I nudged the lense mechanism. It apparently slides to read the discs.  I plugged the DVD in and loaded a disc again to see what happens. The lense slid under the tray and started reading the disc. I'll take the elation of dumb luck over the satisfaction calculated knowledge any day! lol  So hopefully this will last a little longer. But at least I can use it again for now ...  I am downrating it to 2 stars solely on the bad disc error. The viewing quality and performance is decent and covered by other reviewers April 14, 2005    We've had this printer at my office for about 2 1/2 years. It's a giant waste of money. Magenta cartridges spew toner everywhere. Cyan cartridges streak. It's even worse when you use the manual feed. HP has no answers because they deny all the issues. HP's support is lackluster at best anyway. The first time when this machine was under warranty it took me three weeks worth of phone calls to get anything accomplished with them. Stay away from this printer at all costs. If you own one it makes a nice doorstop or paperweight. This is totally unacceptable considering toner and printer costs. I expect more from a product with the HP brand stamped on the box. To bad you can't give 0 stars June 15, 2005    I hoping to use the WGR101 to provide wireless, encrypted access to two laptops from a wired ethernet connection in a hotel. It worked fine in single user, no encryption mode but that is not what I needed. I experienced severe problems trying to use it in single user mode with WEP or in multi user mode with and without WEP. One or both laptops would lose the ability to connect to the internet at seemingly random intervals. Sometimes cycling the laptop wireless radio would restablish the connection, sometimes I had to reboot the laptops, sometimes I had to reboot the WGR101, and sometimes I had to reboot the laptops and the WGR101. Stay away from this product unless single user, unencrypted access is what you need July 14, 2005    Though I like the keyboard, I've found two serious problems with the mouse.  First, it is very sensitive to movement.  I've tried making some adjustments but it is still difficult to control.  Finally and more importantly, the mouse burns a set of AA batteries about every 8 days.  I only use the mouse about 6 hours a week so I should be getting a lot more battery life.  I've bought other Logitech products and have been pleased with them but in this case I wish I had bought another brand.  January 3, 2004    The picture shows the cassette feature along with the car kit.  The cassette did not come with the kit.  Very disappointed August 28, 2006    After using RCA and Creative both suck, I decided to try an iPod  this one since only a moron watches video on a 3 4 inch screen.  iTunes doesn't like M$ too much I guess. iTunes is really crappy software. If you have a big WMA audio collection, go elsewhere. Conversion causes sound quality loss especially if you ripped at 64kbps. Protected files can't be converted so you have to burn to a CD then let iTunes rip it.  If you don't use iTunes to buy music, 5 stars. If you do, 1 star.  The iPod, which I returned after discovering it would take months to convert to iPod compatibility, is flawlessly designed and takes a licking.  Google "itunes problems" and you'll find a lot of hate for iTunes.  My problem: why NOT support WMA files? iPod would grab 99% of the market if they did and kill the upcoming M$ MP3 player that will even play iTunes stuff February 22, 2006      This product is not very good.  There is no display on the TV, just a black screen.  The remote, which is just a pause button anyways with no menu functions, does not make a difference because you are unable to see your small Ipod screen from far away.  The overall video quality is quite low, even with an s video cable June 14, 2006    callers can barely hear me, even with the mic right in my mouth volume adjustment on cord doesnt affect it. and even worse, callers hear an echo of themselves, the mic picks up the caller in the earpiece enough to resend it!  echo!. Must be because its all on the same arm or something crappy.  This makes it basically unusable, so waste of money, throw away, going to buy a better one July 5, 2004    If you have problems with your flash drive  like I did don't count on any technical support. Lines are all automated and wait is always over 20 minutes for live support. Not to mention that it disconects you when it is done telling you this. PNY tech support is a joke October 5, 2006    I just purchased this mouse. It has a good feel. It does not scroll as smoothly as I would like. Contrary to what Microsoft says, the buttons are not programmable    you have to select from a predefined list. I chose to use the small silver buttons on the side as "copy" and "paste". Neither one works.Another irritation, I am already getting a popup that says the "signal" is weak    about 18" away, yet the menu says it is fine I got a great buy on it at OfficeDepot half price, otherwise I would return it June 8, 2005    I bought an Alpine 9847 and the Ipod interface. I works but it totally hijacks your Ipod. The beautiful intuitve, fast controls on the Ipod itself are locked out and you can ONLY control the Ipod from the car stereo. It is therefore very hard to deal with especially if you have a large music catalog on you Ipod. It is very slow, not at all intuitive. Even after getting used to it it is no good. The info on artist, album or song title imports from the IPod very slowly. Turning the volume knob is equivalent to circling on the Ipod but one turn eqauls about 3 spots on the list unlike one circle on the Ipod which equals dozens of spots on the list. Therefore if you have a large catalog you have to spin the volume knob 100 times to get thru a long catalog list which takes forever........Very annoying, very slow, very cumbersome. If only it did not deactivate the normal controls on the Ipod itself. A better and much cheaper solution is to find a car stereo with some form of line in, either stereo mini plug or RCA jacks. The just connect directly and use the IPods own controls which are infinitely better. I replace an old stereo to get the Ipod option and am very sorry I did so June 15, 2004    I just purchased this product. In the instruction manual, it states that only the Brother AC adapter should be used and any other will invalidate the warranty. Why is it that only a Brother adapter can be used when AC adapters are supposed to be standard? A tactic to increase sales? The adapter itself costs an additional 15 to 20 dollars. In addition, I agree with some of the other reviewers that a significant amount of label is wasted with each printing due to the empty space on either side that must be cut off. The 2 line printing does look very nice. I have not used many of the other features and so cannot comment on those November 3, 2006    The first few times it worked great, after that i haven't been able to use it, for some reason incoming audio is good but the mic does not work, i have to use my computer's which is anoying so i stopped using altogether. Waste of money March 8, 2006    From the photos and specs I thought this was "the camera" to have both my wife and I loved the look of the camera from the photos we had seen. There's always exceptions to rules, and the rule, "the more you pay, the more you get" is the exception to the rule for this web camera. After getting it, I had difficulty in getting the software to load but eventually had success. I was very disappointed in the video quality. There seemed to be a lot of noise in the picture, and tweaking gave no improvement. I returned it to Amazon and took a lose in the return shipping cost, but considered it worth it just to get the price of the camera back. Amazon lived up to their part and refunded the price paid less return shipment with no hassle April 6, 2004    I agree with the previous review.  This phone cord worked twice.  Now, it only retracts about half way, and keeps getting worse.  I'm returning it for a refund.  Don't waste your time with this March 14, 2006    I bought these to replace the standard iPod and Sony ear buds.  I was under the impression that I would get a much deeper bass response.  I was wrong.  The bass reproduction is simply horrid.  I read somewhere there is a "break in" period.  I have found this not to be true.  They sound just as bad after 50 hours of listening as they did brand new.  This is my first pair of Sennheiser and am very disappointed.  I know they are low end headphones   but I expected more.  My recommendation is to keep researching November 4, 2006    I wanted to get something better than the standard earphones for my Ipod. I saw some good reviews and this brand has been known always for great headphones.  Bought these and was shocked at the terrible sound quality.  Yes, the sound is clean, but TOO clean.  The highs are too high leading to tinny and over brassy sound.  Voices have too much hiss.  There is virtually no low end bass of any type.  Very disappointing September 23, 2006    I am looking for a system to replace a Siemens 8825. The 8825 has, in my opinion, the best set of functions of anything currently available but I have some reliability issues with it. I first tried the Motorola 7081 and found that unsatisfactory.  My next attempt was the Panasonic KX TG6700B. This phone has decent volume and clarity at the base. The handset has good clarity and range but the volume could use a little help. The base layout is ok but the way you turn on the answering machine at the base is silly. The handset feels light and chintzy. The clarity of the outgoing messages on the answering machine is poor.  The base is ugly; what were they thinking?  Anyway, it ok, not wonderful. But since I couldn't get the answering machine to save messages on either line it's defective I sent it back. Back to the drawing board May 2, 2005    While convenient and a nice, lightweight unit, the voice pickup is very poor, regardless of how you adjust the set.  This is not only with the set I have used, but with others I have talked to   you can tell if the person on the other end of the phone is using one of these units because they are so faint.  I've gotten so I just ask if they're using a Plantronics CS50 when they are faint and the answer is invariably "yes".  Also, if you are in a building with a lot of exposed metal window/door frames, high cubicles with lots of metal, the range deteriorates significantly September 19, 2006    I have owned the TomTom Navigator 5 for almost a year now.  While the program is well thought out and provides a good function, it does not work well with my Tungsten T5.  I have contacted customer service 4 times now and they have always been helpful in trying to fix my issues listed below, but to no avail.    Some of the issues I have had:  Any time the software has to redirect or think, it locks up.  If I stay on the original planned route, it sometimes works properly...  In a 30 minute trip from Orange County to Long Beach, I had to pull over 7 times to reset my device after the software locked up.  Voices lock up mid sentence giving a stuttering sound until you are able to pull your car over to reset the device.  In a 20 minute trip from San Francisco to Oakland the device locked up 5 times.  I finally gave up and called a friend to guide me.  Bear in mind, I have had no problems with my T5 in the 1.5 years of ownership...it is only with this software.  Customer service has acknowledged the problems and given solutions that have solved little to nothing.    In summary, it's not worth spending the money to have to print out Mapquest directions to have when the device crashes...stick with Mapquest May 9, 2006       My company car has a built in GPS unit and I have gotten to like it, sort of.  I have gotten lost in a rental car trolling around Silicon Valley enough to get a portable GPS unit.  After some research, the Garmin iQue 3600 is what I ended up with and I paid about $700.  The unique feature of this portable GPS unit is that a PalmPilot comes integrated into the package.   I use a PalmPilot, so this GPS unit replaces my PalmV.    Installation was quite awkward, and getting it up and running was a chore.   I got the thing synced up and some maps loaded and have been using it for several months now.  It does do the job, fitfully, and has several glaring issues.  Most irritating, the Palm function and the GPS function are not seamlessly integrated.  If an address is entered in the Palm part and then route to this address is selected, the iQue 3600 makes you find the location.  But the address from the Palm section doesn't transfer cleanly into the find section and you must retype the address.  I'm left handed and graffiti has NEVER worked for me all my letters are drawn backward.  The GPS can be engaged as soon as it recognizes where you want to go, but my unit takes a good 5 10 minutes to find the satellites when first exposed to sky.   This means that I must have a good idea what to do for the first 5 10 minutes.  Sometimes I just drive randomly until the GPS locks in and starts to issue navigation orders.  Also, the antenna must be deployed to get any GPS reception and must be forward enough in the windshield to see sky.  This is OK, except that the iQue 3600 doesn't tell you that the antenna has not been deployed.      The iQue 3600 does not work propped up on the passenger seat so a 5 pound holder is necessary to hold the unit on the dashboard.  If the antenna is not deployed, the iQue 3600 simply doesn't navigate and doesn't tell you why.  Worse, it acts stupid by going into a dangerous and unhelpful simulate mode.  If I ever figure out what that means, Ill tell you in a future post.  I figured out the antenna problem the hard way in an ice storm outside of Ottawa.  I'm a fan of GUI design, and I must say that the UI here is very, very bad.  Not the worse I have ever seen, but very bad:  non intuitive, inconsistent, and arbitrary.  The FIND function/button has an entirely different function in the GPS section from the Palm section.  Of course, the same icon is used.  I cannot imagine grandma using this thing to navigate.  What little there is of the very pretty documentation is atrocious.  About 10 times more information is needed here.  It shuts down randomly on occasion for no apparent purpose Battery savings maybe?.    The secure digital card is too small max of 256MB, so you can't put more than a few California counties in the memory.  Maps storage is managed with a rather hostile GUI.  This is not fatal, but is irritating.  I would rather put a 1GB SD card in the iQue 3600 and be done with it.    The iQue 3600 burns too much power to be used as a portable, so it must always be tethered to the car or resting in the cradle.  I don't find the power issue to be a problem.  I understand that to get clear, bright screens it is necessary to use power.  I agree with the tradeoff here. January 16, 2005    They sell these at almost every dollar store, sure the sound quality might not be quite as good, but you're going to have signal loss whatever you hook it up to. These things sell for $1.50 CAN at  dollar stores and are worth every penny of THAT pric October 15, 2006    I wanted a keyboard that I could use in low light with both my PC and Mac, and this one is reasonably o.k. Those users who enjoy the backlight of a Mac PowerBook or MacBook Pro will be disappointed by the cheap approach Saitek used to illuminate the keys, though. On the Mac, each key has its own embedded light under the key. On the Saitek light is splashed under the entire keyboard, reducing the contrast and making it much harder to see the keys.  But it's better than nothing, and is helpful in low light. It would have also been nice if they had an Fn key, but such is life December 27, 2003    My brother got a Lexar for Christmas.  He put it in his Tungsten C and for 30 stressful minutes the card did not work.  The device recognized the card, but you could not copy, format, nothing... just got an error &quot;This card is read only and cannot be &lt;whatever&gt;.&quot;  Then all of a sudden it started working.  2 stars for the stress and for the fear that it will stop working again March 6, 2006    Others have written about this phone not holding the charge, and I agree! I can't tell you how many times a call has gone dead in the middle of a conversation, with no warning, no low battery message. I've only had the phone since November. There is not a quick, convenient way to redail numbers  you have to choose from a list of options, 1 plus number, or the area code without the 1, or no 1 and no area code. No easy way to speed dial. Range is disappointing. I'm looking for a new phone. Back to Uniden or Panasonic May 27, 2006    Like the forward/back buttons but they are located too far back on the body for comfort.  Like the scroll wheel and side to side scroll ability.  Pointer flickers a lot sometimes and often disappears over certain buttons.  Logitech website gives no help. Comes with an installation CD for a Logitech MX320 !!!  Be prepared for a 50MB download to install the MX400.  Almost makes Microsot look good June 19, 2006    I bought two of these cards to go alongside my wrt54gs. I though that they should work great together since they are from the same manufacturer. Oh boy was I wrong.  Even the though I get full bars with these cards, I get very flaky connections with them. I've tried many different settings and firmwares to try to rectify the problem. Many hours have been spent trying to get a stable connection. No dice, very flaky.  Other computers with different cards work fine with the wrt54gs and never dropout. So there is something about this card that just isn't right, and I can't imagine both cards being defective. I haven't tested them with another router, but if it can't work with a wrt54gs v3, then what's the point February 8, 2006    Cheap piece of junk. Probably has 2 cents of electronic parts in it. I'm returning it to Wallmart. It might work OK if you live like right next door to the broadcast transmitter. Otherwise it's just too weak in its signal pulling ability. Also, when I turn the gain dials, they don't seem like they are really variable. I think they are really just on/off switches disguised as variable dials, because i don't see any difference between medium gain and high gain on any of the channels. I'm going to now go to a REAL, serious electronics store and look for some SERIOUS tv electronics hardware instead of Wallmart garbage. I'm going to work on improving my roof antenna and its cabling and I'm going to try using a variable gain preamp if I can find one a high quality one, not junk. I tried a preamp from Wallmart which wasn't adjustable at all and it did help a lot with UHF channels, but the VHF channels were much worse because it made the signal too strong. So I need a variable gain preamp, assuming there is such a thing. I would advise everyone to go read the information available on the internet about tv antennas and how to get the best picture with them. I did yesterday and there's a lot of good stuff I never knew before. November 19, 2006    I never even got a chance to listen to music through these headphones.  I couldn't get them to stay in/on my ears.  The loops that go around your ear are huge and just make them more cumbersome.  These may fit men with bigger ears better but I wouldn't recommend them for females November 11, 2006    I had high hopes for this headset.  I found that I could not hear anything when I attached it to my Treo 650.  The Treo uses a standard plug.  I verified that my Treo is working by attaching a stereo headset May 9, 2005    The battery life for this phone after one short year is abysmal.  After charging it all night, it dies after a few hours of nonuse. The redial button simply has never worked.  It is not user friendly at all although I could live with this if the two issues above were resolved.    I contacted AT&T and requested that they send me a new model that works since this phone is obviously defective.   If they refuse then I won't ever buy an AT&T product again and neither will anyone I come into contact with.   It's that simple.   Update...AT&T refused to do anything about the phone despite the obvious flaws,.  As a result, I will never buy another AT&T product again. AT&T, you are exhibiting the traits of a company that will go out of business.  July 7, 2006    I attempted to use this product in my 2002 Chevy Tahoe factory audio system. As others here noted, the deck would quickly error and eject the Monster Adapter. The Monster Adapter did work in my 2000 Harley Davidson FLTRI factory audio system. The difference is that the Harley unit does not have "cut tape" detection. The Tahoe does.   I returned this Monster unit and picked up the Sony Sony CPA 9C.   The Sony device is a bit different as it has small link of simulated audio tape within the tape path. This little bit of simulated audio tape effectively fools the tape unit not to think that there is an error and eject the Cassette Adapter. There are other reasons that these adapters will auto eject Google is your friend. But the Sony unit seemed to be the solution for me.   The big reason for the zero star review is that Monster has ZERO information on their web site or product packaging regarding device compatibility or troubleshooting.   April 17, 2006    Garmin's devices are pretty good. Somewhat tempermental, but mostly reliable. It's connecting their software and dealing with Garmin support that is a nightmare. And, you will need to call them because their software has all kinds of bugs and an archaic key system. Customer service hold time: 30 35 minues. Response time for  email tech requests: a staggering 5 7 working days. Clearly Garmin does not care about its customers October 5, 2006    I wish I had read the reviews before buying this piece of junk. As another reviewer says, U3 ruins it. I have a Mac so that feature is useless, but even worse it cannot be disabled. Everytime I plug in the drive I get this cheesy CD image cluttering up my desktop and I have to eject it, along with the drive icon, before the unit can be removed. What clunky engineering. I'll be returning this and scratching Sandisk off my list of reliable companies. I also agree with the reviewer who complained about the packaging. It is impossible to open without tearing it apart, which is probably a strategy to reduce returns December 19, 2005    Just a fair warning to all out there considering this card.  After purchasing this card it worked great.  Then in the middle of my friend's wedding the card no longer was readable by my camera.  I could not believe it!  When I got home I put the original card in the camera and it worked fine.  I reformatted this card and still the camera could not read the card.  Not worth the money for only one years use August 11, 2006    We needed to know if this unit Philips DVD 782C was compatible with DVDRW disks so I Googled it and found this Amazon listing.  We were totally amazed to find the reviews we found ... and wish we had done this years ago INSTEAD OF SPENDING ALL THIS TIME STRUGGLING WITH THIS POOR EXCUSE OF A DVD PLAYER. We have spent countless hours MR. Clean'ing and SkipDr'ing disks just to get them to play and sometimes even that didn't work.  Just in case anyone else comes along, take the excellent advice given several times in this collection of reviews ... RUN THE OTHER DIRECTION WITHOUT QUESTION IF SOMEONE OFFERS YOU THIS DVD PLAYER.  Now, we do NOT believe this is a fundamental problem with Philips. We have, and have had, many fine products sold by Philips. We are guessing this particular DVD player was the result of some very poor product planning that went very badly before, during and after the fact. Hopefully the persons responsible has have, per usual corporate practice, been promoted farther up the ladder where they can no longer inflict this kind of pain on Customers.   P.S. We tried to give this product "0" stars but Amazon requires at least "1" star. Probably a quid pro quo agreement of some sort we imagine April 19, 2002    I bought these headphones based on the first couple of reviews I read here.  I should have read further, because about two weeks after I purchased the earphones, the left side went out completely.  There was nothing obvious on the outside of the unit and I didn't hear any "rattling" as described by other users.  The darn things just quit!  I must say, however, that the sound quality for those first two weeks was excellent, but all in all, not worth the money and frustration August 28, 2006    Before you buy anything from Creative, google the words incompatible  legacy drivers  sounblaster  windows xp  Huge compatibiltiy issues that will have Creative Tech help telling you to flash and update your system bios, chipsets, leaving an entire PCI slot between Sounblaster card and any other card, update drivers, yada, yada, etc. Read all of the issues from the aforementioned google, and ignore the Creative employee reviews they are easy to spot. Creative ignores the fact that its products have huge conflicts with Windows operating systems August 31, 2006    I purchased this for my Intel iMac mainly because I was so frustrated with the Mighty Mouse.  I wanted something with two separate buttons.  I had tried the Logitech MX 610 which I purchased as well for another computer and thought that the ergonomic shape felt wonderful.  So, I purchased this desktop set because I wanted it to match my Mac and so I could have a proper 2 button mouse.  I figured the Mac keyboard could use improvement as well so the keyboard could come in handy as well.  In fact, I thought I would get added convenience since this was a keyboard designed for a Mac and had extra shortcut buttons.  Other than having 2 separate buttons on the mouse, this keyboard/mouse combo has been an utter disappointment.  First of all, the white doesn't quite match.  It's close, but just a touch too cream.  Also, there's just too much silver.  Especially on the mouse.  Secondly, it doesn't have all the buttons the Mighty Mouse does.  There is no button to switch to the Widgets.  Luckily, you can press F12 on the keyboard.  Not quite as convenient, but still possible.  However, I have yet to find a button that allows you to switch between various open programs.  This is especially necessary if you have multiple web browsers open.  Thirdly, this mouse just doesn't work as well as other Logitechs.  It is too light, lacking the "feel" and a bit of the comforting weight that the MX 610 has when you move it around.  Also, the speed of the cursor is off.  No matter how I try to adjust the speed, it doesn't quite match the speed of the original Mighty Mouse.  It is either too fast or too slow.  I think part of it is simply OSX's lack of adjustability compared to gasp] Windows for cursor speed.  Finally, the keyboard is simply atrocious.  I don't even use it anymore.  It's packed up in the box and I plugged the original Mac keyboard back in.  The keys make a horrendous clatter when typing.  The pressure is nonexistant making touch typing just a bit more difficult than normal.  Also, the depth is quite shallow.  This is a desktop keyboard.  You can press the key down further on nearly all the laptop keyboards I've tried.  Also, the texture of the keys is far too smooth and uniform.  The raised dots to help you find the F or J buttons is too shallow.  I can't find the asdf an jkl; rows by touch.  I have to look.  As a touch typist, this is an unforgiveable sin.  It basically transforms you from a touch typist to a hunt and peck typer who has to visually find each key before you can hit it.  I'm typing on a Thinkpad whose laptop keyboard is far superior to this Logitech.  So, in short, save your money and avoid this keyboard/mouse combo.  I rated it a two because the mouse did have 2 separate buttons, unlike the Mighty Mouse, which is why I purchased this in the first place.  It hit my most basic requirement.  Otherwise, it really deserves a 1 star rating November 10, 2006    These sound awful. I'm embarrassed to admit I spent 140.00 on these. The earphones from my 1989 sony walkman are far superior. If you like your music to sound as if it came from the bottom of a well then these are for you. February 13, 2006    In terms of sound quality, noise cancelling, and general comfort   thise headphones are top of the line. I absolutely love the way the sound and the ammount of noise cancelling that they provide. I used them regularly when mowing the lawn and when flying, and I always recieved the highest quality sound and noise cancelleation. I was even able to listen to drum n bass while mowing the lawn and hear all of the appropriate frequencies on the low end.   However... inside of 6 months, I have gone through 2 pairs of these headphones because the right ear headphone has gone out on them. The worst part is   I can't even begin to imagine why it goes out. I keep my heaphones in a locked cabinet in my office every night. Last friday, I placed back into the nice little carry bag that they come with, and placed them into this cabinet. This morning when I pulled them out for use, the right ear bud is out again... no physical damage is apparent anywhere on the headphones, and there is not a broken wire anywhere. In fact, the wiring is perfectly fine and still functional. It is the physical earbud   the hard plastic peice   that has gone out. If i squeeze the earbud hard enough, it will turn on again.   Something inside of the earbud is obviously designed improperly and I would highly recommend that noone purchase these headphones because of this February 13, 2006    This product keeps changing home addresses; none of which are the address I typed in the initial field. It does not stay charged so that it is actually able to function as advertised if you are gone from home any length of time and you put your dog in a yard.  Additionally, gravity takes it down to the lower neck area in common use so that when the dog is doing normal dog things, the device sinks downward so that the antenna is pointing toward the ground.  The pictures are misleading.  We tried all of the advise the company gave us. It's just not a device that works when and where you need it to work.  It was a lot to invest to have this many problems.  October 6, 2006    Worked well for a while  2 weeks , the sound always had static, later the sound went really low and then it just died August 19, 2006    I bought this reader for my laptop since it didn't have USB 2.0. But to tell you the truth, I think this device is a little slower than USB 1.0!  I am going to buy the Lexar 32Bit card and see if that improves the download speed, because this reader is so slow. It took me about 45min to download 2GB of photos from my Extreme III card.  That is unacceptable October 13, 2005    Speaking from real experience, don't waste your money buying this cable which makes absolutely no difference from a cabe you can find with half or less the price. I bought a few top of the line monster cables once I got the top of the line SONY XBR960 HDTV. Later on I switched cables around, with other brand, cheaper component cables such as Philips PTS1000 the HDMI standard owner by the way, and also other HDMI cables even no name brands coming with my DVD player. You know what? I see absolutely no difference even under close examination. The SONY XBR960 produces the finest pitch you can find on any TV. You think about what that means. Stop buying this ridiculously priced cables, and save your $$ and buy somethinfg else on your shopping list. Digital is digital. Don't let monster mislead you that their cables produce more 11010 ... than others. November 10, 2006    Using this in my wife's Expedition is very annoying.  For some reason the cord must be placed in exactly the right position or static will drown out the music coming from the car's speakers.  Note that no other electrical devices in this car and there are a lot of them; she got every option available with the car misbehave at all.  I would not repeat this purchase, not can I recommend anyone else buy one of these.  I only gave it two stars because with continual minor effort it can be made to work acceptably   however, fiddling with the cord while driving is certainly NOT a safe practice September 1, 2006    The absolutely worst headphones I have ever had.  Trying the different sizes, the earplugs just don't want to stay in my ears even standing still.  The headphones that come with the I Pod, and the earlier version of lanyard headphones were both much better.  The sound was fine, but not any better than the standard headphones.  A poor product.  I was very disappointed, as I have had good experiences in general with Apple in the past July 14, 2006    I really wanted to like the TomTom Navigator 5.    The GPS itself is tiny, well designed, and very sensitive.  It worked fine from down in a underdash cupholder or in the glove compartment.  The interface is attractive and easy to navigate.  The voice prompts are clear and loud.  The installation on a Mac was problematic.  Search on TomTom OSX for details, but suffice it to say that the installer included on the CDs simply doesn't work and a new one must be downloaded.  Once past that, it ran fine on my Treo 700p.  Unfortunately there is one fatal flaw   the map database.  In using the Navigator in both California and North Carolina, the maps regularly had misnamed streets, exits referred to by numbers where there were none, and directions that lacked critical information like heading i.e. take the 101 instead of take 101N when approaching a complex interchange.    Worse, the company seems to be actively hostile to updating these maps.  If you go to the TomTom site, you can purchase maps on a city by city basis.  Are they newer than the ones that came with your unit?  Who knows?  TomTom lists no version info and seems to expect you to buy and cross your fingers.  There were just too many errors that I saw while traveling in areas that I'm familiar with to trust the TomTom maps for any unfamiliar territory.  Everything else is great, but the whole point of a GPS is accurate navigation.  And sadly, that's where the TomTom Navigator fails November 3, 2006    I like the light that goes on when the phone rings but that is about all I like about this phone.  Friends tell me I sound like I am under water and I have had to terminate many conversations due to static and interference.  One friend insists that I have a microwave running as we speak.  I am actively looking for a new set to buy because these are worthless March 4, 2005    I agree with the viewer preceding me. Very tinny. The ones I was using from my old computer sound 100% better. These are a complete waste. Two stars because I do hear the music but it sounds awful September 20, 2006    This did not live up to its price or my expectations.  I walk to work and there was static on both AM and FM   June 18, 2006    I purchased a unit recently and after a couple hours tinkering with it, I couldn't get it to work.  I called Actiontec/Vosky support and spent almost an hour on the phone with them.  They advised me to uninstall their software and Skype and to try reinstalling each product.  When that didn't work, they told me the product was defective.  Unfortunately, they refused to take it back themselves and made me deal with the Seller ANTOnline.com first not a very good seller, btw, as they gave me a terrible time when I tried to return the defective product.    Hopefully you'll have better luck.  Also, be sure to check out whether Vosky is officially supporting Skype 2.5.  When I made my purchase, they did not November 9, 2004    We drink a lot of coffee all day, every day.  So we decided to convert to a thermal carafe coffeemaker in order to keep our coffee hotter and fresher tasting.  We first bought the 10 cup Capresso MT 500 which we loved except for the carafe which leaked slightly.  The coffee was perfect everytime and the taste great.  Unfortunately the control panel burned out about a year and half after we bought it.  So instead of another expensive Capresso replacement, we decided to try a Japanese model which we thought might be more reliable.  We have been using the Zojirushi for 2 weeks now and it works perfectly.  No leaks and it just feels more mechanically reliable than the Capresso.  Unfortunately, there is no water filter system in this model compared to others we had taken this for granted and not checked for it.  And no reuseable metal mesh filter that I could find on the market instead of paper filters.  The water also does not seem as hot when it goes into the coffee grounds.  We are not sure why our coffee just doesn't taste very good anymore, but we definitely have noted a real sharp drop in taste quality.  Today, we pulled out our very old Krups ProAroma model and have noted a definite taste improvement.  We will use this and the Zojirushi thermal carafe until we get a new Capresso coffeemaker replacement.  Don't waste your money on this Zojirushi model unless you don't care about taste.  It was money thrown out the window as far as we are concerned.  Even mediocre coffee beans are too expensive to use with this machine July 2, 2006    I have been using the Palmone Navigator with my TX for about eight weeks.  Most of my comments are based on a comparison with the built in navigation system in my Lexus.    Software installation is fairly easy.  However, you need at least a 256 MB SD card to load more than a couple of states; I recommend a 1 or 2 GB card.    While the concept of a TX doubling as a navigation device is intriguing, the realty of it is rather sobering.  It is a cool toy, but if you have to plan routes for your job or any other meaningful purpose, this is NOT the right product.    The pros are:    Inexpensive in comparison to built ins und stand alone products    Unit can be used in different locations and cars and even while walking    One device serves multiple purposes  The cons are:    It can take up to several minutes after starting the unit to acquire a satellite signal.  This is not the case with my car's OEM navigation system.    The maps are outdated and not as precise as the OEM nav system:  I live in Phoenix, AZ and my neighborhood built seven years ago as well as most of the freeways I take to work and back don't exist on the software.  More recent updates are not available I checked the Tomtom website.    Navigation is often not precise enough e.g. it tells me to make a left in 50 yards, when I have already passed the intersection where it wants me to make a left.  I never have this problem with the built in navigation.    Look up function for addresses and phone numbers is clumsy and doesn't display actual address until you map it.    It tends to freeze at least a couple times a day, requiring a soft reset.      Lost connections to the satellite receiver or lost satellite signals also tend to disrupt the navigation on longer trips with stops.  Overall, the unit is too unreliable to be used as your only navigational aid.  If you need navigation to get to your travel destination, you are better off with a stand alone unit.  I truly wish I had better things to say about this device since I really like the concept, but the reality just doesn't match the marketing.  April 6, 2006    Ive had this unit for over a 1 year and ran into problems with reception it would drop signal and it would eventual come back.  I found out that this unit had a defect and the xm rep said I could get a replacement for $50!!!  They didnt figure to tell anybody about this?  If this is true I would not recommend XM Radio at all. Thanks John  September 14, 2006    I bought this printer because I wanted high quality photo printing and I didn't need any of the bells and whistles that come with more expensive printers. It's a Canon, so I figured I could count on the photo quality. I was terribly disappointed though. I generally buy Staples brand photo paper for general photo printing, and it always worked fine with my Epson printer. But my first prints on this printer looked dull and muddy    like I was looking at the images though a mild but annoying grey/brown haze. So I went out and bought Canon paper instead. The quality was somewhat improved, but still not what I had expected. So yes, I got a printer for under $30, but now to get even passably OK prints, I need to spend a fortune on Canon brand inks and paper. Not much of a bargain. August 1, 2006    I have spent time with lynksys and Dell, both of which say they have done all they can do, from their manuals. Because I have had to finish phone calls without without solving the problem, I call back and get conflicting oppinions...this keeps me coming back. It still is not working,  they have that in common. April 16, 2004    I bought this player a little over a year ago, mainly for the ability to upgrade the firmware to region free. Played everything I put in it until a few days ago, when it started having intermittent problems  graphics were staticy and blocky, sound would just buzz and it wouldn't eject discs until I shut it down and restarted it. That lasted for two days before the problem became permanent. Now it's a doorstop.  The Apex web site appears to be down right now, but based on the other reviews here I doubt there's much point in contacting them August 25, 2006    This product came with an italian users guide. In addition the specification fails to state the thickness of this wall mount. It turns out its about 3.5 inches thick and with the thickness of the monitor itself it stands out very far from the wall.  I RETURNED THIS BACK TO AMAZO May 3, 2005    I bought the armband when I got my mini ipod. However, the belt clip that comes with the iPod is perfect to clip to my shorts while jogging. You don't need this large, clunky armband November 23, 2006    Bought C01U and was glad I could send it back after a testing period:  Tried it witih Ableton Live on OS X 10.4.7 and a MacBookPro. Sound Quality was okay but either the buffer was too small which caused the sound to scratch every few seconds or the buffer was too large which ended in a lag causing me to get distracted from my monitor earphones. I tried for about two hours to find the right balance but it didn't work out. This Microphone might have a nice sound but I can'T recommend it for high standard voice recording. November 23, 2006    I can't say enough positive about Logitech mice.  This device, however, was a dismal disappointment.  The PC interface works well, and its knowledge of existing components seems impressive.  Unfortunately, that in no way translates into a good remote interface.  The ability of the unit to reliably turn on multiple components was poor, and, for those with video recorder boxes, very important functionality like the ability to access or schedule recording lists is not readily available if its there at all, its hidden many keystrokes deeper than I care to know about.  Even when reverting to manual operation of individual components, changing which device is being accessed involves two keystrokes as opposed to just one on less complex universal remotes  a much more irritating trait than one might think.  Overall, for day to day functionality I actually consider the barely programmable remote that came with my Scientific Atlanta DVR vastly superior to the Harmony, which I've given up on after only a few days of forced use.  Considering the ridiculous pricetag, I strongly advise you save yourself a lot of money and your relatives a lot of frustration this year by steering clear of this sad study in user interface failure September 17, 2006    The description indicates that it works on Mac platform.  But it does not. And the funny thing is the instruction. It says "if it does not work, try different computer."  Very helpful, isn't it? So I had to use my PC and set up a network w/ Mac and trasnfer.  Too much trouble if you have a Mac. However, it's easy to use. Hook up and click, click. that's it. May 24, 2006    I am an RPN devotee and have owned two other HPs going back to the original 11C. But this calculator is horribly unreliable because it seems to ignore key entries occasionally. Although you hear and feel the click, nothing happens  Also, the keys themselves may "bust loose" and start to wobble even after little use. This is my third replacement in the last two years. Be sure and save your receipt because quality control is absent on this one. November 12, 2004    compared this cable to a philips performance component cable and i am not impressed it was the exact same in picture quality.  all your paying for is the name..  why spend 50$ when you can spend 20$ on the philps and get the same thing? December 30, 2005    It is rather ironic that this device was so cheap that despite the fact that IT WILL NOT CHARGE AN IPOD SHUFFLE...it cost more to ship it back than I would get in a refund. Bought from an Amazon associated store Tiger Direct for $4.99. I also bought the matching car charger for $3.99. NEITHER WORKS WITH THE IPOD SHUFFLE. Oh well.   Belkin makes a iPod dock connector to USB adapter that allows you to use your existing FW based stuff for CHARGING ONLY...., I think that is the ticket for charging the Shuffle on the road August 8, 2006    When it works, this mouse is simply wonderful. Small, accurate, easy to recharge, easy to carry. Under those conditions, it's probably my favorite mouse. I've found that it's equally good for both Mac and Windows.  One complaint is that when it's tethered to the USB port for recharging, it works nominally, but becomes very slow and awkward. It's not at all the same behavior as seen when it's completely free to move.  My first incarnation of mouse lived a long life of about 10 months. My second incarnation of mouse, however, just died at the tender age of 4 months. I've attempted mouse to mouse resuscitation, but to no avail, having found that Iogear technical support exists by name only. I have sent multiple requests for help, and have received not a single answer. Both mice died identical deaths. Suddenly it stops being able to hold a charge, and freezes after about 5 minutes of use. Even when tethered to the USB port for a recharge it freezes.   I'm sad that a technologically good product should have such terrible quality assurance in its manufacture. And such terrible customer support in dealing with its lack of QA November 9, 2006    I received the camera and was not happy when I found a cheap mic that was attached to the cord of an ear peace instead of the the superior sound mic advertised in the ad.  I called Amazon, they had no appolgies and said the most they could do was refund my money.  On another note the picture quality was ok but froze at least 2 times or better per use, as for sound I had to put the mic up to my mouth before the person on the other end could hear me.    Not very happ May 22, 2006    Maybe 2 1/2 stars.  Software and wireless setup for this card went fine, even great, and have continued to work for over 1 1/2 years now but . . . Here's the rub. Seems the housing on the card that receives the threads of the antenna was not properly attached to the board. The antenna would not work properly   0 50% signal strength from the Access Point in the next room when it wasn't falling off the back of my machine! Futzed with the thing getting half  performance with it for toooo long until . . . Had to remove board from computer, use plier to remove antenna from the recept and VERRY carefully place the card in a vice and use vice grip/clamp tool to forcefully slide the 1/2" housing in place onto the board. Did this once and it didn't seat far enough antenna fell off and a couple weeks later had to repeat the process. Apparently it needed to be pressed on even further and it actually snapped securely ? the 2nd time after using more force that you might imagine on such a delicate device. It has worked as advertised since then about a year now. There ARE other reviewers who have suffered from "antenna drops off" too. Be warned. When one pays extra "for quality" they should expect better than this. It's time again to add to my network and will try a different board for half the price. November 17, 2006    It worked okay for about a month and then froze up one day when I was running.  I popped out the battery so it would turn off and when I turned it back on it had deleted all of the songs.  October 21, 2006    I bought this product twice. Now I have two of them and none works. This router is not able to get itself an IP from the cable modem let alone sending out a wireless signal. First time i thought the router was defective and I ordered a new one hoping to return the first one, received the second one before i could return the first one, and the new one was no better than the other anyways. Avoid this product at all costs, or else April 6, 2004    I agree with the previous review.  This phone cord worked twice.  Now, it only retracts about half way, and keeps getting worse.  I'm returning it for a refund.  Don't waste your time with this March 25, 2006    These were expensive..... These are a P. O. S. If you dont know what POS is google it, because I cant say it on amazon. Basically, the layer has an OFFSET. The layers do not match in position. This will give you CRC errors if you have a file which is directly on a layer break, or at the end of the disk. DO NOT BUY, I REPEAT, DO NOT BUY. IM NOT SURE WHY MEMOREX HASNT RECALLED THEIR CRUMMY PRODUCT August 9, 2006    Very bad start, bad point for Amazon. I wanted to get a good quality device and that is the reason I chose buying from Amazon even it was more expensive than other sites.  I just turned on the device and tried to search for broadcasts. It was like all the radios in US were shut down or at least in my region. By mistake I filliped the device and surprise: the device started receiving radio signal. After that everything seemed to be OK but some strange noise in headphones.    Cons: failure/malfunctioning while operating the radio. Pros: 	  great sound with other than manufacturer provided headphones; 	  long operating time using rechargeable battery; 	  excellent expandable via SD cards feature; 	  I love the flip display capability. I really love that device because of its features and I hope it was only my mischance getting a damaged one. However I requested Amazon the replacement of the device instead of reimbursement. I also already advised some friends to buy that device. As a good point for Amazon, the very fast answer when I requested the replacement of the device.  I will come back with updates after I receive the replacement. Hope a good one next time. Thank you Amazon Team.  Coming back after receiving the replacement device. First of all it was a very good idea buying Amazon fulfilled products even it was a bit more expensive than other sellers. The replacement came faster than the product. Excellent Amazon Team and very professional. It's a pleasure doing business with you. The device works perfectly.  Really a device you must have.  More than that, my friends I recommended the mp3 player are very happy with their new acquisition.  They were luckier than me.  5 Stars for the product now. June 15, 2006    These radios look nice but there are some problems here. First the batteries do not last long unless you do not talk. Second the biggest problem for me was uncompatibility with other radios and brands. The receive quality is very poor and hard to understand at times. I also hace a T7200 and the difference is like night and day. The 7200 is the best. The 7400 i believe is an has flaws and that is why you see them priced so low. I paid $24.00 on ebay and also have seen the set at home depot clearance for $44.00 today. What good is any radio if you cant understand what someone is saying? Good try motorola but this is a poor product.NOT RECOMMENDED TO PURCHASE November 23, 2006    After only having the cable for a week under very light usage, the cable stopped working intermittently. It makes crackling noises when the cable is moved. I am not talking about whipping or quick movement, just gentle movement of the cable causes crackling and loss of signal. I was about to scrap the cable altogether but I decided to resolder the connector to see if that would help. I cut off about half a foot of the cable and resoldered it, only to find that the same problem persisted. I got a bad cable, obviously.. February 6, 2005    This player is a piece of junk. First the USB really doesnt mean you can hot swap. You can access the files only if the software is installed on the computer which means that you cannot pick up MP3 from any computer. Second, it gives errors with XP. It tries  to install drivers every time. THird, removing old and adding new MP3 is such a hassle. It takes minutes to delete old files and add new. Seems like you are working with a floppy. Fourth, its Mojo software hangs all the time. Fifth, it sucks battery life. Sixth, if your MP3 is not in a directory, i.e. if copied directly, it wont show. Then it wont delete and will show 200 MB as not free space. Formatting is the only way out. Seventh, it came with a mail in rebate which never showed up. Overall, a bad experience June 26, 2006    What do they say about fools and money?  HDMI uses TMDS which is a digital transmission system with built in error correction. TMDS has been designed to work over cheap cabling and a $10 HDMI cable will meet the specification. If you spend 9 times more on this cable than another one then you have just wasted $80. That's all there is to it.   You don't need expensive shielding or gold plated connectors for a cable. The picture or the sound are not richer or more vibrant with a $90 cable over a $10. In fact the signal is identical. Let me repeat   HDMI & DVI D devices talk digitally with error correction. This cable and ones like it are for suckers only. March 20, 2006    A friend gave me this card for free, when I travled to Arizona. I use this card in my Dell X51V.  From time to time, this card can't be recoginize by the PDA. I have to pull it out and re insert it in, and reset my PDA. Then oneday, my GPS software showed "Map data corrupted". All the data in the card was wiped out, and the card's space reduced to around 300M, have no idea where the remaining space goes to.  Don't put important data on this one!!! That's my lesson November 12, 2006    These speakers are unusable. They give off horrible feedback even when there's not a cell phone or cordless phone in the room February 7, 2004    It's the most expensive CF card with absolutely no customer support.  After a while the CF card stopped working   no power light as if the card &quot;burned out&quot;.  I really can't tell you exactly what went wrong because it's impossible to contact someone at Socket customer support. I followed their web site instructions but was never contacted. I'll never buy another Socket product again November 24, 2006    I am sorry to say that my experience with the CD player has been miserable. After a series of unhelpful conversations with SONY folks, I am going to return it. It often fails to read the CD or cuts in and out on new CDs that play perfectly in other CD players; the shuffle program simply spins and spins, and rarely settles down to actually play a CD.  It occasionally generates a read error message uh, yeah....  Even if on "continuous" play, it often fails to recognize the CDs loaded into it. Instead, it displays a "No Disc" message. Then, even if it does play a series of CDs on continuous play, at some pt, it just stops. It has been like this since I first brought it home and has not improved in the weeks since.     The experience with the tech support people alone convinced me that they do not care.  It took a long time to even get through their tech support lines the first night I had it, and then a lot of persuading to even get them to agree that their CD player was not working. Then they tried to convince to me send the brand new machine back, for a price, to have them repair it. Uh, no, not likely to fall for that  paying them to repair a brand new machine straight out of the box, taking time out of my way too busy life to ship it to them??  I finally have a reference number with permission to return it to the store for a full refund; so back it goes.   Then there are the limitations on the remote control that others here have noted.   Since I had the same shuffle problems with my previous SONY carousel player, I am not inclined to try a 3rd machine.   Needless to say, no more SONYs are coming into my life.   October 13, 2006    Unfortunately I bought this router aka junk from Amazon. Never worked smoothly. Did not like WPA. After I set the the protocol to WPA and restarted it, the router froze. Updated firmware, no use. Now its not working. Power is intermittent, will shut off whenever it wants. Freezes randomly. This garbage is going back to Dlink today. Dlink tech support also said that they are having a HUGE number of complaints with 524 especially revision D. I will never buy another Dlink. DO YOURSELF A FAVOUR AND AVOID DI 52 February 24, 2006    A while ago I purchased the same item, maybe a month, and I received what I paid for: 2 walkie talkies, 2 RECHARGABLE BATTERIES, and a CHARGING BASE for the walkies.   In this last purchase I thought I bought the same things, I even paid the same amount of money, but neither the batteries nor the charging came in the package.  Thank you  Humberto Gonzalez San Jose, Costa Ric September 6, 2006    Adorama is a terrible company to deal with. They sent me a pkg of 2 Epson ink cartridges and 270 papers.  I have called several times as the ink cartridges were not the correct ones. I returned them as instructed, written 3 letters and called. This started in mid July.  I called 2 weeks ago Aug 28th and a different gal said she thought I should have my money back and would see to it.  That was over 2 weeks ago and nothing since then.   I would recommend that anyone should NOT order from this company February 23, 2004    You would think that Panasonic Cordless phone and Panasonic Hands Free Headset would work well together, being that they are sold by the same company. Well, that is clearly not the case. I bought this headset specifically for the reason that it is sold by Panasonic to work with their cordless phones. I've tried it a few times and each time I get the same response from the person I'm talking to. They say I sound too far away, that they can barely hear me. This product is clearly not worth it October 21, 2006    these are extremely uncomfortable.  It's too tight and will hurt the ears.  However, if you're head is small enough, perhaps it might be okay.  On the bright side, they sound extremely well September 10, 2006    Can not get this thing to connect to my Linksys Wireless router.  Problem is not that it doesn't see the LinkSys, the problem is that the v2.50 firmware in the WLI TX4 G54HP is _buggy_.  If I try to enter a 10 digit hex key for 64 bit WEP encryption   it says I have to enter a 5 digit value.  This is the 2nd one I bought I returned the first.  Piece of junk, and _no_ support from the manufacturer September 30, 2006    Amazon says that it is in stock. Do not believe it. I ordered  it at 8/26 and they could not even ship it at 10/1. They delayed it several times saying that it is in stock. Of course the website says that it is always "IN STOCK" and can ship it now. Maybe their now is like 3 months... My current keyboard has broken keys, and I have serious inconvenience because of this November 24, 2006    I bought this monitor in June 2006 and at first was quite pleased with the nice display. Less than 6 months later, in November 2006, I heard a strange noise while using the monitor and all of the sudden the screen went very bright    like an overexposed photo. I'm currently working with Viewsonic to get it repaired I must mail it to CA to be repaired, postage must be paid by me. All in all a disappointment and a hassle. Next time I'll buy a name brand July 10, 2006    I had this adapter running in my the Cardbus slot of my Windows 98 computer and it ran fine. I installed it on my Windows 2000 laptop. Well, my first sign of trouble was a warning popup when I installed the drivers that the drivers were not certified by Microsoft. So, imagine my shock when my brand new computer constantly got Blue Screen of Death BSOD crashes. Big blue screen, loss of data, computer freezes tight, power button inoperative, and when you have to use a pin to press that tiny little laptop reset button on a brand new computer, well, we all know that's when you're in Computer Hell.  I'm a Microsoft Certified Professional so I was able to narrow down the source of the problem. After definitely identifying the FA511 as the culprit, I contacted Netgear's online  tech support. And that's when things really started to get ugly.  It took forever for Netgear to finally give me an answer. This was after days of inactivity, wildly inappropriate responses, and repeatedly requesting same information from me.  Finally, Netgear escalated the problem to their next level of tech support and I was shocked to read their solution: "This is a Windows issue regarding permissions and 16 BIT compatibility mode" While they were vague as to the exact nature of the problem, and contradicted themselves as to whether compatibility mode had to be enabled or disabled, their solution was straightforward: I was directed to a Microsoft Knowledge Base article which tells you how to enable Compatibility Mode   and for 16 bit compatibility mode I had to make my nice clean Windows 2000 computer compatible with Windows 95 yes, ninety five.  So, while the FA511 hardware is a 32 bit Cardbus adapter, apparently their drivers are 16 bit!!! No wonder the FA511 was never certified for Windows 2000. And I wouldn't trust it for Windows XP either.  There are other Ethernet adapters out there by 3COM, Belkin, Linksys, SMC, and Xircom that work flawlessly with Windows 2000/XP by companies that will respond to your questions. Go get them. Avoid the FA511 October 2, 2006    Heaven help you if you want to use this with the FM remote    a very common usage at heath clubs which provide TV rebroadcasts over FM. The FM remote connects to the iPod via a large plug on the left hand side.  The armband provides a small circular hole on the right hand side, but no means of connecting the large FM remote plug September 18, 2006    The first Vista Cx I purchased died after only 3 days of use. I returned it to Amazon who immediately and painlessly replaced it.  The second unit lasted for 4 days until I fell waist deep into a stream with the unit in my pocket. Though it was only submersed for a matter of seconds it immediately stopped working and water was seen internally around the screen. Garmin's claim of waterproofness for 1m for 10 minutes is utter baloney. The poorly designed T style lock on the battery case cannot possibly assure water integrity from anything beyond high humidity. I probably wouldn't buy buy another Garmin but I'm stuck with them as I have already invested $200 in proprietary MapSource software.  I guess that was their plan. On the plus side, the Vista Cx did seem to function as it should...for all of 7 days January 2, 2006    Jan 2 2006 I two ordered the "md7001 2 line phone" I thought I was getting a cordless 2 line phone. What I actually got was a 2 line handset that requires a base unit for it to work. This info should be prominently displayed in their description. September 4, 2006    After a bit of sweat I've managed to get the printer working fine from both my XP and MAC OS Tiger computers  ...... until I unplug the direct ethernet cable to the router that is needed for set up.  Then nothing happens i.e. no wireless printing.  I suspect it's an IP addressing issue having read a helpful article here take note D link   Amazon is becoming a better support site than your own!.  Changing the IP address messes up my internet connection during install; the MAC works quite hard to re establish the internet connection & perhaps this breaks the connection to the printer? I dunno, but it's giving me a headache.  Documentation & troublshooting help are very, very weak & time will tell if D link on line support are any better 22 hours & no response from them yet....  I'm sure network wizards will have this little beasty up & running in no time, but for normal people it's, well, a bit of a pain May 18, 2006    The Memorex U3 TravelDrive is simply a piece of crap. I bought it for easy data transfer when on travel, but it seldom works in any computer. The logo comes up when I plug it in and it simply hangs there. It's utterly worthless July 4, 2006    After seeing a wide range in the prices for HDMI cables, I did some research into why is it. Found out that these cables carry digital signals 0's and 1's, so no matter what kind of fancy name you add before this cable, its basic purpose is simple like a cat5 cable. Then I went ahead and bought the cheaper ones which are working perfectly fine. So, dont be fooled by the high price cables. There is no special sheilding &%p in them. Its all misleading marketing. For this length of cable, I would pay maybe $5 November 5, 2006    I really enjoyed my Zen, when it worked.  The first one I ordered I had to return becuase it would only play every other song, and after it started acting up all the lights would start blinking and I would have to take out the battery to make it stop.  So, I exchanged it for a new one, and just like the other after only one week the lights started going crazy again, it would freeze up, and would only play 5 seconds of every song. What I liked about it, for the small amount of time I had it was the sound quality, the choice in colors, and the fact that it was so much cheaper than other models with the same amount of storage space.  I'm not sure I would recommend it becuase of the fact that they both only worked for a few days.  Now I have an Iriver Clix and have had no problems.  It has less storage but I don't care, it is easier to control and I haven't had problems with it October 21, 2003    I've had many fax machines and this one, when it worked, certainly wasn't the worst of the bunch. Problem is, the auto document feed tray is cheesy. No matter how many times I smoothed, then fanned the paper, it would accept two to five sheets at a time. If I fed one at a time, this unit worked like a champ. Unfortunately, that can be said of most units.  I've had good Brother machines in the past, and probably will buy another, better, Brother fax. This one got me so frustrated I threw it out the back door. It's still laying there, only there seems to be more pieces now July 2, 2006    I got this MP3 at a Black Friday sale and I was absolutly thrilled with it...until the end broke off. The end where the battery was broke off one day and wouldn't stay on. I now have to hold it in place with rubber bands. Now, the player will constantly shut off whenever it moves the slightest bit. The radio, howeverbefore it brokewas great, the organization of the files was good and the mic worked okay if you talked straight into it. Overall, this was okay for the money I paid for it, but I wouldn't recommend this to anyone June 1, 2004    I bought this for my 80 year old mother, who is disabled and can't cope with a computer. Every time the typewriter is turned on, we find that it either types the wrong letter press a Q, it prints an S; press E and get P, etc. or else it prints the correct letter but they are not spaced correctly some overlapping, some huge spaces. There is some esoteric combination of keystrokes that, supposedly, will reset the programming. But this is just too much for Mom. Also, every time it's turned on, you have to re program the line spacing, the tabs and everything else. I ended up buying a 40 year old manual typewriter on e Bay and Mom is much happier with it September 7, 2005    I recently bought this keyboard to go along with a fancy ergonomic laptop stand.  The stand puts the laptop screen at a reasonable height for use on a desktop    that works great.  The keyboard, however, is fairly awful, and I'm returning it.  I realize I shouldn't expect much for $20, but the keyboard has an exceptionally soft, mushy feeling.  The "comfort type" slanted keys didn't get in my way, but they didn't help anything, either.  The worst part about this keyboard, however, was that it uses a non standard layout.  Look closely at the right side    the "enter" key is oversized, and the |\ key is moved below to accomodate it, with the consequence that the right shift key is miniaturized.  This, for a shell user or programmer, is awful.  When you need to pipe something, or escape the next character, you really don't mean to be hitting return instead.  And with the small right shift key, even typing properly with balanced use of the keyboard is difficult.  This small design decision makes this keyboard terrible for heavy computer users like me November 23, 2006    The GE Superadio III used to be a great radio.   I bought my first one seven years ago and it worked so well that I bought another.  I have recently purchased two more as gifts and they are not the same radio.  Side by side they look the same except for the numbers on the tuning dial.  Inside they have dissimilar circuit boards.  The real difference is the two new radios are unable to tune stations nearly as well as the older radios.  I would recommend not purchasing this radio ,2000    About 1 year after having this remote to go along with my Phillips DVD player the remote conked out. The buttons, while almost all  responsive, will not sync up with the systems anymore, and the learning feature on the remote control seems to be defunct. You get what you pay for, I suppose November 25, 2006    My player had the same headphones jack problem that so many people here have had, which ended up rendering it useless out of warranty.    However, while it worked, I was quite pleased with the player and the included software.  Everything was intutive and ran smoothly except for an occational freeze with the player which never became frequent enough to be a major burden.  I also liked the fact that this player wasn't bound by iTunes or file format restrictions.  My only other complaint was that occasionally the touchpad made moving small increments like up one track or down one track somewhat difficult just give me buttons, I know they aren't sexy but they're easy and work well.    I am giving the product 2 stars because, while I liked it, Creative has known about the headphones flaw for a long time and has not improved the build being that this is STILL a problem with these players.  For the amount of money that a player like this costs, it should work for at least year November 18, 2006    I bought this product less than a year ago. 2 days ago, I locked my laptop and tried to unlock it.  But I couldn't.  It was somehow messed up and the combination did not work.  I HAD TO CUT IT!!!  I don't know how it got messed up but I'm sure that it was not study enough to last long March 14, 2006    I bought this receiver from Amazon, & received it about 10 days ago.  Since then, I've tried to play my cassettes of classical music.  When used for this purpose, this receiver sucks big time.  If I turn the volume loud enough to hear the orchestra playing softly, when the orchestra gets loud the amp shuts down & PROTECT flashes on & off.  I have to turn the receiver off, then turn it back on, & lower the volume.  Then of course when the music gets soft again, I can't hear it April 7, 2006    OK, so it protects the TX on a fall, however the latching mechanism depends on a thin piece of plastic that eventually breaks, rendering the case without anyway of remaining shut on its own.  Replacing this with something like the BoxWave.com hardcase, availab le from Amazon June 16, 2006    First off, I bought this headset for gaming, which anyone who enjoys the pastime will tell you how quickly the hours can melt away. Gamers are dependant on an ultra comfortable pair of headphones that we shouldn't be able to feel. I have been searching high and low for the Holy Grail of comfort and I was certain paying $90 for a "gaming" headset would be the end of my search. Sorry, these guys are going back.  I've tried a couple "cheap" Best Buy headsets that I found painful to wear after an hour or so. Then I decided to spring for "top of the line". I wore these for 15 minutes before it became obvious this headset was not the Holy Grail I've been looking for.  The headset itself feels flimsy and cheap. The padding is made of an itchy fabric, and even on my small head, it feels tight. The earphones do not cover my ears and I can feel them slowly being crushed. I'm not impressed with the sound, but I could overlook that if they were comfortable to wear. I didn't even bother to try the mic.  If this is how Sennheiser makes their high end gaming equipment, I think it's safe to say I will avoid these guys in the future. The $30 pair of Aiwa's I wear at work are more comfortable than this and sound the same... if only that pair had a mic.  My ears still feel uncomfortable after taking the set off and then writing this review  I couldn't imagine wearing them for a few hours while gaming. If I find the perfect pair I'll let you all know October 11, 2002    These labels were advertised with the Seiko Label Printer.  They did not work with the printer because the printer requires thermal labels.  I sent these labels back to Amazon and they promptly refunded my money November 4, 2006    THe radio works great....except  the last   2 Sony walkman am/fm radios I have had  you were able to CLIP onto your WAISTE band when exercising.....it was just a large CLIP thing....THIS new one has a different type that you HAVE to use a BELT with!   and WHO  uses a belt to work out ?  I certainly dont.....so I am using a VERY LARGE safety pin   thru the hole in the back and then I pin it onto my shorts....which has made a nice hole in the material of  two pairs.  Otherwise it is a great item May 12, 2006    Bought one from Amazon, they sat on the order for a week before shipping a unit that arrived dead. Went through the return/replacement process and they sat on the order for over a week this time and the  that one arrived dead with the exact same failure mode.   The second one looked as if it had been opened before, accessory bag not sealed, manuals out of place, interior packaging worn. I believe the second one they sent was a return that was then resent to me. Bad news!!!  I still had both and in hope of fixing on, I contacted Garmin who said they were indeed broken and offered to fix one and send it back. This would mean I'd have paid full price for what would then be a refurbished unit.  Both of them returned.  I needed the unit right away for a desert trip. Amazon's refund process made it such that they'd not refund all of the funds but hold them on account those that were originally given to me as a gift certificate from my employer. Therefore I could not get the equipment for a local vendor.   I opened one month nearly to the day dealing with slow order processing, bad units, and more.   So, I'd not recommend the unit and I think Amazon may need to review their own practices to ensure what they have in inventory is new and likely operational, and that when a customer orders something, they put in the effort to ship it ASAP!!  Without that, if you have to buy one, go to a local dealer, put that batteries in at that shop and have them prove it works before you leave with it. Since you can't so that here, don't buy it here.  October 17, 2006    This has got to be the worst camera out there. I don't even think it's suitable for my 13 year old son. The pictures come out horrible! Good thing it was purchase mainly with gift certificates. I'm still sorry I wasted them on this piece of junk November 2, 2006    1.  Buttons are too small, some of which are not spaced apart very well very convenient for somebody waking up who can accidentally hit the wrong button.  2.  Buttons are labeled, organized, and layed out confusingly.  For example, why not have an "alarm interface" which would include all of the alarm modes and features, and maybe a "radio interface" which would include all of the radio functions/settings.  You would really understand how confusing this is if you were to actually go through the process of operating this alarm clock.  But really, don't do it, make the smart choice.  3.  Too many features/modes.  I understand some people prefer all of the different features, but I wanted a simple alarm clock with a buzzer/radio, and clock.  Of course all of these special modes are set as the default, so it is a pain to try and configure all of the settings to a simple mode.  So for those who want a simple alarm clock, definitely DO NOT GET THIS!!  4.  The button handling event is flawed.  For example, sometimes when I push a button, it does not handle the event the device doesn't think that you pressed the button.  So I would have to press the button again and check to see if the radio handled the button input correctly.  5.  It is very slow when holding the button down and waiting for the alarm clock to increment up and down.  6.  Radio reception is very poor.  I have another radio right next to it that gets much better reception than this clock.  7.  LED is not very bright and hard to read from 10 feet and farther out.  I have nothing against TIMEX they make great watches.  This was written to protect anyone who who does not want to waste $30.    April 13, 2004    While the price of the 8 in 1 card reader is reasonable, consider this.  This card reader has a nasty habit of rendering smart media card useless.  Evidently, if you cut and paste or delete data on the SM card using thee 8 in 1 card reader, the reader rewrites the signature file so that it cannot be read by the camera.  So that $24 card has the potential to cost you over $80.00.  In addition, customer service is slow and I have had problems with the drivers November 18, 2006    I bought the iriver mobile transmitter hoping that i would be able to listen to my mp3 player through my radio. I like the fact that it is easy to use and that you can choose your station, but i live in monroe and we get stations from toledo and detroit, which is a problem because most or all of the stations are occupied or have interference and the transmitter is not strong enough to block out the slight interference from far away stations. I didnt think to check to see how many stations i could use for this product, looking back, i should have. i would only recommend this transmitter if you live somewhere that there aren't many stations that you can listen to on the radi July 11, 2006    I love this mouse! It's compact and picks up the signal on just about EVERY surface. I gave it 2 stars because I figured out that it was preventing my laptop from going into idle mode Windows XP, SP2. Sadly, I'm going to have to get another mouse because of that November 17, 2006    After waiting almost 6 months for this Skypephone, and its competitor from Belkin, to come to market through numerous postponements, I just gave up and bought an Asus P525 smartphone. For just over double the price of the Netgear I got a Windows CE PDA with GSM capability and full Skype compatibility. When browsing through your phone contacts your are given the choice to call through GSM or Skype. Because you have built in Wi Fi, you can make Skype calls and chats from any covered area, plus you can go on the internet using IE and check your e mails with Outlook. I have also read that the Skype software that runs on dedicated phones like the Netgear and the Belkin is very crude due to the lack of processing power, whereas with a Windows CE based device you have much faster processors that allow a Skype software closer to the one used on PCs. For those of you alergic to Windows, just wait for the Skype for Symbian release and buy a Nokia or SonyEricsson smartphone. Bottom line: Skype is too good an application to be wasted on poorly designed hardware September 26, 2006    I love the basic design, great hardware/software linkage, and software interface of this Mac happy scanner.  However, I value my time too much to babysit the feed mechanism of the unit I received last week.  It inconsistently graps multiple pages as other reviewers have disclosed.  So, if you're scanning a 10 page doc and it misses one somewhere along the way, have you really accomplished anything?  No.  You must either try the whole thing again with likely the same result, or you must figure out what pages is missing, scan it separately, and go thru a simple yet not expedient Acrobat process to insert the omitted page.  In the end, this machine made it 90% of the way to being a really great product, but the shortcoming fouls half the machine's overall utility.  Swing a little bit harder next time Fujitsu March 26, 2006    Most reviews don't seem to mention a key spec   the throughput of a firewall. I just upgraded my cable connection to the new up to 30Mbs plan and bought an FSV318v3 firewall to use with it. Without the firewall in place, I measured about 25Mbs download speed. When I installed the firewall in between the modem and one computer, download speed went down to 6.5Mbs. I also discovered that if the "enable keyword blocking" checkbox is enabled, the throughput went down to 5Mbs, EVEN IF THERE WERE NO KEYWORDS!  This firewall is useless if you have a high speed connection September 25, 2006    If you're not that picky about sound quality with music, then these may work for you.  I think the frequency response range with these earbuds are pretty minimal.  To me, the music is all mids.  It's missing significant highs and lows for this price range.  I gave these away to a friend who's not that picky at all, but she could tell a difference in sound quality right away.  She normally uses the IPod earbuds which are uncomfortable to her.  However, the noise canceling out weighs the sound quality so she prefers to use these earbuds over her Ipod buds riding a crowded train or bus.  Hopefully I can find something affordable that has good frequency response.  Or maybe I need to educate myself.  Is it the frequency response, the impedence, or something else that covers the sound spectrum?  I'm just looking for a good balance of lows, mids, and highs June 27, 2006    Sound output is terrible, you can't hear it in a car or airplanewith high quality, noise cancelling earphones.  When I called customer service they told me it was not intended for use in a car or airplane. Picture is very good, but I have heard better sound from much cheaper players.  Don't waste your money May 3, 2006    I bought this drive with the advice from my father who has bought several LaCie's for his company. He's always had good luck with them.  The first thing that I noticed when I opened the box was that there was a gap between the case and the faceplate. I called LaCie customer service and they sent me instructions on how to open the case and also noted my serial number so that I wouldn't void my warranty. The problem was that there were 2 screws that hold the faceplate onto the internal chassis who were not even tighted as if they started the screws and didn't tighten them.  By the way... the actual HD inside the case is a Maxtor. If I had know that prior to purchase, I would not have bought the LaCie.  I fixed the problem with the case and turned it on.. only to be hit with a high pitched winning sound coming from the HD. This noise will drive me crazy and is not "Ultra Quiet" as noted in the description. I'm sending it back to Amazon for a refund September 12, 2006    This would be a great phone if it worked all the time.  I had to return the phone within 1 day because the handset was defective.  Amazon was very helpful and prompt with a response.  However the handset would periodically quit working and required that the batteries be removed and reinserted to make it operational.  After 2 months the handset died completely.  AT&T will replace the handset under warranty, but it could take up to 3 weeks to get the replacement August 21, 2006    I live in the Atlanta area and was never able to get a good sound quality coming from the Belkin FM transmitter.  It seemed like I was listening to a FM station that was not coming in good November 22, 2005    I bought this card more then a year ago. Overall I'm not impressed, and wouldn't buy it again. First of all, in ~30% of cases it crashes my Tungsten E. Secondly, the games are not that much fun. SimCity is EXTREMELY limited and not enjoyable to play at all. Honestly, I have more fun playing games I've downloaded for free. Final annoyance   the card is slimmer then a regular SD so it slides off easily from the slots of the hardcase making it easy to lose  January 14, 2006    may be i got a defective one.  there is nothing inside to hold the ipaq. its just a 3 fold cover. IPAQ comes with a much better case when you buy it new August 31, 2005    This drive suffers from repeated Delayed Write File errors.  Ultimately it means you WILL lose all the data on it. It is extremely noisy to the point of damaging your hearing. Lacie support is poor. AVOID November 12, 2006    CONSUMER BEWARE!!!!  This product does not work as advertised.  If you put more than 1000 songs onto this device, On The Go playlists cease to function.  This is very, very sad for a player with 8GB of memory. It's supposed to hold over 2000 songs, but stops working correctly after 1000 songs are loaded?  Wow.  Unbelievable.  This is a well documented bug on the Apple discussion forums, yet Apple has neither acknowledged nor fixed this bug yet.  Will they ever?  Who cares?  Why should they, if consumers like you keep buying it and RAVING about it?  I bought my 8GB Nano, but returned it two days later when I found out the problem was known, but not fixed and not fixable.  Apple should not be shipping products with known bugs in them!  Don't they test these things?!?!?!  By the way, the same problem also occurs on the 4GB Nano if you manage to squeeze more than 1000 songs onto it, which isn't all that hard to do...  If you don't care about having more than 1000 songs, or you don't care about On The Go playlists actually working as advertised, what are you doing shopping for an 8GB player?  Better stick with your 2GB models.. March 7, 2006    From cellphone and also the pager era I began my love affair with Motorola.  Don't need to read much farther into my review to get to the meat of it.  Sometimes companies make a lousy product even though they have others that are great!  Don't Buy These!  They fall into the former category    I needed them quickly to give my in laws time to practice using them before we went on a cruise so when I went to their house for the weekend I bought them from the hated "Best Buy".  I am returning all 4! 2 sets of 2 handsets.  Here was my experience:  I went in and saw the Midland and the Cobra along side the Motorola.  Not knowing much of Midland, but recognizing Cobra from their history with low end phones and electronics, I opted with the very stylish Motorola T6500R's.  I know.  Big Mistake!  I am a computer programmer and very intelligent, but when confronted with products I do not undestand, I go for the brand name.  Which is something that can be forgiven if, as now, you find out what the problem is and correct it.  I took them home and recharged them.  First things first:  The feel in your hand.  EXCELLENT.  They feel as good as they look.  I purchased these to go on a cruise to the Mexican Riviera and to maintain contact both on the boat and in the ports: Puerto Vallarta, Mazatlan and Cabo san Lucas.  We wanted to make sure we did not "lose" my in laws really!  I mean it!  No, really ....   Anyway. Charged them up and turned them on. They come with a plastic encased group of 3 AA rechargable batteries that fit nicely and only one way  they are keyed in the dual purpose battery compartment.  This is nice: if you are out and running around and your charge goes down, simply buy 3 AA alkaline batteries and go on your way.  There is no problem if you forget you have the NORMAL NON RECHARGABLE AA batteries in the case if you put it in the charging stand.  Unlike other units, the physical metal conductors to charge the battery pack are actually built into the pack, not the handset.  If you put it batteries, the charger makes no connection to the handset. If you put in the rechargable battery pack, 2 silver contacts from the battery pack  contact the charging stand and VOILA the unit charges.  Fitting the handset into the recharger is a nightmare, though!  It must be generic and able to fit several different Motorola products production outsourced to Giant Int'l Ltd  so if you thought this was a genuine Motorola built item, you are mistaken.  The entire Talkabout line are outsourced for production as the dual compartment charger has 2 inserts in each compartment and no indication of which one to use for the T6500R's.  I am a smart person though so I chose the one that looked like it best fit and inserted it.  Then I attempted to insert the T6500R's.  I say attempted because the bottom of the handset is rounded and thus does not seat well in any direction.  After you get it to EXACTLY the right position look on the charger to watch for the LED to light up the the hard part of charging, that is is over.  Next item: Bad red LCD backed screen.  Hard to read in ANY light and impossible in the sunlight.  Settings were easy enough.  Channel, sub channel, vibrate, NOAA broadcasts, etc.  However, the advertised QT ensures no one can talk through your handset unless they are using a compatible Motorola handset does not work unless you hit the PTT push to talk button or the CALL button, wait about 3 seconds and begin speaking.  My in laws are new to technology and are used to experiencing walkie talkies when their kids were young.  Therefore this is unusual.  They automatically want to push the button and talk.  So, the first part of what they say is immediately lost.   I say "first part".  I am assuming I actually caught a portion of what they said.  This brings me to the second major flaw.  This unit contains a HORRIBLE speaker.  If the volume is too low then you can't hear it.  Too high and it is garbled beyond your ability to understand it.  We were really hard pressed to find a happy medium.  AND, in a noisy room, it would've been impossible to hear anything.  Some merchants list these as 5 mile radios.  The packaging says 10.  The 1 watt GMRS suggests about 5 10.  We got less than 1.  Directly over a lake. In vehicles on the I 5, we drove less than 2 miles from their house  which is DIRECTLY ON the interstate and got no signal.    I got back to my house in San Jose on top of Communications Hill...the largest "hill" in the area and could not communicate to my spouse less than 1/2 mile away while he was coming up our road!  Since the weekend, I have spent all my extra time on Amazon.com and Consumer Reports reviewing all the offerings.  the latter, Consumer Reports' reviews are from July in 2002! So, I think I am going to return these and purchase the Midland 5 watt GXT500's from Amazon.  Remember, doubling the wattage in this case MORE than doubling does not give double the signal.  As another others have stated, increasing wattage increases only another portion of the distance  ie: 2 watts to 4 watts does NOT double the distance the signal can reach.  Hope this reveiw helps you October 6, 2006    I bought a second Traveldrive because the first one purchased worked just fine.  The second drive does not work on my system Windows Millenium.  Calling the service line I found out that there are two versions and the second is not compatible with the first.  After trying all the recommended solutions, the tech support suggested I request a warranty replacement/trade for the original version or simply get my money back.  Requests for a resolution of the matter have fallen on deaf ears.  I would not waste any more money on products from this company July 11, 2006    I had a terrible time getting a station to come in even close to FM quality.  There was always a bunch of static and the stereo buzzed between songs because I had to keep the volume too high.  The high band of frequencies seemed to work best, but then it led to crackling speakers everytime I turned something electrical on in the car.  It also seemed to kill batteries at a surprising rate.  On a positive note, I loved the fact that it would also function for my son's DVD but in the end, it had way too much static so I hunted for anothe April 29, 2006    I have extensive experience with wireless system setup and operation. My whole system is all Linksys gear. After four hours on this camera, I give up.  When you update the firmware, it erases everything you programmed into the camera so beware.  I could get the camera to work in WiFi mode. Picture is decent, not great. The motion sensing function triggers quite well.  The frustration comes from an inability to get the email function to work. Kept getting an error message with the system parameters setup so it should have worked.  The FAQ section on Linksys website is almost non existent. I did not bother to call because in my past experience that is of minimal help and very frustrating.  Features sound great but could not get it to work right. I will find another unit. November 24, 2006    I am a huge Logitech fan and buy their products in the truck load, unfortunately, this webcam is a dog with fleas.  The picture is blurry, the lighting is abmismal in low light and you can just get better performance from a less expensive web cam.  I am still a Logitech fan, but you can get better performance from QuickZoom November 6, 2006    These earphones provide excellent sound for the money. Rich bass, sharp treble and tight sound isolation with the comfortable and adjustable rubber earpieces.   However I experienced painful electric shocks in both ears if I put pressure on my eardrums, such as getting up from a chair. And that was before I stood in the puddle of water. Just kididng. Shocks occured in first and Sony provided replacement pair. They eventually replaced with an on the ear model.   I have no problems with other Sony headphones or earphones, I think the speaker membrane was positioned too close to my eardrums. Since there are on other comments about this issue, I'll assume its isolated, but beware of shocks on perhaps a smaller scale. November 4, 2006    The first speaker came broken, I first called the manufacture but they wanted me to ship it at my cost for repair, that was not acceptable. I then called Amazon and you took the item back promptly.  When I tried to have replacement shipped I was informed the price had increased and I would have to pay the difference, since this is the speaker my wife wanted I was forced to pay the increased price. I am not happy with this tansaction. July 26, 2006    I tried to use it in my Dell X50 and it hardly worked, was too slow, too short range, you have to unplug and plug it bacl again and again.  I other words, do not buy this if you have a Dell X50, you will just waste your money and time trying to make it work September 13, 2006    This radio is poorly built. When you set it down the little door in back opens and the batteries fall out. You put them back in, carefully set it down, then when you pick it back up the little battery door falls open and the batteries fall out again...Now, I put rubber bands around the whole radio to keep the battery door in place....stay away from this particular model unless you have lots of rubber bands...good luck and thanks for the opportunity to write the review...                                         Bruce Payn August 26, 2006    SHORT cord cannot be replaced, so don't bother with this phone unless you can sit RIGHT by it to chat. November 13, 2006    I ordered this unit with high expectations, lots of memory, expandable, multiple modes, from a well known company and an excellent price; how could I go wrong?.  Easily enough, as it turns out.    I was unable to load it and control the play lists.  Trying to use it in MTP mode always crashed the host BSOD so I reverted to MSD Mass Storage Device mode using drag and drop.  Dragging a folder to the device was pointless.  Most of the time the files didn't even show up, and when they did they were scattered all over the place.  I copied 82 files from the Lord of the Rings set into a single folder, only 52 could be found even during play back, but they could be seen from "My Computer" on the host system.  After fooling around with it for a couple of hours I gave up and called SanDisk technical support certain they would be able to help me sort it out.   I have to admit that I was pleased with their support even though in the end they were unable to resolve any of the problems other than by suggesting that the only way to use drag and drop was to dump everything into the MUSIC folder where it would play in whatever order the device wanted; a totally useless method.   This was totally unsatisfactory since there was no control over the play list and no way to even find all of the files that would fit into 8gb.  Imagine listening to the first movement of Swan Lake followed immediately by something from 9 Inch Nails, then maybe a Bach Cantata!.   Using Media Player to sync did no better.  Creating a playlist m3u of 82 files and then syncing did exactly the same as drag and drop.  A hopeless mess, no play order, missing files and so on.    After spending 3 hours with SanDisk tech support we were both more than ready to quit.  The tech had no more idea that I did about how to solve the problems that plagued the player and we both gave it up as a bad job.  This is little machine has plenty going for it in the specification, but it's hopelessly flawed in the implementation, and this is without complaining about the stiff control wheel or the overly small buttons.    Throughly frustrated, it was in the mail being returned less than 8 hours after I received it.  I just cannot recommend this player, it needs a through overhaul of the interface and firmware; and fixing the control wheel and buttons would be a plus as well.  As it stands, it's without merit as a player.    										 September 8, 2006    It's better if you spend your money in something else. It has a ridiculous transmitting power. So bad that even radio transmitters from miles away interferes with this device 1 ft from the radio receiver. The audio quality is so bad that totally destroys the pleasure of listening to your music. In fact this device should be forbidden to be sold or should be tagged as phony advertise June 29, 2006    I won't recommend to any body. You have the same way of charging thru your computer. I think is waste August 7, 2006    We bought three Creative players.  My husband and I have the Zen micro and my daughter the Zen 20GB.  All three of ours just froze up and stopped working with one year.  I didn't even use mine but maybe two hours per week.  Good thing my daughter's was within her one year period by a couple of days. She still had to pay $25.00  Now my husband and I have to just junk ours and buy something else.  Customer service is awful!!  They won't talk to you unless you show your receipt at least three times.  What a piece of garbage!! November 3, 2006    Does not live up to expectations.  Sound is tinny.  Hard to find stations, very narrow band of reception...plan to purchase a grundig November 18, 2006    It is a great idea, with a few qualifiers. I have found that the forward and reverse buttons don't function for my video ipod or for my niece's nano maybe it would for a non apple mp3 player?.  I have to pair the device to the Ipod every time I turn it on.  The bluetooth transponder will drain the ipod's battery even though it has it's own battery.  Sound quality is decent.  November 22, 2006    I have had this TV for less than 90 days and bulb has burned out, I called Samsung support and the bulb is covered by warranty.  They said they would send my phone number to service center and they would contact me in no more than 72 hours.  72 hours later still no call, I again called Samsung and they said they would contact the service center again and I would be called in 24 hours, still no call.  This was repeated 5 times and each time I asked to be referred to another center but was told none existed in my area.  Fianlly after 6 calls, Samsung referred me to another center.  I then called them and they sent up an appointment 3 days later.  Day of appointment technician called and told me from the problem I described when I made the appointment I needed a new bulb duh and he had ordered one this morning and would call to make another appointment once they received the bulb. I specifically asked if they had the bulb in stock when I made the appointment.  Why they didn't order the bulb when they first set up the appointment, I don't know.  I called Samsung again and was told bulbs are usually shipped within a week of the order.  Neither the words usually or week improved my impression of their support. My fear is that when the technician comes out to change the bulb he will find another part he has to order and I am back on the Samsung support merry go round again.   Now I realize that even though the set does did have a good picture etc, if you can't see it, it doesn't matter. I now have a very expensive paperweight. For me Samsung support has been a black hole and I have yet to see any results after two weeks and no hope in sight for the near future.  What happens after the warranty is over and I have to pay for a new bulb every three months?  If this sounds like I am not very happy with the situation that is the truth.  I am tired of Samsung and the service centers being sorry for the problems and delays but then telling me there is nothing they can do at this point.  I agree, you solve the problem by doing the right thing the first time or the second time or third time etc I am hoping maybe the eighth time is the charm with my Samsung experience. July 18, 2006    I had the same problems as already stated. I am currently having the volume issue as well, and yes my batteries are weak the light is on.  The first unit I bought lasted two weaks and then there was no sound at all. I called Sharper Image and they agreed to send a replacement. I waited two weeks and nothing. I called again and they had no record of my previous phone call. They did send a replacement and told me it would be sent overnight if "deemed appropriate by management." It was not shipped overnight.  Bottom line   this product is awful. Do not buy   I regret it! It is worth it to spend more money on a different product. This only has a 90 day warranty and it doesn't last quite that long. December 9, 2005    I bought one of these.  It worked OK about three months and then just quit.  I do not recommend for anyone else November 1, 2006    Mine didn't work out of the box.  Just my experience.  I am taking this thing back to the store tomorrow.  I returned another crappy webcam today to buy this,  so you can imagine how irritated I am with the lame quality of these things September 20, 2006    It'll do in a pinch....but I hope there are better options.   At times the sound is clear, however, most of the time the static is either 1 just annoying or 2 the static is so loud and piercing that you have to turn it off.   I hope there are units that broadcast a stronger signal, or have another way to connect, in order to provide a constant tolerable sound quality. I would recommend spending some more money to get a reliable device.  March 23, 2006    The mouse worked well with my chipset, but beaware that earlier bluetooth chipsets do not have the power to work with this mouse, although the dongle that is bundled with this is excellent. The mouse was very difficult to use and unresponsive at times, requiring multiple clicks to choose items.  It was sluggish across the screen and very insensitive, even after maxing out all the mouse settings in either direction.   Looking through the forums at Anycom informed me that many people had a similar problem and RMA's were being issued.  Considering that these problems arose earlier last year, I was upset that I was sold a defective product. I just send my mouse back to Newport, California for a replacement.  The features are solid, the size is acceptable but prone to cramping at first.  For a travel mouse it is exceptional, being rechargeable via USB.  Usuage with the USB cable attatched is OK but somewhat awkward as the cable comes from the "head" of the mouse, not the "tail." Would I buy again? only if I didn't find another product that was rechargeable, bluetooth and optical. September 19, 2006    For my PowerBook   my first bluetooth mouse a macally bt worked for about nine months and then a bad battery caused major leakage all over my desk. So for the replacement I read the reviews and went with the Kensington bluetooth mini   primarily for the on/off functionality.  I like the size and shape, the on/off switch and the scroll works just keen. However, tracking is a nightmare   especially when CPU usage is high applications like Photoshop, Acrobat or using a VPN to access my work files. I tried troubleshooting, adjusting the track rate, but nope. The cursor continues to stutter across the screen with this mouse.  I think I'm going to throw in the towel and go back to wired February 19, 2005    I purchased 3 of these APs with the expectation to replace 3 Cisco "b" APs and drop in. The setup used Radius for authentication which is claimed to be supported in both the online info and docs. After config the web UI constantly has problems with cookies and forced you to re login the system would work. One quark was the IP address field for the radius server wouldn't accept more than one character in the forms. Up and running. However, upon reboot, the WG302 loses it Radius info and then cannot authenticate a client again. SHOWSTOPPER. After logging this with Netgear support   their response is this is an unsupported config and requires premium support. While this would be fine if it was a config issue, it's not ok given they claim support for these features and this was a required feature for purchase. They give no further support now.  I would HIGHLY recommend against the extra cost of this unit given it's buggy and has poor support. Config is difficult I had to learn how to use the command line config, the upgrades are not well documented they imply you have to import some obscure file with tftp   you don't but..., however the unit does have good range and works No RADIUS of course in a basic config. March 14, 2006    My daughter really didn't use it that much but within about 5 weeks it started to fall apart.  The wood veneer on the base pulled up and splintered from tightening the strings to tune it.  A low price for a guitar but I don't think it's even worth this price.  March 30, 2006    Now, imagine my astonishment. After receiving this beautifully designed futuristic looking set from my favorite communication device manufacturers, I set it up only to realize that the cordless phone only works when there is a direct line of site to the base! Unbelievable!! I live in a compact apartment ok, and believe me when I say it isn't 20 feet between the base and my bed room, and last night after setting up, I retreated to my room took up the cordless handset to make a call only to realize that there was no connection to the base. This phone in a nutshell, looks good, but it sucks!! November 24, 2006    ipods are the leading sellers of portable players and everybody knows that but guess what ipod does not support the leading and best quality video format divx and avi hmm thats kinda retarded no? if any of you out there use file sharing programs such as limewire or any torrent programs if u download any of those videos the best ones and the majority are divx and avi too bad for you unless ur willing to sit around for an hour or two and convert your video to mpeg4. Also the video you convert may have a few complications, the audio and video may not be sychronized...at all and for those of you who have already purchased this piece of garbage im sorry and i have great sympathy for you so if ud like a program that will convert ur video for free and results in pretty good quality go to download.com and search for jodix video converter. This is not from speculations I have experienced this all myself with my own purchase of the video ipod and was a decision i regreted. Suggestion check out the creative zen vision M sure it may be thicker but the price is amazing for its features and conveniences of transfering files into it November 22, 2006    I'm pissed.  I feel I've been ripped off.  The 3rd party vendor delivered a defective unit.  I want to return it.  I have been unable to determine how to return this unit for a refund.  I may never buy through Amazon again November 17, 2006    The unit works fine as a Bluetooth Radio. The software and drivers!!!! do not install properly at all!!! I am a network administrator & pretty savvy about PCs   i could not come up with any scenario to get the software to work!!!  Save your money and just buy the unit   forget the software September 28, 2006    I bought this and found that if you like to burn your own CD's to play in it, it has a problem reading the tracks.  It sometimes spins up and doesn't play, and it always has a very audible noise on spin up and track find.  I usually wake to that sound before the music starts.  I AM NOT A LIGHT SLEEPER.  This is my second one, and I've basically been using it for the radio wake function for the last few months.  Do yourself a favor and find a different product March 16, 2006    These speakers sound great   but sometimes you want to crank it up and in the office that's a no no. So you reach for your phones and... no place to plug them in! How lame is that? Also whoever designed the Volume/On/Off knob is an idiot. The thing is so streamlined and slippery that when you try to turn it, the whole speaker just slips away from you. They're so light that they don't have enough resistance to stay put. So you have to hold it in place with one hand while you turn the knob with the other unless you velcro them to your desk or something. Too bad because   like I said   they sound great July 31, 2006    I purchased this unit due to frequent blackouts in my area and 2 power supplies going bad.  It will run my cable modem, router, PC, and LCD monitor for 5 minutes.  This is more than enough time to save work and shut down.   Equally important, I know that my electronics are receiving clean power.  I feel that this investment is minor compared to the loss of valuable data or the failure of equipment due to a power spike or an irregular power supply.  As always, Amazon had it to me in &lt;2 business days February 24, 2006    Hi  I brought 256 MB Kingston SD card from Amazon.com recently. According to my openion Amazon is one of the best online shopping market, they deliver the products intime and the items i brought so far are working very well. 256 MB Kingston SD card working very good with out giving any problem.  One can always go to Amazon for online shopping. bye kira August 18, 2005    I had no problems with this card and the delivery was prompt...  Thank You Muc March 3, 2006    This CF card is so fast that I can run my shutter on my camera non stop until the card is full at a frame rate of 3.5 fps. No lag or slow down. That is amazing. It makes my camera perform better. Canon Rebel XT November 14, 2006    definitely recommend this memory card, download time is great . .  February 21, 2006    It works great!  I really like it.  There is one small problem though.  The lid is REALLY hard to take off!  I've had it now for about a month and have gotten lots of use out of it and it has loosened up a little, but not much.  There has got to be a way to make a lid that stays on, but isn't quite so hard to remove when a person wants to use it.  I appreciate being provided with a forum to voice my opinion November 9, 2006    Great value for your money. Kingston has always been a reliable memory chip company and the same goes for this product. November 8, 2004    I have burnt a few discs and so far no coasters, They are burning at 8X in my NEC 2500A burner. That is pretty considering that it is advertised at 4X. Hopefully the burn quality also will be good and will last for a few years September 21, 2006    My new TV finally arrived and I am very pleased with it.  I picked this one based primarily on all of the reviews I could find online, the vast majority of which were very positive cNet has lots of reviews as well.  Also, I have two friends who are cable guys and they see all kinds of TVs, all day every day, and both of them bought this exact set for themselves.  My cable provider does not offer many High Def stations yet so the image quality of Standard Def video was the primary criterion for me.  Most reviews were very positive in this regard but there were some that were the exact opposite.  My first impression had me rather worried.  I have since come to believe that poor quality Standard Def video is just a matter of garbage in = garbage out.  I began to suspect this when I noticed that some stations looked much better than others.  In fact, some shows and commercials on any given station looked much better than those which preceded or followed them.  I became convinced as I watched a cable news show where the host and two contributors were each on different cameras being displayed at the same time.  The video of the host looked OK, the video of one contributor was poor, and the video of the other contributor looked great.  The video quality of the various individuals remained consistent when they were occasionally displayed individually on the entire screen.  The set certainly has the ability of displaying fantastic Standard Def video.  I expect that I just never noticed the variability of video quality on lesser TVs.  The quality of the Hi Def Video is breath taking.  Set up was simple and I have not even bothered yet to read the manual.  Of course the display can be adjusted in many ways, but it looks good to me with the factory presets and I do not intend to adjust the display anytime soon.  Flipping through the on screen menu, I stumbled across the altitude setting which was a nice surprise since I live at 10,000 ft. above sea level.  I was a little disappointed with the delivery situation.  I thought I had ordered the TV in time to have it by opening day kick off.  Instead it arrived just in time for the third weekend of the football season, and I was told that it could easily have been another week beyond that.  I blame the shipper Eagle USA for this, not Amazon.  I say this because I could track the package enough to know that Amazon had the TV picked up right away.  But then Eagle USA kept it sitting in Dallas for almost 2 weeks, and then in Denver for another week, before finally calling me to arrange for delivery.  I believe that if I had not called and emailed Amazon to complain about the delay, it would have taken longer.  Eagle USA told Amazon that they had tried to call me sooner but I know that this is not true for two reasons: 1 I had called Eagle USA the same day they told Amazon this and Eagle USA told me that they had no intention of calling me until a day or so prior to delivery, and 2 my livelihood depends on people being able to reach me at all times and I have a very good message and caller ID tracking system in place.  All in all, a great set at a great price, I just wish I had ordered and started pushing the issue sooner May 28, 2006    I,ve seen complaints about the ac adapter you "must" plug in. Hey guys, try it without an outside energy source, I just hope I,m not gonna fry something but it seems to work fine just plugged into a powered USB port. I have a VERY high end system though with wattage to sprare, but no more PCI slots, Damn 7900 512 gtx graphics cards, why do 2 of em have to take up so much room. Oh well, trade offs are a bi   , but a reality and 7 extra USB slots are awfully nice August 30, 2006    The intuos3 6x11 tablet is nice because its like having a giant mouse pad. The mouse itself has five buttons that can be programed to do different tasks, opening programs is one of them. It also has a scroll wheel. On the pad there are more buttons that can open programs among other things. Also there are touch sensitive strips on the tablet that can be used for scrolling. I use the pen inside of art progams and it is a real joy to work with. The pressure sensitivity is is a very nice feature alowing you to go from a thin line to a thick line and vice versa. Its main high point for me is the ability it gives to draw curved lines and detailed lines. It fits nicely in hand and has comfortable rubber grip. Also you can flip the pen over and use that side as an eraser. The only complaint I have is that on the pen there are two buttons and one of them the lower one is placed in a spot where when I'm drawing my finger frequently hits it, because of this I simply had to make the button inactive. Over all I feel that Wacom has done a very good job of developing this product. I feel that it is of high quality and well worth the price. I would definetly save up the extra few dollars to get this larger tablet, it is nice to have if you have the desk space. I've heard Wacom is the best in the pen tablet industry and now that I own one I believe it November 11, 2006    The other effusive reviews are spot on...  the picture is fabulous on new DVDs Lord of the Rings, Nemo, Harry Potter.  A $20 Cables to Go HDMI cable does a great job.  We have the  Sony KDF 42E2000 42" 3LCD Rear Projection HDTV and are thrilled with the combination.  A few annoyances:  The machine responds and loads slowly, but that's not too bad; a minor sacrifice for the incredibly low price.  And, certain DVDs of old movies Some Like it Hot, The King and I stretch the picture horizontally, making things look squat.  I'm sure there's a solution, but just can't figure it out.  Any tips February 23, 2006    Got my order quickly and found out that these cases are much BETTER than the ones sold here locally, and they were CHEAPER !! July 28, 2005    My daughter uses a Cochlear Implant that has the option of being powered by 3 AA batteries. We have tried several brands trying to find the ones that last the longest. We have tried Energizer, Duracell, etc. She needs to replace them every day and a half. Since the Implant is a high power draining device, every extra hour counts. These batteries are one of the best values out there. April 19, 2006    I've had it for over a month now and it works as well as I expected it to work. I was expecting random quirks here and there as I continued using it, but none whatsoever August 8, 2006    This little unit is easy to use and ready to go!!!! Not one problem with it so far, I've been using it for over two months now November 9, 2006    I like it very much, I use it in an outdoor trail camera for wild game and it hold several pictures and has been in the camera in all kinds of weather. I would buy Kingston again July 30, 2006    For those of you who bought MiniDisc recorders to move away from analog tape recording, this product is wonderful.  Especially good for recording lectures, voice lessons, etc.  It works quite well with the built in mono mike, or you could use an external one.  One of the few players that lets you record from a line input or an external mike    you toggle which setting it is in the settings section.  I record my radio shows by plugging in the line out from the station's tape deck to my iRiver.  For those who recorded live music with their MiniDiscs, it's a little trickier.  You have to set the record input before    you can't change it on the fly.  I've recorded live DJ shows with the built in and AGC on.  Of course, the booming bass distorts horribly, but overall an easy record of the show.  Very easy to keep in a pocket rather than to be obviously recording a show.  I've also tried external mikes with the record input turned down very low with very good results.  A bit of trial and error which I'm still refining with later iRiver products.  The single AA batter lasts a good long time.  Summer School involves 2, 2 hour classes, and I can record several days of them before battery is low.  If the battery runs out during recording, fear not, the file is saved!  The negatives are the requirement to go through the special iRiver music program, but there are now firmware updates that will change your iRiver into the typical USB external drag and drop drive.  Files are recorded in a .REC file which one then converts to a .mp3 file after transfer to your computer.  I don't know how different this format is because it takes up exactly the same amout of space as the .mp3 file.  But you can't trasnfer .mp3 files off your iRiver, even if you made them yourself, so don't think you can use this to transfer .mp3 files from one computer to another.  Also, the molding where the line in input is sometimes gets in the way of certain plugs such as some RCA to 1/8" adaptors, so make sure you pick one that alows it to fit in securely all the way.  I've had mine for just over a year now and use it every day, whether just playing mp3s or recording classes.  I'm only just starting to have some trouble with the on/off/play/pause button.  After so many presses, it's starting to wear out.  But it's still working reliably.  I just have to press a little more precisely and pay more attention.  I have the 1G model iFP 799 which is great.  I was able to record a 12 hour radio show marathon I produced with it.  Previous marathons required a stack of cassette tapes or minidiscs.  I'm quite happy with iRiver and plan on buying from them in the future October 16, 2004    Just some specs missing from amazon's description:  USB 2.0 CompactFlash Reader  Small and travels with ease LED status indicator indicates when files are being transferred  Data transfer speeds up to 480Mb/s  Backward compatible with USB 1.1  Ships with removable USB 2.0 cable   Features   Designed for large data transfers, like images, music and video  Data transfer 5 to 6 times faster than using USB 1.1  Portable   weighs only 1.5 ounces  Protective cover case keeps reader pins away from external hazards  Compatible with Windows 2000/ME/XP and Mac OS X and 9.1  No drivers required with most current operating systems  2 year Limited Warranty  March 2, 2006    This memory card handles the job really well.  Unless maybe you're a professional sports photographer, it's plenty fast enough.  No problems using it with my Canon Rebel XT.  It holds about 550 pictures JPEGs at the highest resolution 8.2 MP April 10, 2006    With boys aged 2 & 3, and some poor disc storage procedures when I'm driving, it appeared I was in need of one of these units.  Generally my toddler boys are not permitted to handle discs, but it occassionally happens, and doesn't take long for scratches, damage and finger prints to hinder performance, and when changing children's cds in the car I don't always store the disc properly and that leads to damage also.  I read through a lot of reviews on this item and the skipdoctor products, and finally decided on this unit because it runs on a/c power, is fully contained and automatic, and was about $10 less expensive than the most equivalent skipdoctor unit.  Both items had mixed reviews   mostly positive, but I found that most people who tried to make the units work and put in some time and effort were satisfied with both products.  I'm very satisfied with my purchase it has repaired two discs that could not be played at all, and one that skipped.    This product repairs a disc to "useable" condition, it does not repair it so that scratches are not visible.  I can still see, but not necessarily feel the scratches.  It's also important to remember that some scratches do not affect performance.  If a disc plays well, but shows scratches   I just clean off the finger prints with a cloth or use the unit to clean the disc and see if the performance is satisfactory before attempting a full repair.    I agree that the instructions with the unit could be better. I saved the instructions provided by another reviewer to use with the provided instructions for clarity. Also, some severely scratched and damaged discs do take many passes to repair, so I agree it is time consuming to acheive a full repair for some items   but it is possible.  I noticed that I could cut down some of the repair time and solution usage by repeating the buffing/sanding pink disc process several times in a row for deeper scratches before using the repair.  I ran one disc through 3 times in a row, then used the repair cream solution with yellow pads and it played fine.  My lesser damaged disc only required one pass with the buffer and one with the repair until it worked great.  I usually clean the disc manually with the cloth or with the machine depending on severity of grime, then buff, then repair.  It can be time consuming to repair a disc to functioning, but it does save the disc and my discs play like new despite the scratches that are still visable.  I think this was good purchase and not overly complicated to use.  November 5, 2006    This was my second DLO transpod. I had an older white one that I bought used. I figured I would "upgrade" to this one since my iPod and my car's interior are black. overall the thing performed similarly to my previous one, but with a few little changes.  For one the output of this unit is much lower than its older counterparts. That normally doesn't matter if you choose a good empty frequency, but as you start traveling you notice interference much more than you would expect.   Next, I can't turn it up any where near the volume I used to be able to on the older one without getting hissing and static. It seems that the decreased level on the output also increased the amount of electronic noise when using it.  Last, the most annoying part of this whole product, is that it turns off the radio transmitter after a period of no use. I have paused my iPod to take a phone call only to have very loud since the level is so low on it you have to make up for it with stereo volume static and sometimes radio stations coming through. Very embarrassing. Or when you stop your car and then come back, as soon as the radio turns on you are met with the same very loud noise.  Since my car doesn't leave me many options for stereo replacement, this is the best product for my specific situation, though I may try and get that old one back from my friend...maybe an "upgrade" to a newer one will settle the deal August 27, 2006    This receiver is a replacement for an older, more expensive, defective Sony that I had.  It was easy to install and performs comparably well with more expensive units.  I am satisfied with the product July 27, 2005    I listen to a wide range of music, from hard rock, techno/electronic, to classical, and I've found it difficult to locate reasonably priced speakers that can handle all of this    at least until I ordered this set.  I was apprehensive about buying online and also about the Sony brand for speakers, but I'm very happy with this purchase.  I've been very impressed with the sound both at the high and low ends   the highs are crisp and the bass is tight, not boomy.  The soundstage is expansive of course, this depends a lot on your receiver as well and imaging good.  I'd definitely recommend this speaker set January 23, 2006    This box is perfect to have all the basic ipod accesories at once. I have the 60 mb video ipod and all the accesories works perfect September 11, 2004    I was wondering if anyone knew if this hub would work for linking Xbox's together so you can have more than 4 people play at once. I know that I could link 2 with a crossover cable but I want to link 4 together so that I can have a gigantic 16 player Halo match It's a very popular Xbox game for those who don't know August 9, 2006    I think this is as good as the expensive over $60 HDMI cables.  I wouldn't spend money on the expensive ones.  First of all, I'm not a cable junkie nor an expert.  However, according to my research, there's no difference in performance b/w the expensive version nor the $12, $15, $20 version when it comes to HDMI since it's all digital.. hole buch of zeros and ones.  The durability of the cables... I don't know.  But unless you're someone who constantly plugs and unplugs the cables for some reason, it wouldn't matter.  Normally, you'd connect the cable and keep it that way for a long period of time, so the durability is not really relevant.  Bottomline: This is as good as the expensive ones.  I first tried out the expensive Monster brand which was $85.  Then I returned it after purchasing this, for the quality was the same.  Don't buy the expensive ones March 1, 2006    PROS:  small reliable very good quality with pictures ease of use good software easy install affordable  CONS:  ink tends to run out quickly with pictures slow rate of printing usb cable not included  overall: 5 amazonian stars for the average user November 8, 2006    Don't let the reviews fool you. At this price, it's worth a little research. Apparently U3 is annoying a lot of people and the people at U3 have created an uninstall download for you to get. So Google it, download it, and buy the USB drive. The size of this USB drive and the fact that you'll never have to worry about losing the cap along with an excellent price make it worth buying. After you uninstall the U3 software, it works like any other drive. It works great, it just takes you ten minutes of a little extra work.   I'm very satisfied so far and have carried audio, video, and a lot, lot more  on a drive the size of a pen cap. Brilliant... May 7, 2006    It's not listed in the product description but the Pico works with the iPod Mini too.  Like the other reviewers, I found it easy to setup: tune the radio, turn on iPod, connect the Pico, tune the Pico, done.  In my car, the static interference was less noticeable when the unit was placed in close proximity to the radio.  I noticed this as well with my home stereo. Maybe the next generation Pico needs a larger antennae, or my iPod needed charging.  Regarding sound quality, my other car has a built in iPod connector.  The Pico sound quality is comparable, somewhat muted, but enjoyable.  The Pico does offer the advantage of displaying the iPod menu to select tunes.  I've read mixed reviews on other FM transmitters, but I am pleased with the Pico November 10, 2006    At first, I was not sure about if this Windshield Mounting Bracket was going to stay in place while I drive trough the streets. However, I was very surprised when I found out that the Bracket stayed put all day going from one place to another, even under some vibration. The suction rubber system is quite strong. It has 2 angles for adjustment, and you can rotate the GPS clockwise/counterclockwise.  Pros: Strong suction rubber system, GPS mounting system Cons: Lack of a 4th angle for adjustment the GPS can only be adjusted in the windshield plane, so you can not turn it towards your face for easy viewing   that's why I give 4 stars October 30, 2005    I purchased this receiver from Fry's Electronics in San Diego, CA for $199.99. At first, I was a little hesitant about purchasing an all digital receiver. When I got it home, and connected it, I was amazed. This receiver will blow you away with the precision of it's home theater capabilities. I am using four Polk R30's as my fronts, and rear surround, and two Sony center channels for my front center, and rear center channels. I also have a KLH 10inch Tremor Series powered subwoofer. I estimate the entire system to cost about $650.00 total. I have colleague that has a Bose home theater system, and my little system blows his out of the water, and he paid much more for the Bose. If you want a great receiver a minimal price, this is the way to go. By the way, did I mention that it has four digital inputs, an optical output, and HDMI in and out connections. BUY IT!!! July 15, 2006    at such low price, this player is really pretty good.  it gets the job done, even though the UI is a little bit basic.  it can record in DVDR and DVD R, and has a 10 hour mode.  Although in the 10 hour mode, image is not so clear but still pretty good if view on the computer using 320 x 240 resolution.  and at such a low price, you can get two or three to record different programs and archive some shows, and it is still cheaper than the Media Center PC.  Good thing is the disc is already a DVD playable in any player.  No need to burn it as opposed to if you are using Tivo or Media Center PC. November 9, 2006    This samll web cam is doing a great job connecting my families overseas. The flexible shoe is really handy and the image and voice quality is beyond my expectation September 3, 2006    I have had my Axim x51v for about three months.  I purchased it from Dell for $480 with aluminum hardcase, extra 1100mAh battery, and auto power cord.  Strengths: Just about everything.  The processor is absolutely incredible.  I heard unconfirmed that the Intel 624 MHz PXA270 is faster than a 2GHz Pentium 3!  It sure seems like it.  This PDA blazes through movies, photos, games, word processing, and anything else I can throw at it.   The other definite high point for this PDA is the screen.  Once you see a VGA screen like this, you will be astounded at the difference it can make over a QVGA screen.  I have to get about 4 inches from the screen to even see the pixels.  The screen is crystal clear.   The battery life is phenomenal, even with the standard low capacity battery.  Playing a movie at full brightness and full volume will last about 2 hours, extended to about 4.5 hours on low brightness and headphones.  Turned off with a 1GB SD card drains the battery about 2% per day.   WiFi is amazing.  It connects consistently and is moderately easy to set up.  Once connected, it keeps the signal well and is, while not fast, reasonable for speed Just about everything on this PDA is almost perfect.  Weaknesses: Not enough programs to start with, Windows Media Player 10 Download TCPMP, it's way better  Problems: Don't use Odyssey Client, it makes the PDA start up really slow.  Also, in ActiveSync, On the PDA, select Menu, Add Server Source.  On all of the screens, put random characters in each field, and deselect any check boxes that tell it what to synchronize.  Then go to menu, schedule and select manual for both.  Then go to menu, options, and delete the entry that you just added the one that has no boxes under it checked and delete it.  It fixes a myriad of problems and makes the PDA run faster, and it still syncs automatically in the cradle.  Conclusion: An awesome PDA that does just about everything.  Combine it with a BT keyboard and perhaps even a BT mouse, and you have an unbeatable combination of power and portability.  Everything works extremely well July 14, 2006    sent check for full price fairly promptly, but not including tax, which ads say they will d November 17, 2006    I wanted a combo and this seems to be the best one on the market now days. The mouse is very good, a tad small, but still very comfortable. Not as good as  Logitech MXtm500 for my hand I'd say I have a medium size hand, but still a very solid product. Side buttons are very useful. No need to install any additional drivers for XP if you are ok with the default behavior. Just plug it in and use. The keyboard is so so. It is not bad, but just not very comfortable, especially compared to Microsoft keyboards. I use Microsoft 4000 for work and it really shines. The labeling is very small, Insert/Delete keys are not standard and I hate Vista ready button, if you hit it in the middle of the game you are lucky not to crash. Would I buy it again? Yes. Would I recommend it? Yes, but with some reservations.  July 26, 2006    Again, Creative Labs has combined all you need into one package: line in jack, usb port, fm antenna, and even a jack for a sub woofer! for a small portable speaker, this system gets pretty loud and clear. The stereo effect button works great, the design is very stylish and the remote is a nice finishing touch. now for the cons;like most reviewers,i too, have to say the bass is lacking a bit, and the stand has a bit of trouble holding the speakers up due to small rubber feet that doesnt grip very well. and the last thing is the speakers itself doesnt have any grill or guard on it and it looks like it could be damaged easily, but these are minor things i can overlook and all in all for the price, this speaker system is very good.     i tried the Altec Lansing portable speakers for the same price and i returned it the next day. it didnt even get half as loud without distortion and it didnt have as many cool features either. right now, im using the speakers with the zen nano plus and it works great! im saving up for the zen micro now and if it sounds good with the nano, then i know the TravelDock will sound amazing with the micro that it was intended for.  one more thing, if your going to use the line in cable for a device other than the zen micro, be sure to insert the BLACK end of the cable into the device your want to play and the WHITE end into the speakers line in jack. i read a reviewer who said the speakers sounded tinny like a transistor radio and its because she had the wrong ends of the cable attached. i did it myself and i figured it out. unlike the reviewer who returned the speakers before taking the time to learn how to use it before returning it and giving it a bad review.  I love these speakers and i even use them for my t.v and they sound great for that too August 24, 2006    Purchased this iterm for my HP8450 printer. Pictures are outstanding and the cartridge does the job.Only problem is the cartridge gets eaten up in no time at all. Cost per print no bargain. Problem isn't with the catridge, but with the printer and print process. Now we know why HP has printers at such reasonable price. They eat you up and spit you out via the price of cartidges. That's where the real profit lies. Amazon is tops in price and service delivery June 5, 2006    We bought 3 of these and every one has dead pixels. It's not a ton, but one monitor has three that are red in the center of the screen, and other has a few that are bright green in the corner. Not a huge deal, but there are some in all 3 July 18, 2006    This is a great little piece of hardware.   I bought it for my MP3's and movies, and I'm very pleased. It's totally "plug n play"; there aren't even any drivers that need updating, assuming you have XP up to par.   It gives 160GB well, 149 in actuality of space to work with. After moving nearly 50 gigs over to it at once, on the first day, it froze up. After that minor incident, I've had no problems, though, and my machine runs alot faster because of it. With my 100G of music already on it, I'm very happy with it. It has given me no fuss  it doesn't even give me any noise! It's as silent as a fart, and that's a big plus.  I found mine at Wal Mart for $114 and I think that I made a good purchase. If you're on a budget, this is about as good as it gets. Seagate's 300GB is also highly recommended, as I've worked with it before. A November 6, 2006    Wow! Now I can transfer all I have in my PC to my cellphone. It's awesome... I need no cable to transfer stuff from my PC to my cellphone and from my cellphne to my PC. You can get this item in a very special price. Get it!! December 20, 2004    This is an awesome little MP3 player.  I enjoy both the MP3 player and the FM radio.  It is very easy to use and syncs well with Windows Media Player.  It is perfect for going to the gym because it is so small.  It came with a great leather case that fits it well and prevents damage and scratches.  My only problem with the player is that I can't fit more than 66 69 songs although it says there is about 70MB of space left on the player February 24, 2006    I am working with my new PDA the Live Drive and is great to have akk ny videos, music and to write my notes and documents before my shift or meeting, and also the wireless connection is so great. I like the option that you can use it as an external drive March 23, 2006    I'm using the Monster Cable MP Home Theater PowerCenter HTS800 to remove line noise in the electrical current to a high end tube pre amp.  The line noise is removed beautifully; however, the PowerCenter itself creates a high pitched tone.  The tone comes out of the PowerCenter device directly.  If you are planning to use this product on a high end sound system, I recommend placing it in a location that is acoustically isolated.  November 9, 2006    This little charger works great. It is the second one of it's kind that I have purchased. The last one took a lot of abuse and therefore I needed to replace it. Would buy it again. Charges quickly and is quite handy November 3, 2006    I have to say, when I first purchased this little goodie, I just assumed I was buying more memory for my Motorola Q.  I had no idea just how useful and reliable this would be.  It has proven to be not only invaluable, but a very good investment, based on price and usage.  Buy one, no TWO.  These things are great August 7, 2005    These Verbatims are terrific.  As you may know, working with DVD R media is almost a gamble...cheap media will save you a few pennies but either give you coasters or media that plays on few players.  Sticking to name brands helps, but even then, some brands rely on outside sources for their media and while one lot/batch may be good, the next batch from the same brand may be from somewhere else.  Usually, you're safe with media made in Japan.  These Verbatim's are made in Taiwan but, they are great..I've bought one every couple months and I'm on my 3rd spindle now.  They have a wonderful printing surface that as mentioned, dries nearly instantly in Epson printers I use an R200.  Hub printable so you can print all the way to the edge which gives your discs a terrific look when printing nice disc art or photos.  Not one coaster so far, burned with Apple Powerbook 2X Superdrive as well as a Lacie D2 Firewire writer. Though the media is 8X, it works in my Panasonic DVD Recorder DMR E55 which recommends up to 4X media perfectly.  So far, I have not encountered one person who has not been able to play the discs Samsung, Sanyo, Panasonic, Sony, Apex, Toshiba DVD Players, PS2, XBox, no problems .  Over 134 discs so far, and they look great, play great, and are a great price for hub printable discs.   Highly recommended...I'm ordering more! November 5, 2006    Unlike many other cables that splice A/V output, this cable does so while retaining the details of that output.  I.e., both Left and Right channels are extracted and outputted, not simply the Left channel with audio mixed down to mono.  Also, it works on some computers, too!  On the minus side, I haven't gotten it to work on the television.  In order to do so, you also have to buy the adapter for the Creative Zen player.  I bought this so my Creative Sleek Photo would be compatible with an X Rocker chair with built in speakers, and found that CD players and many other audio units became compatible, too.  For that, it was worth the cost June 26, 2004    Good price. Good company. I use this on my Kodak CX7300 and it's fine. Good product to buy October 17, 2004    I've bought several of these cables and have been very happy with my purchase.  I've used them for hooking up my Gaming Systems, TV, Cable Box, and Receiver/DVD Player.  Note: I had to buy a small 3 in 1 Fiber Optic Switch Box to handle all these cables  my Receiver and TV only had one digital audio connection each.  I believe that these cables are the best name brand VALUES currently around for Fiber Optic Audio.  What do you REALLY get for a "high end" fiber optic cable that is triple the cost of this cable? I don't know.  I purchased one which was "top of the line" and obscenely expensive, and of course it sounds great, but these cables sound great too.  Plus, these cables ARE Monster cables, AND they are THX certified!  What does THX certification mean? Below is a blurb taken directly from the THX website describing it:     "THX is on the forefront of entertainment technology, offering products and services of unparalleled quality for post production, distribution and playback of audio and visual content. THX Certification is considered a mark of excellence in the presentation technology industry, offering consumers a promise that the cinemas they visit and the products they purchase have been evaluated and tested to meet the highest standards for picture and sound performance."      A digital signal is a digital signal.  This is fiber optic cable  it uses light to transmit the digital data  it doesn't degrade like analog based on the quality of the cable.  So these cables are NOT likely to give you a worse audio signal than more expensive cables, they just are going be a little less durable, and probably use slightly less high quality materials.  Are they fragile? Not at all, but the top of the line cable that I purchased was so thick that I probably could have stepped on it on cement and it would have been fine. This THX cable is thinner and I could imagine it breaking more easily.  If you work somewhere like a studio where there is a good chance of rolling things over the cables from time to time on a hard floor then you might have a good reason for a more durable cable.  Same goes for cables that are going to be manhandled regularly  i.e. a lot of plugging/unplugging and bending of the ends.  Overall, I'm very happy with these cables and can I afford to buy a bunch for all the fiber optic audio connections I am now using i.e. Receiver, TV, Cable Box, Xbox/Playstation/Gamecube  P.S. for first time users, don't forget to pull off the tiny plastic coverings on each end of the fiber optic cables.  These are there to protect the cable during transit/storage and will prevent the light from passing unless removed.  Throw these tips away; you'll never need them again. October 26, 2005    I bought two pairs of these when I saw them in a store on sale for under $15 each.  They've both gotten extensive use over the past couple years.  The cushioning on the outside is cloth inside a black material that I suppose imitates leather in looks and feel.  This outer material on the cushions has worn off in flakes on both pairs, which makes it look raggedy, but the comfort and sound quality isn't affected by it so I don't consider it a big deal.   The headband adjust on one side of one pair seems to have had something break inside it which lets that earmuff go farther down than it "should," but likewise, it's something to be expected with this much use and hasn't affected comfort.  The cable is also thicker than most headphone cables I'm used to, which is good news for people who find themselves constantly rolling over cables with their chairs and such.  I've compared the sound quality to the Koss QZ 50's which I own and a library's Koss UR 10's or 15's can't remember which.  Though the QZ 50's do sound better when they have their active noise cancelling feature turned on, the UR 20's are the most comfortable of the three, have the richest bass, are the most durable, and won't eat up your AAA batteries like the QZ 50's August 17, 2006    This laser version tracks much better on odd surfaces compared to the Logitech V200 I have.  The Setpoint software allows you to use Setpoint's mouse sensativity independent of the touchpad settings.  Finally!!!  I dont have to change mouse sensativities when I unplug it.  The Setpoint sensativity is an offset to window's sensativity setting for the touchpad.  So basically, set your touchpad sensativity first, then adjust the Setpoint sensativity.  They will be work just the way you want everytime you unplug/plug the mouse and going back and forth between touchpad and mouse.  Perfect product November 11, 2006    Excellent antenna.  Why pay so much more for other indoor antennas such as Terk or Samsung. I tried both of those but ended up with the Zenith at a fraction of the price and with much better reception September 28, 2005    Works well....Customer support from Garmin....more than excellent...One complaint..Very short battery life...Requires a 12 volt charging adapter...Windshield suction cup charge adapter is a must to use as a G.P.S....Also...Get a minimum 512 MB SD card for combo marine and street navigation....One plus is the brightness,unit size,and screen size....Do not keep it in your breast pocket while on the boat...Dont float..not waterproof..nuff said April 24, 2006    Very effective inside a plane comparing to the other noise cancelling headphone I have. Sound is ok for what it does. However, in a moving vehicle, it actually distorts the music which is a surprise. My other noise cancelling headphone does not do that. It appears to have a relative long lag time in creating the opposite noise cancelling wave. By the time the opposite wave applies to the music, the intruding noise is over. Otherwise, no complains August 31, 2006    First off, these puppies sound good! However, there are things anyone intending to buy these earphones should know:  The sound is loud and crisp but definetely mid trebley, as with most in ear headphones. The low end is there, but for full effect, it takes to position the earphones just so in your ear canal at the right volume. Since they tend to slide out of the ear canal as one moves, this sweet spot is not very wide. That said, however, I recognize the difficlulty of delivering earth shaking bass in a device this small. Most bass rich systems utilize either massive speakers/ woofers or chambered enclosures or both to deliver. Since the size of this type of headphones doesn't permit for either big speakers or special chambers, maybe the thing to do is to use the human cranium as the resonating chamber! I am yet to find any in ear headphones that really deliver bass to die for. Such is the difficulty to get big bass in so compact a package. Maybe the 5 and 7 series are better in this regard for the price they better be.  So if you really need earth shaking bass in your playback, look into buying those pricey phones.  The lack of such bass is the only reason  i didn't give it five stars.  Also, the lack of colored LEFT blue or white & RIGHT red tags on the earphones make it tricky to put on for the first time. I didn't realize I had them reversed until the pain got so unbearable I just had to check.  So be careful.  Riding while using them can be dangerous, since the sound isolation is so great one can barely hear jets thundering overhead.   Bang for the buck,  I paid $69.99 on amazon, I really recommend these headphones to all but big bass aficionados. October 2, 2006    I like this unit. It is hooked up to an S Video in from my Digital Cable Box, and uses a component video out to a Mitsubishi HDTV. Picture quality is very good; I'm very used to my high quality Sony DVD player DVP NS700P, but this one is very close. There is just a touch of graininess to the picture from the Cable box, but then I've not compared with other units. I think its more than acceptable. A DVD I burned played fine on the Sony..but...when I recorded one program, deleted it, and then recorded again, it would only play on an older Sony DVD player. My Sony DVD player is kind of touchy, anyhow.  All told, I'd recommend this DVD recorder without hesitation March 31, 2006    I got my mini about nine monthes ago right before they were discontinued which, in my opinion, was a big mistake on Apple's part and I absolutely love it! Mine is pink, and the color is so nice, the design sleek and seamless all around. It's smooth metal casing is really nice and different. The clickwheel is smooth and I have had no problems with it.  It holds a little less than 1,000 songs due to different formatting, but it's still a good amount; iTunes is easily understandable and functional as well. The ipod mini is approx. 1/2 of an inch think and slides into pockets easily, while not being as flimsy as the nano feels to me. The clickwheel is a great and fast way to scroll through hundreds of songs, raher than, as on my brother's mp3 player, needing to press "next" everytime you change the song. The backlight is fine, and does it's job; my one complaint on that would be that, as I mainly use it on the bus at 6:00 am, it is quite bright and hurts my eyes.  Another huge plus to owning a member of the ipiod "family" is the countless accesories that have become availible exclusively to them. I myself have a case, an iSkin which I have come to adore, high quality headphones and the iBass, which is another great speaker product for ipods. I've actually invested waay more on accessorites for my mini than it cost itself, but that's how much I love it!  For having so many great features, this is priced very reasonably. Even when I got it and it was $200, I still felt that it was well worth the money. BUY THIS NOW!!!! it's amazing!     January 20, 2006    The CD sound is like being at the concert. Hooking the radio up to a television makes the home theater experience even better. The  fm radio receiption is even clear. Great quality product. Worth the money August 8, 2005    I am a camcorder buff. Ever since my children were born, I have  had the camcorder attached to my hand most days because I know that life is fleeting and memories are too precious to be lost.  I had a huge collection of video tapes and was able to transfer the entire collection to DVD. Now I know that they will last at least through my life time.. Also, I find that using the Showbiz application, I can create customized DVDs for my friends and that has saved me a ton of money in gifts..  The only problem we had with this product was that we had limited hard disk memory and had to acquire some more.  And I have probably created more than a 100 DVDs by now.  Thanks HP! November 3, 2006    I use the drive to back up important data. I write a few GB to the drive each time. I was surprise by how fast data transfered onto the hard drive through the USB2.0 interface. It is quiet and I have no complain August 21, 2002    I stretched them till they fit comfortably on my wide head. They sound great to my ear and I use them alot January 10, 2005    Not a bad battery deal. While they don't last as long as some other batteries I've tried, their cost per battery more than makes up for it. For those that care about such things, they contain no mercury, no cadmium, and are made in China August 19, 2006    Wow, who would've thought that you could get such amazing products, at affordable prices.  The staff's friendly and responds quickly to any questions that you may have.  This is one amazing phone system Uniden TCX905, I forgot that it's a cordless.  October 28, 2006    The keyboard is good quality and the best product I could find for the price. I recommend if you are looking for a low profile keyboard w/numeric entry pad that takes a mimimum anount of desk space.  The keypad has the feel of a large notebook computer.  So makes a great docking station keyboard if you are used to the slim kepads on most modern laptop computers. February 25, 2006    I got this base and added 6 TCX805 handsets to it.  The whole setup works great.  I got this base because it supports bluetooth through to my cell phone.  That features works well, there's a slightly longer pause as it connects through to the cell phone but that's trivial.  I will say this, you need to keep your cell phone within about 20' of this base.  I just take mine off, turn on Bluetooth and it automagically pairs up with the base.  So if you want the cell dialing feature and like the more traditional upright handset, get this base and expand it with other handsets.  November 7, 2006    I had a Zen Vision:M but I returned it because I decided I didn't need quite that much storage capacity and the hard drive seemed to sputter and whirr too often and I wanted the peace of mind that comes with owning a flash player compared to a hard drive player, so I decided to go with the Zen V since it's interface is almost identical to that of the Zen Vision M'swhich I liked.  The first thing you will notice is the physical design.  Initially I wasn't that impressed, but it's really grown on me.  The height x width dimensions are comparitively much much smaller than the iPod nano.  You can actually wrap your entire hand around the device, and the soft finish feels very nice in your hand.  The second color that fills the seams of the player is a very nice touch as well.  The music is organized your standard Artist Album Song interface that is becoming quite a bit stale in my opinion. Still, it's as simple as you can get I suppose.  The device officially supports album art although it seems to be very hit or miss in that regard in my experience. The screen is vibrant and colorful but is very hard to see in bright sunlight.   The middle joystick is used for navigation and it works very well in that regard, although wedging your thumb underneath to move upward can be tricky sometimes and result in an accidental button push.  A dedicated volume control switch is found on the side and a hold switch on top.    The player syncs with WMP11 via USB connection.  Syncing it is a snap although I was not impressed with the transfer speeds. Also, if you sync the tracks on your player back to another computer, album art will not be attached to the music tracks.  If you are a newbie to buying MP3 players make note of the different sized models.  The 2GB model for instance advertises that it holds 1000 songs but these figures are theoretical maximums based on low quality files.  Most of my files are mid bit rate WMAs and I can fit about 500 songs on the player, half as much as advertised.    Summary:  Pros: Excellent physical design Easy to use interface Good navigation Great sound quality  Cons: On the go playlist creation is flawed Album art support hit or miss Slow transfer speeds from WMP11 Accesories rarely available in brick and mortar stores  Ultimately, I recommend the Zen V over the iPod nano mostly on the strength of it's vastly superior physical design.     August 9, 2006    I've owned these Altec's for over three years now, and I have yet to ever coming close to replacing them   as a matter of fact, when facing the decision of buying another set of speakers for a new computer, I went ahead and still purchased these babies!  SOUND QUALITY     the sound quality is very crisp and excellent overall   I have used mine for video editing, and I'm very pleased with how clear the dialogue audio has come through, in addition to the special effects sound   unless you need a five speaker system or comparable then I'm confident that this is the most crisp sound you'll find in any speaker  VOLUME     these suckers can get LOUD   just take my word for it  COMPATIBILITY     This is the part I love most   there is no software to install and no special plugs   the speakers plug right in, and very easily, into the audio jack, just like a pair of headphones would     thus, hooking in a computer, iPod, cd player, etc, is easy as heck, making these speakers extremely universal for any sound equipment  CONTROLS     the speaker system comes with a seperate remote, giving one access to adjust the volume, bass, and treble, all seperately from the computer's controls    the knob to control the volume, and other functions, is easy to use and makes for quick adjustments  SIZE     the speakers are extremely thin and the subwoofer is a very manageable size    placing these speakers is easy  PRICE     believe me   it's a bargain at under $200!!!  Overall, I give my full recommendation here    you'll love these speakers November 13, 2006    I decided to upgrade my laptop with the wpc54gs from the wpc54g.  I did this because the "g" card would randomly disconnect when the WEP or WPA security was activated.  Living in a home near about 6 other networks I really wanted the router and wireless network secured.  So, I purchased this card to see if it would fix my problem.  I can happily say it solved the random disconnect with WPA security turned on.  The range is just fine and all my network connections seem solid.  Have not had a disconnect yet, over the last 5 hours.  The reason I took away one star is the fact on the Wireless Network Monitor V2.1 there seems to be a flaw.  When I connect to the network and internet the monitor says it is hooked to the network but unable to find the internet.  Obvious by my submission of this review, the internet can be found and used.  All in all a good product that functions just fine in my A45 S121 Toshiba laptop.  Phil Mesa, AZ September 26, 2005    I had no problem with the product.  The directions were pretty simple.    Problem:  I never received my rebate information!!!  June 21, 2006    I bought this package purely for the keyboard. I wanted a new one with wireless technology and I was driven to Bluetooth just because it is so reliable. I do not use the keyboard and mouse together, however.  The keyboard is one of the most comfortable keyboards I've ever used. I am a computer programmer so having a nice keyboard is essential. The pad at the bottom is very comfortable and the keys are very well spaced and organized. The only real compliant is they cut some corners with the home, end, page up, page down, and delete keys. They moved them around from the conventional way which I still haven't gotten used to but it's fine.  I have experience no lag with either the mouse or the keyboard. I play a game called StepMania a sort of Dance Dance Revolution clone for PC which requires very accurate timing with the keyboard. I've experienced no problems here, it's spot on and probably the fastest ever. The only problem, really, is it takes a while to register if you haven't use the keyboard for a while since it must turn back on from sleep mode and reconnect. After that however, there are no problems at all.  I do not use the mouse with the keyboard. I decided to use it as a mouse with my iBook since it had built in bluetooth. I had absolutely no problems connecting the two devices and it works flawlessly. I don't use the mouse very much, but the times I do use it I experience no problems.  Both the range on the mouse and the keyboard are extremely nice. I can go anywhere in my room with either the mouse or keyboard and experience no problems.  The battery life on the keyboard is also very nice, esspecially since it has the built in sleep feature. I have had to replace the batteries once since I got the unit in January of 06 currently June of 06. I have not had to replace the mouse batteries yet, but I do not use it very much.  Others complained about not being able to use the keyboard in the BIOS or startup screens, but I haven't had any issues with that. It depends on how recent your motherboard is, and mine is relatively new so I had no problems.  I highly recommend this setup to anyone wanting a wireless keyboard or mouse, or if you want to split and use the mouse with a laptop and keyboard with a desktop. Either way, you cannot go wrong with this package, it is extremely excellent May 9, 2006    For a long time I was looking for a phone to use with skype.  For the price and convenience, Actiontec Internet phone wizard was the best I found and ordered it from Amazon $42.99 with free shipping.  After receiving the modem I have been using it for almost a month now and I am extremely happy.  I have connected my codeless phone to it and everything seems to be working fine November 8, 2006    Agree with the reviewer who called this a 'Perfect Product'.  It is.  a Take it out of box b Plug it in c You're networked  Elapsed time   approximate 15 seconds.  Compared to the pain I went through trying to get my SlingBox working with a Linksys game adapter, installing SlingLink renewed my faith in technology.  Awesome February 28, 2006    This is the Ultimate Ears Super fi model especially designed for "bassheads," featuring a disproportionately large bass driver complemented by a more conventional driver for the middle and high frequencies. I don't think UE would ever claim that what results is a balanced sound signature. Yes, the mids and highs are present and the quality is clean and reasonably detailed, but these frequencies are definitely recessed and with some kinds of music this can result in an unnatural kind of reproduction.  On the bright side, however, the bass reproduction is  marvelous. Not only is the quantity/extent of the bass frequencies as powerful as any headphones or earphones I've ever used, the quality is excellent. The bass is tight and pleasant, neither boomy nor thumpy. This overbalance toward bass frequencies renders the UE 5 EB's ideal for use when listening to music in which the bass is presented "front and center," including techno bass aka "car audio bass", drum n' bass, and many types of rap/hip hop. For music in which the basslines are prominent but comprise part of a more balanced presentation overall, opinions will vary. With rock music, for example, the strong bass is certainly a plus, but I have found that sometimes the bass overpowers the middle frequencies too strongly, and some detail is lost.  It should be noted that this bass dominated sound signature renders the EB's a good choice for people who own iPods and feel that their music player is weak on bass. Without any EQ adjustment, the iPod suddenly is transformed into a player where the bass is PRESENT.   In terms of build, the EB's superficially seem well constructed and designed. I have heard complaints, however, that the thinness of the wires and earpieces render them vulnerable to breakage. Be careful out there! Thoughtfully, EB has includes a variety of ear tips with these IEM's including foam, flanged, and plain so that users with different sized ear canals can get a good fit. The EB's don't extend deeply into the ear canal, which is a mixed blessing. On the one hand, this means that if you get a good fit of the earpiece into the entrance to the ear canal, comfort is good and isolation decent. However, if the fit is not quite right both comfort and isolation will prove frustrating. Making the right choice of ear tip is absolutely essential when using the EB's.  Oh, and some people think that the EB's look kind of strange when worn. Larger than the higher priced Super fi 5 Pro model, the EB's stick out a bit. Your call as to whether this is a problem.  Like all of the UE IEM's in this series, the EB's are packaged with a nice set of accessories, including a 1/4" adapter plug, a sound attenuator, a soft travel case, an earwax loop, and a silvery metal storage case which includes a winder that helps head off what is always a problem with IEM's, cord tangling.  It's unlikely that the EB's will prove satisfactory as your "everyday" earphone unless you listen solely to bass dominant types of music. The truth is, however, that even for bass heavy music the overall sound signature of the Super fi 5 Pros is likely to be more satisfactory for most users I own both. But as a second pair specifically for use with bass y music, the EB's are well designed and definitely fun September 16, 2004    I bought this for my kids computer when I bought a new one for hubby and myself... these speakers sound better then the more expensive ones I have....      I highly recommend these speaker August 19, 2006    For the price is is great. it's working fine but the plastic is not solid and has a feeling of low quality.  March 10, 2006    I'm a jogger, and like to listen to All Things Considered while I run miles and miles. This radio is great because the light weight is unobtrusive. It has a convenient "lock" button to prevent accidentally changing the station with a bump. I previously had a similar size unit from Aiwa, this Sony has MUCH MUCH better reception May 4, 2005    This stick is fantastic for high resolution photos and is lightning quick. Do you need the extra speed the MSX M1GN gives you? Maybe, maybe not. But at least you have it when and if you need the feature. Highly recommend it for the money.  August 5, 2006    Well, actually I bought this nice cable, at Amazon Marketplace great offering that it was, for an HDTV Tuner, which bombed in my neighborhood. So, I never did get to unpack the cable. But it's in the closet, and it knows it's a good cable. Great cable, @ great price, thru Amazon May 30, 2006    I have been using these fans for the stalls in our horse barn for years. It keeps the flies away and cools down the whole barn. The barn is dusty and the fans collect a lot of dirt. I wash them down each year and they are like new. The fans I have now are on their third barn year. In a normal house I'm sure they would last forever. They are a little noisy, but the horses don't care November 5, 2006    I actually bought this for a friend of my mine. He says 'Sony Never Disappoints' November 10, 2006    just enough space to save video, photo, music etc... all your files in one place and also is compatible with mac... i love it. January 4, 2003    This adapter is functional, is easy to use, enables continued use of backlight, and saves the batteries for walking with the eMap after arriving in a strange town. When I want to connect other media while driving with my  family, I use a 12v 3 Outlet Car Power Adapter. Despite another wire, it's a worthwhile accessory October 23, 2006    This has helped me significantly in drawing in the computer, for programs such as Adobe Illustrator, Adobe Photoshop and Macromedia Flash. Drawing with a mouse is like drawing with a brick   so buy this piece of equipment if you need to draw in the computer!  It also works well as an overall mouse for your computer. It even comes with a mouse if you prefer to use that instead of the pen. Plugs right into your USB drive and works almost instantly August 9, 2006    There are so many times where the actual ink, can be the difference between a good copy, and a not so good copy on paper. With HP black ink cartridge #21, it is very convient, and easy to setup into your HP deskjet 3930 series printer. This cartridge is very inexpensive, and affordable for HP printers. I think of it as a must for your HP printers. While there are cartridges that are difficult to open, and install into your printers, this one installs in a snap. I really recommend this for my new HP printer, and so will you if you own a HP printer for this ink as well.  Price: B  Convience: B  Overall: B 1/2 November 3, 2006    I had been storing my music on a 2GB card in my palm pilot. I was having a lot of trouble transferring the music, with many errors, not to mention how long it took to transfer. I finally decided to get an MP3 player. A friend kept telling me about the Sandisk Sanso. There were some great features, but the bad far, far outweighed the good. Too many of the same problems over and over, and many people returning them.  I got my Apple iPod last night and have hardly put it down! I did a lot of research first and was hard pressesd to find negative feedback about this item. This thing is great! I was up till 3AM listening to my music. The sound quality is so much better than I had expected!  I really like the case I got Tuffwrap Accent by XtremeMac  Walmart and Radio Shack because it is really tough rubber and all of the holes are in the right place for the new nano. The only thing is that the unit does not slide up into it completely because of the square corners of the nano. The case has more rounded corners in the top, so the nano does not line up just right in the case. It is good enough and you can still use the controls. It is only about a 1/4 of an inch at most. I am just picky about it lining up correctly so this is a bit annoying. But the case is still great as far as protection.  I also bought the Belkin TuneBase FM transmitter for the car. It is similar to the Monster version. I did not like the Belkin version at all. I ended up going and getting the Monster FM transmitter at Radio Shack. It works great! I like the fact that my Ipod lays in the console rather than sitting in a dock some of you may prefer the dock. I like that I can pick up the Ipod and use it sort of like a remote to the radio because I can operate it easily without looking down at the dock. I can even hold it while driving if I want to flip through the songs while driving rather than having to reach over to the dock. The sound of this transmitter is great. Some areas you might get a bit of static or station bleed through while driving, but this is minimal and is usually not a problem. I find this happened a lot less with Monster than with the Belkin. The Belkin had a nasty hiss over all of the songs.  People are talking about this unit not having a radio on it, but I find that I have so many favorite songs on it that I do not need a radio. When I do have a radio, all I do is channel surf for songs I like anyway. This way, I already have all the songs I like at my fingertips! I think these headphones really make this nano great! I was so surprised when I first heard this little unit play! For something so tiny, it rocks! I am really glad I followed my gut and went with this unit instead of dealing with frustration first by getting the Sanso. This new nano is a must have! April 30, 2005    After reading the Dec. '04 review in Computer Pilot I ordered it. Fine tuning is a bit involved but repetition makes the curve easier. Configuring from one a/c type throttle to another is easy with the downloadable manager from CH prod. Compared to the GoFlight modular system this is great value. Unless $$ is no object and you're not interested in building a home cockpit, the CH line of av sim controls is well suited to the aspiring and advaced flt. simmer February 8, 2001    I also ordered the Antec SX 1030 which has yet to be shipped! arrgghh!!. According to Antec, the 1030 includes 2 fans, but has space for 2 more, which is where this one comes in! For those of you wondering what size &quot;small&quot; is, it's an 80mm fan. Good airflow don't know actual CFM and pretty quiet September 13, 2006    When i first came across this particular microphone i had my doubts. Considering the price of it i just couldn't see it holding up for what i wanted to do. to my surprise this mic exceeded my expectations. For recording vocals this mic is amazing. a real professional sound for a extremely low price. i definitely recommend this mic to anyone out there looking for an in expensive way to make professional sounding material November 10, 2006    I bought this to scare away the opossums that come into my back porch at night. I used a 3 prong adapter with this to plug in a lamp and a radio. When they pass it, suddenly music and a light goes on and they scoot away fast. It is great to use if you want a lamp turned on when you walk in front of it, or anything else you want to use it for November 5, 2006    I wanted a case that was small, slim, and just carried the laptop.  Perfect!  I have a briefcase for files.  I didn't need anything bulky.  This case was exactly what I was looking for, for the right price.  I have a new Gateway Tablet P.C. and with the larger battery and battery placement, this is a snug fit, but at least I know the computer isn't loose inside.  I really like this case November 3, 2006    Besides all opion regarding this new calculator, I would like to say, it is very nice, good design, options, features, a huge screen and modern color. So far, I haven't navigate deep inside it, it is not similar as 48GX, so you've got to expend some time to know how to use it. I bought it since there is not a better calculator than this 48GX is UNIQUE but obsolete February 16, 2006    I decided to purchase this item because I needed to get SD memory for my g/friends digital camera, so I chose this one because of the price and the brand. SanDisk is known for their memory. Well, no need to say more, this thing works great. I will buy another one but with more space anyday. Thanks alot San Disk July 28, 2006    There is absolutely nothing that we don't like about these Panasonic phones.  The sound quality is excellent as is the range.  Very happy customers November 9, 2006    The cups of these heaphone are a little small and they do fit snuggly on my head but after stretching them out a bit I must say they are very comfortable. If you dont like them at first wear them for a while, they will grow on you. October 6, 2006    First and foremost  I am not an audiophile, so I can't comment with any authority on the quality of the headphones themselves.  They are fine for me and my listening habits  I find myself increasingly listening to podcasts when commuting via bus for which these headphones are perfectly fine, although when I do listen to my music the bass and treble response seems fine to me.  That being said, what I wanted was a convenient way to carry my 2G Nano so I could listen and manipulate the controls with the iPod handy yet out of the way.  This lanyard does an excellent job of providing that and I would recommend it to anyone.  So why four stars?  Well, for a few reasons:    Only available in white.  I have a black 2G 8GB Nano.  I'd have liked to match it.    No lock or release on the base that connects to the Nano.  While the connector does fit snug with the Nano and doesn't disconnect so easily from the Nano that I'd fear it might fall off while walking about, I would have felt more secure with some sort of lock or release mechanism holding it in place.  For this reason I would not recommend the lanyard to anyone doing any sort of strenuous activity or exercise  but hanging loose around the neck really isn't the best place for the Nano then anyway.  The armband would be more appropriate.    NOWHERE on the packaging did it say this was for the 2G Nano!  I had bought a 1G Nano lanyard at a local store and had to return it when I discovered it was incompatible the dock connector and headphone jack on the 1G and 2G Nanos are NOT the same distance apart.  When this 2G lanyard arrived, I could find nothing on the package that said "for 2G Nano", so I opened it very gingerly thinking I had received the wrong lanyard and would need to repackage it and send it back.  I was very relieved when it did fit!  Regardless, there should be a very clear "For 2G Nanos only!" label on the box to alleviate 2G Nano owners' fears and to warn 1G Nano owners.  All in all, I am very happy with the lanyard.  It keeps the Nano handy while leaving my hands free, and that was what I was looking for April 2, 2005    Having been a buyer of Sennheiser products for over 10 years, I feel it is time I endorse a product I truly believe in, and have never been let down by. Including service and customer satisfaction.  Each time buying a Sennheiser product, I found myself stepping up to the next level of their headphones, because they simply keep improving their technology to the point that what you used to own by them gets overwhelmed by the latest headphone they offer. When I bought the HD 600's, I had just come away from years owning the HD 25. When these encountered a technical problem, I replaced them with a backup choice, the HD 25SP's. The difference in sound going 'lower' down their scale of products was just too much to bear. So I bit the bullet and went higher.   Whether you use Sennheiser's merely for pleasure, or for studio work, the accuracy of their sound, and what you get for your money cannot be beat. My HD 600's ran into a small technical glitch and Sennheiser were extremely helpful in getting this fixed and replaced within 2 days of receipt, and I swear I nearly cried in their absence. HD 600's give you a clear idea of how things were recorded, how good your system is, and what truly sounds inferior. You never listen to things quite the same way again.  The reason my reviews of Paul McCartney and John Lennon albums from the 70's all comment on how inferior the recording quality is especially compared to the so called ''Economy Class Beatles'' George Harrison's and Ringo Starr's albums from the same decade, is down to what HD 600's reveal. My main source of media tends to be Vinyl, because Compact Discs and DVD's still cannot capture what analogue/turntable equipment captures. Vinyl is simply warmer and more 'round' in comparison to its digital counterparts. And when listening to badly recorded albums, HD 600's make you wonder if you spent more on your headphones than the artist did using a studio. HD 600's are the reason I mention time and time again you are not getting value for money when buying Lennon and McCartney solo albums. Listening to ''Take IT Away'' from 1982's Tug Of War reveals an annoying tape hiss coming from the left side of the stereofield. Which sounds much like someone forgot to 'silence' a track that had a recording on it, before the instrument actually showed up in the song. It sounds totally like electrical / amp noise coming from equipment, and Geoff Emerick or George Martin just simply forgot to keep this track silent until the instrument that occupied that track appeared in the song.   It gets much worse than 'Take It Away' on Paul McCartney albums, and even more painfully so on John Lennon albums. But listening pleasure can be found recording wise on their solo albums BACK TO THE EGG, RAM, DOUBLE FANTASY, MILK AND HONEY, and some portions of BAND ON THE RUN, and WALLS AND BRIDGES. #9 Dream is simply a gorgeous recording, it's just too bad the rest of the album doesn't sound as good as that one song.  When you listen to your CD's, vinyl, DVD's in whatever room of your house your speakers are, the room dictates what you hear, no matter what you've spent on speakers, power amps, woofers, sub dividers, etc. Whether you have wall to wall carpeting, high ceilings, low ceilings, plaster or cement, wood floors, a more long than wide room, it all affects how sound reaches your ear. Which is why on a great set of headphones, you are more likely to hear HOW those sounds were meant to be heard, how they were recorded, and how much time was spent doing it. On speakers, McCartney's JET sounds quite full, though the snare is a little thin. But when hearing the album with HD 600's, the drums nearly become non existent, and all the inconsistencies of the recording become so apparent, you wonder if the mix was sabotaged by someone. McCartney on drums is not a miracle, especially when you hear many of the mistakes being made by someone not as confident on that instrument as they are on Bass.   Can I review anything without bringing up Lennon and McCartney? Quite possibly Dog Food. But so far, they come up pretty regularly. Makes you wonder if I'm trying to prove a point doesn't it.  Albums that are phenomenally recorded get due justice with Sennhesier HD 600's. They truly do. Some noteworthy recordings from the 70's and 80's when recording technology for popular music was just beginning to reach new highs, that are all HD 600 friendly:  Isao Tomita's The Firebird 1976 George Harrison's eponymous album 1979 Steely Dan's Gaucho 1980 Joe Walsh's The Smoker You Drink, The Player You Get 1973 10CC's The Original Soundtrack 1975 Godley & Creme's Consequences 1977 Supertramp's Crime of the Century 1974 XTC's Black Sea 1980 Peter Gabriel's 3rd album 1980 Kate Bush's The Dreaming 1982 Earth Wind and Fire's All 'n' All 1977 Level 42's The Pursuit of Accidents 1982 Billy Cobham's Spectrum 1972 Frank Zappa's One Size Fits All 1975 Ringo Starr's Goodnight Vienna 1974  and a truly incredible sounding album from the 90's, Prince and The New Power Generation's ''Symbol'' album from 1992.  Albums NOT HD 600 friendly: Todd Rundgren's Hermit of Mink Hollow 1978 Blue Oyster Cult's Agents of Fortune 1976 Paul McCartney's Venus and Mars 1975   and quite a few others John Lennon's Imagine 1971   and avoid 1970's Instant Karma like the plague, the piano track will hurt you . .   Yes's Fragile often the guitars and keyboards hit frequencies that cause a lot of crackling and clipping  and surprisingly enough, many remasters of albums once on vinyl or antiquated CD reveal the errors of fixing something that ain't broken.     If you have to save up for a pair, or do some heavy searching for HD 600's that are affordable, do so. In over 10 years I have never been disappointed by anything Sennheiser distributed, especially when I kept up with their pace.    November 3, 2006    This is the same cartridge I can purchase elsewhere, but cheaper.  It works well in our printer with no issues whatsoever and my HP printer prints fantastic photos when I use HP ink and HP premium photo paper November 13, 2006    This is my first time ever buying a really expensive MP3 player.  I bought it three weeks ago.  If I hadn't seen the Creative Zen Vision:M, I probably would have bought the Sandisk Sansa E260.  I love being able to bring my cartoon/tv shows over to a friends house so we can watch them on the tv.  There is one problem I've had with it.  I'm not sure if anyone else has had this, but there is some slight static noise that happens once in a while when I'm listening to music.  I don't think it's the MP3s, because I've never ran into the problem with my other MP3 players.  If only they would've added the video cable for the TV and kept the charger, then I would've rated it a 5 November 6, 2006    I bought this recorder to use as backup for real time event video recording.  I have also used it concert settings.  The record quality is astounding, full range of dynamics, using both the stereo mini plug input and the 1/4" inputs.  It is mostly being used now to plug into sound boards to record long event audio.  First thing I did was to upgrade to a 4GB Compactflash card.  The provided card is too limited.  Battery life is adequate for hour plus recordings, and connection and downloading to PC is a breeze.  The WAV files are really high quality.  It all works as advertised.  The only minor glitch I have had, is that when you first try to start a recording, it gives a "media full" message, even tho the media is empty.  Then you select record again and it records just fine.  I went several iterations with Tech Support, who were very friendly and helpful, but the problem has not been resolved.  I also suspect the 3rd part flash card may be contributing to this glitch.  I would buy this recorder again November 9, 2006    I must say Moster XP speaker wire makes a huge sound inprovement on mt 6.1 home theater setup my side and rear channels are so clear and crisp . I have these runing threw my walls and ceiling and the intall was a brezz do the jacket by these cables you will love them for your surond speakers Wayne mn September 14, 2006    Needed better protection than my $10 surge protector for my HT setup now that I have a couple DVRs & a plasma.  Filtering would be a nice side benefit too.  Very little $$ more than the power strip design units I was looking at & now I see it dropped even lower!.  Pros: Build quality, fit & finish, plenty of outlets & diversity of outlets for me, nice form factor compared to power strip design, cool looking LEDs & meter.  Cons: Those cool looking LEDs cannot be dimmed & are too bright esp the blue one! if facing HT viewers.  I just blocked the LEDs w/a black card.  CABLE/SAT cable filtering no good for my digital cable provider Cablevision... Caused more artifacts on HD channels, so couldn't use the cable line filter.  Bottom line: Seems a great deal esp at the new even lower pricing @ Amazon October 22, 2001    I wasnt sure how these Iron Ons would work since one of the ratings on them was negative. But I just did a practice iron on on my daughters shirts. It was so easy and they peeled off very well. My girls love their shirts with their own pictures on them. These are a great buy and worth their money July 3, 2006    I chose these by reading other reviews on Amazon.  I am pleased with them and recommend them. Good sound, light weight.  The best feature is that they do NOT leak sound yet you can still hear loud noises around you.  This is perfect for an ipod using NYC subway rider.   Don't want to annoy others by leaking sound, but you have to be able to hear if there is exterior noise, at least enough to know to turn down the sound and find out what's going on.  Only con   Once you lose or wear out the removable spongy pieces I'm not sure where you can get replacements September 27, 2006    I saw the other reviews and was hoping I would have the same experience as the happy reviewers. Well, I got the cam and it was easy to install like they say. It just takes a little tinkering, with the PC options before you use it. With the mic and software it comes with, you get a lot for your money! If I bought a cam in the store, I would have been mad to lose out on this PC camera. It is SWEET March 15, 2001    These cables are super with my new DVD player. There is absolutely no interference from my other home theater equipment. The picture is soo clear, and vivid. The cables themselves are really made well, they could hold up 100 pounds of weight no doubt. If you get these Monster cables you won't be sorry June 9, 2006    I'm really happy with this purchase. I was worried that it would not work with Rhapsody which is the media player I use the most, but it proved to work well with it. In fact, it works with all the media player I've thrown at it, including Windows Media Player, MediaLife, RealPlayer, iTunes, Rhapsody, DivX Player, WinDVD, and PowerDVD.   All the buttons are functional and I worship functionality   hence the 5 stars, although Firefox users have to deal with extra configuration steps to make the back and forward button work. No biggies, though, since setting up is really easy. Basically all you have to do is open the SetPoint software that was installed with the driver, point to the intended buttons that you want to program, and assign a corresponding keystroke to it. In this case, it's AltRight for forward button and AltLeft for back button. Click "Apply" and you're good to go a browsin'!!  Battery life so far is really good   it's been going on the same set of Duracell AA batteries since I got it 3 months ago, and still going strong.   The RF range is really good, although admittedly my room isn't big enough to really put its range to the test. Dorm dweller users should be happy with the range, though. You could just lie on your bed and only lift one finger to control your music or movie.  This mouse is also great looking; not cheap plasticky but actually sharp and slick. It does feel a bit odd to the grip when using as a remote control, but as a mouse it's really sturdy and ergonomic.   I can't comment on installation since it's been a while since I first used it, but I guess no impression is good impression   if it was troublesome I'm sure I'd remember.  I'd second the other reviewer's gripe about how most cordless keyboards come with a mouse, and this fantastic mouse doesn't come with a cordless keyboard... But it's a great buy, all in all January 31, 2006    I received it today, and it's a monster.  If you've seen one in a store, it looks twice as big on your desk.  Until a few hours ago, I was running two 20" aluminum cinema displays on a PNY 6600GT.  After doing online research about using the 30" display under Windows XP, I found that the "functional" cheap solution being used is in fact the PNY 6600GT Verto 128MB DDR3 with two DVI connectors.  Considering that the other two most noted solutions, QuadroFX 4000 AGP or Parhelia DL256 PCI, are going for $600 on ebay, I was willing to give my old beater a try.  Besides, I didn't feel like buying another AGP card with PCIE taking over the world, or sacrificing the only PCI slot in my Shuttle XPC SB75G2.  To my great relief, the monitor worked on the card right away, even showing me the POST and Windows start up screen it did for the 20" displays, too.  But to my absolute delight, the card is actually running both the 30" and a 20" in 32 bit color.  The 20" looks absurdly small next to the 30", like I didn't water it enough or something.  The 30" is enormous enough that I think it might be better were it curved!  Maybe I'm just sitting too close.  The only problem with the 6600GT is that the DVI jacks are so near each other that I had to take the plastic housing off of the 20" plug to fit it below the 30".  I'm not a gamer, so I can't say whether the card performs well for that.  It feels as zippy as with the 20" on regular windowing tasks.  I use Eclipse, Flash, Photoshop, etc., but no video editing or 3D stuff.  The screen had a slight warm cast that I didn't like.  Nvidia's control panel let me adjust it manually, and now my 30" and 20" look almost identical.  My biggest fear was of course dead pixels.  By the good grace of lucky ducks, this is the third panel I've gotten from Apple with no dead pixels.  Brightness is uniform but for a very very subtle drop in the far lower left and right edges.  It's not apparent unless you put white there and actively look for it.  In any case, I bought it to get more programming panels on the screen at once, and it does a fine job at that.  I'm using the 20" for browsing and, alas, a few panels that STILL don't fit.  Apple, where's 3840 x 2400??  I strip one star cuz it's crazy expensive. August 24, 2006    If you understand this product's limits before you buy it, you'll be happy.  It shows topographical contours, rivers and most streams for the entire United States.  In addition to that, it shows roads that were in existance 10 20 years ago.  These major roads are also named.  The limit is that newer roads don't show up.  It also doesn't support auto routing, even if your GPS does.  Garmin sells other products that are tailored for road navigation but you have to do some independant research or logical deduction to figure out that this package isn't suited for it.  The product support could be better.  Neither the manual nor web site tell you how to load all 3 CDs on your computer so you don't have to swap CDs when transitioning between zones.  The company's web site doesn't give a good explanation of what the software can and can't do.  You'll be disappointed if your expectations aren't grounded in reality.  Garmin could help alleviate this problem by making this information readily available November 4, 2006    This is my first mp3 player so I researched it carefully before making my decision. The gorgeous screen, the wide number of codecs it supports and the 30gb hard drive were all selling points. I'm so glad I bought it. Videos look great on the screen. Some need to be converted over which is a slow process but in general I love it. The built in speaker doesn't do it justice. Even on the included earbuds the sounds quality is amazing. Making playlists with the creative software is very easy. My biggest problem is the lag of accessories for it. No case, no screen protectors out for it. I'd love to see a docking station that lets you record to it as a dvr the way the archos players do. But for the money it looks to me to be a far superior player to the Ipod or the Zune. April 18, 2006    I did a lot of research on Amazon.com before I finally decided on this mouse.  I wanted to replace my extremely small Kensington USB mouse with a retractable cable.  At home, I use a Wacom tablet.  Next month I am traveling abroad, so I wanted a slightly bigger mouse that can handle more frequent use than the Kensington.  Wireless was key for portability.  I also wanted something rechargeable, and I didn't want the USB adapter sticking out.  I received it today, and I'm on my first charge.  So no comments on batteries which can be replaced with other AAA NiMH for optimal performance if desired anyway.    I have large but skinny hands.  Mouse is small, but its long length helps in terms of where to place your fingers.  Of course convenience is not comparable to a full size mouse, but if you want portability, this is about the right size.    I have a PowerBook that runs Tiger 10.4.  Excellent Bluetooth connection.  Also very good response, very little delay.  Only reservation is for the scroll wheel, which requires subtle pressure for accurate scrolling   this is ever so slightly uncomfortable if you have large hands, because the mouse is flat and your hand is adjusted over the mouse so that it is a bit hard to apply adequate vertical pressure on the scroll wheel from that position.  It is hard to explain, but not a big issue for me.     USB charger works well.  The added size of the USB adapter helps with comfortability still flat, but becomes an otherwise full sized mouse   despite the fact that the cable attaches to the bottom of the mouse.    As mentioned by others, installing the batteries is a challenge.  Pull the notch on the bottom of the mouse as you slide the top part with the Anycom label away from the clickers.  Once I figured it out, not so hard.   Overall, I don't seek perfection anyway, so this mouse does the job adequately for me.  I haven't tried any other Bluetooth mouse before, so I'm more or less in awe June 25, 2003    I've used this card for a while now and i'd say that i like it overall. the power usage is great. the drivers have been vastly improved and now you are able to scan for networks. Those of you who are interested in wardriving should look elsewhere. If you want to use netstumbler or pocketwarrior in windows or kismet and airsnort in linux, either go for the linksys wcf12 prism based or lucent orinoco based pcmcia card. if you're looking to run just 802.11b and check email, stream music, browse the web, etc, this card will be perfect plus it'll save you some battery power July 8, 2006    The sound is fine, but the mic is not so good, too much background noise. The headset is quite "loose" but it's ok when you get used to it. August 31, 2006    I opened it, I put it in my PSP and that was it. I had plenty of space on the memory stick and I personally didn't have to do any special formatting I just popped it in and that was it.  I did want to add, buy this online because in my comparison shopping it was much more expensive in brick and morter stores I visited March 1, 2006    The Microsoft optical wheel mouse is a great product. It is worth every penny of the purchase price. A great value! It is so much better than my old mouse with the ball in it. The optical wheel mouse is much more accurate too. The best purchase I ever made September 12, 2006    This amplifier works as stated.  Increased my modem downstream from  7 to 9.  No obvious loss of noise ratio and upstream signals.  All TV channels are much sharper!  The cables came with the amplifier are two RG59 cable lines.  For minimum loss of broadband signals, I suggest you replace one of them with R6 cable to carry the cable signals.  Use the RG59 for the power supply only May 13, 2006    There's no need to take anybody else's word for specs on this Sony DVD player when you can view or download, for free, the user's manual at http://esupport.sony.com/US/perl/model documents.pl?mdl=DVPNS90V&LOC=3. I've been running this Sony DVP NS90V player through a Sony widescreen HDTV and a Pioneer amplifier/receiver for several days now, and I find almost none of the problems and limitations mentioned by previous reviewers. One, for example, states that there is "no bass management," yet you can a route more or less signal to the subwoofer by selecting "small" or "large" for the front speaker size see page 76 of the user's manual, and also b increase or decrease the bass from  15 dB to 5 dB see page 77 of the manual. Whether you prefer analog to digital audio, or you think SACD's are tops, is a matter of opinion, taste and choice and not an objective evaluation of a playback unit. I, for one, prefer DVD Audio, and I mention this for an important reason: Some product ads and the user's manual clearly warn that this unit "will NOT play DVD Audio discs." Happy surprize: it most certainly will! For my DVD A's that have optional Dolby 5.1 and/or DTS tracks, the player simply ignores the primary DVD A format normally output via the 6 analog cable connectors but still plays the Dolby or the DTS via the digital audio optical or coaxial connectors. For "pure" DVD A's without Dolby 5.1 or DTS tracks, it conveniently outputs the audio BOTH via the 6 analog AND the digital connectors. And in all cases above, the audio is full multi channel surround, and not downmixed to 2 channel PCM, nor Prologic pseudo surround. The only DVD A function it lacks is the video slideshow often included on DVD A's, and so displays only the "jacket image" onscreen. The Quick Setup allows any DVD newbie to be up and running in a short time. And the Custom Setup is so detailed with so many fine tweaks and trouble shooters that it's bound to please even the high end audio video geek freaks. In short, you'll find this to be a superior universal player, provided you read the user's manual all 84 pages of it!, follow it, and connect equally high quality, compatible equipment capable of exploiting its many fine features June 2, 2006    I've had my Epson 1280 for over two years now and consider it money well spent. I run exclusively on Linux currently Gentoo and the Linux support for this printer using CUPS is superb. All modes, resolutions, etc. are supported. I use this printer a lot for engineering work printing B size tabloid drawings and it works great for that.  Like just about every review states, this printer slurps ink like Homer Simpson slurps beer. Because I don't print many color photos this is not a problem for me  if I was doing that I'd get the Niagara system other reviewers cite. I've researched the Niagara system and  it looks like a good deal for heavy users.   My main complaint with this printer  and the reason why it only gets four stars  is the ease with which the heads clog up. This printer wants to be used constantly. If you let it sit for a day or two it's almost guaranteed that one or more of the jets will clog up and you'll get streaks in the output. Then you have to either press the front panel control or, in more extreme cases, run the head unclogging utility on Linux I use mtink to force the printer to 'blow out' the plugged jets. When the printer does this it blasts ink through the heads wasting even more of the pricey ink. Do this enough and the reservoir the printer blasts the ink into a sponge sandpaper like thing will overflow and cause the head to smear ink all over the paper. That's when you get out the Windex and paper towels and clean up the mess google the web for details. Because of this 'trait' I would not recommend this printer for casual users.  Still, for B sized printing and high quality photos, and considering how well supported it is under Linux, there's not much else better out there March 17, 2006    The Sennheiser HD 205 is great value for money.  The design is not only comfortable, but takes out a lot of ambient noise.  This headphone does not have active noise reduction but does a good job with its closed design headphone.  The right side is able to swivel backwards, so you can answer a phone call and not need to remove the whole headphone.  This swivel was designed for DJ's to do sound mixing, but works well for other purposes as well.  I also like its strong bass and great clarity, where I could hear sounds in music that I did not hear before.  This headphones not only works well for music, but does great with your favourite action movie.  You will hear how close the sound is, and have bullets whizzing past you and swords meeting like they are just around you.  Below are the technical specifications:  Acounstic principle: Dynamic, closed Ear coupling: Supra aural Frequency response: 14 20,000 Hz Max SPL at 1kHz, 1 Vrms: 112 dB THD at 1kHz, 100 dB SPL: &lt; 0.5% Impedance: 32 Ohms Weight without cable: 206 g Singnal cable: 3 m copper cable OFC, single sided Connector/adapter: 3.5 mm stereo jack with 6.3 mm adapter  This headphones comes with a 2 year warranty and a protective pouch for the headphones October 16, 2006    What a wonderful surprize.  It took about ten minutes to install them to my HP Media center computer.  They replace speakers that came with my 19" monitor which were lousy to say the least. speaker make with held But the vs 4121s surpassed all my expectations.  While I am not an audiophile, I do admire and expect good faithful sound reproduction and these speakers more than do the job.  I don't understand how the more expensive ones can do any better.  Suffice to say I am completely satsfied and would highly recommend them to anyone looking for their moneys worth June 30, 2006    Earlier this week I received the factory referbished Samsung HD841.  I have had a few days to use it and compare it to my other players, mainly my Philips 642, which have been excellent players for me. This Model does well.  I don't understand why this model has such a rough reveiw.  Note, this model has the DVI output, If your TV has an HDMI port, you will want to check out the Samsung HD 850 identical otherwise.  First, this model has component, composite and S video hook ups, as well as the DVI port still have to run seperate sound out with DVI. Also, this model does feature digital coax sound out and optical sound out as well for systems that can handle 5.1 THX.  Many upconvert models do not have the digital outs on lower priced models. The picture quality is great, at 480p comparable with my Philips.  Again, The upconvert works well out the DVI hook up to my TV, but to be honest, it is hard to tell any difference between it and a good 480p progressive scan player, at least on my tv which is a 23" 720p LCD.  Menus also are a bit difficult to figure out at first as well.  The user manual is less than impressive at explaining thing, in fact, it does not have an index.  But, it the main thing is that the player is does perform well, and is a name brand product from samsung I have had some offbrand experience and have had perfomace problems.  THis player also appears to have DivX available on it, not noted in the product discription, so that was a suprise as well.  This will allow the use of MP4 movie files.  The remote again is bigger and at first more difficult than my other players, but after a day or so it actually is better because many of the features are available to change at the push of a button instread of going through the menus.  In all, I will continue to explore this new player, but in all it seems to be a quality product that has received some bad flack.  So give it a chane, the prices are good currently, quality has been good, and it is a Samsung. Note to the technosavy: I have not had luck using the component upconvert code that is available on other web sites, so I am using my DVI input for upconvert.  Also, the new Blue ray HD 1080p DVD players are out, so if you have the expensive hi res tvs that can handle this, you might want to wait and save till you can get the new DVD players.   Note 2: the factory referbished models come with a DVI cable, a 20 30 dollar value that many don't come with July 29, 2005    This unit works very well and we are very pleased with it. Nice construction, good sound quality on both ends. We're concerned about battery life as in # of recharges before performance decreases, but no indication right now that is an issue. I would have give the product 5 stars if it had been cheaper. This class of device is overpriced in general. Amazon's price was very good, but overall still seems over priced. I would definately buy another from Amazon as these are 25% more at other places. March 15, 2006    A super picture with this cable!  For the price, you've got to try this before spending hundreds of dollars on others.  I give it 2 thumbs up November 20, 2004    I didn't buy this on Amazon but wanted to say this device is great. The only bad thing was MY laptop is old!  Can't go wrong with this one July 31, 2006    I've been using SBL soundcards for about 3 years. I use it for recording live and with sound fonts.  This usb device is easy to set up and the sound quality is great!  One installation tip.  Initially after I connected it and installed the software, I was not getting any sound, although the software was installed successfully.  I rebooted, and everything was detected and has worked fine since.  So just remember to reboot after installation.  July 18, 2006    I purchased the Monster Cable MP HTS 1000 without reading the reviews,which I don't usually do for the simple reason of where I purchased my hdtv, Samsung HLS 5687w they were trying to sell me but for a $150, which was too much.  I plugged in my equipment to the monster and at first there was no picture only sound.  I have directv and they have a connection which allows you to receive digital and analog signals through the same cable.  That connection needs to be placed after the monster in the connection loop.  After switching around the cables I had a picture again.  I can't really see an improvement in the picture quality HD is beautiful I bought the monster basically for the protection November 16, 2006    First time I heard these I was floored by the output.  Nice high, mid and low bass sounds no matter what you have going thru them be it music, games or movies.  Definately worth the low low price...  First person WWII shooter games like Call of Duty sound awesome with these speaker March 3, 2006    This is the best lock you can find for laptops, but I am still not very confident with it. It looks flimpsy but better than others November 9, 2006    Soundwise the Klipsch Promedia Ultra 5.1s were everything that they were supposed to be.  The bass is very powerful and can even be overpowering if not adjusted.  The sound is crystal clear and with a decent sound card all of the settings can be tweaked until perfection.  Setup was a breeze and no instructions are needed although they are provided just in case.  Something to note is the speaker wire that comes with the speakers is a little on the small size and thicker wires should be be purchased if you are picky about your sound.  The wires themselves are long enough and there shouldn't be any trouble reaching anywhere assuming you are putting these in a normal sized room.  One last thing to know is that there is no optical input for these speakers and only 1/8" plugs for hooking up the sound source.  If you want optical you're going to have to go elsewhere.  Please note that buying these speakers will not make up for having a mediocre sound card or poor music quality.  If you are using most types of on board sound or an ancient soundblaster card it is time to upgrade or else you are just throwing away your money.  Same goes for music quality, if you are listening to an mp3 that is below 128kbps the poor sound quality is because of the shoddy encoding, not the speakers.  If you can't spare the hard drive space for 192kbps its time to get a new hard drive.  Overall these speakers are a great deal.  While the price tag does seem a bit steep it is well worth the money for anyone that is serious about their music or movies.  For those of you who like to game these speakers will treat you good, however in my past experience a good set of headphones is better than a full blown sound system.  Lastly for those of you who like to play your music and bass full blast, don't bother spending the money.  These speakers should only be purchased by people who actually care about sound quality.  If you are more worried about loudness, do yourself a favor and buy some cheaper speakers, you won't even notice the difference March 24, 2006    I had to 'fix' this ipod holder with a bicycle hand grip to stop it from shaking my ipod. I have a decent car and the roads are just ok but this thing shakes and shakes. I also put one of those beer coolers around the base of the foam hand grip and its now rock solid. Oh yeah and it holds the ipod just right too. I also put some of those velcro dots on the bottom for a little more security from my cup holder November 9, 2006    I have owned many Sony cameras in the past and am currently using two right now. The only problem I have encountered with any digital camera is that when you think you have enough memory, you run out when you need it most. That is why I upgraded all of my cameras from 256 and 512 meg memory sticks to the Sony 1 gig. Actually I carry a spare 1 gig too where ever I go.   Look, when you take video with your digital camera or you use a high file size 3 6 megapixels per picture, which you should always do to get the best possible prints made, your camera will need a ton of storage space.  Especially if you are on vacation or encounter a great photo moment or maybe even something you hadn't expected like a wildfire, a plane crash, a bank robbery or maybe even a cat in the park having kittens. You can always "resize" you photos to a smaller size later when you save then to your computer if you want to save space. Trust me, take large megapixel pics now and you will be amazed at how many shots came out better that you expected.  You never know. I have tons of pictures that people ask how did I ever get such good pictures of such amazing things. I have a helicopter crash, police car up a power poll, deer in downtown Oakland, house fire before the Fire Dept got there, tons of wild animals, any many more things I saw while I was driving somewhere or walking in a park. If you want great photos you have to be prepared when the moment arrives!  Matching a camera with its name brand memory is also a great idea. No problems ever!! The Sony memory sticks I have from 5 to 6 years ago still work great with no problems. They make it fast and easy to transfer data from your camera to your computer. They are tiny wafer thin and extremely light weight and durable. I have first hand knowledge that products with the SONY name on it are first rate and high quality. If you want quality buy SONY August 31, 2006    Works precisely as advertised.  None of the complaints in previous reviews hold for my experience. Specifically, battery backup works and sound quality of messages is excellent. Only negative: too many words spoken by the machine and they sometimes seem to overlap November 5, 2006    We received our DLP TV stand in record time.  We had wanted to get it for a new tv that was being delivered that weekend.  We ordered on I think a Tuesday and it was at our office on Friday.  It was in excellent shape and we had no trouble putting it together.  The tv fit perfectly!  August 8, 2006    Just spent the weekend photographing and video recording lots of activity and didn't even get close to capacity. This is fantastic August 2, 2001    I purchased a Sony WEGA 27 inch tv. I took advantage of it's rear component input labeled video4.  I connected my Sony DVP360 Dvd player.  With dvd viewing, the movie Dinosaur, Bug's Life, Toy Story 1 and 2, and Vegas Vacation, the colors were very vibrant, details were dynamic, and the picture quality was very accurate in at least 480 lines of resolution. I have viewed these same movies on larger screen HDTV's such as the Pioneer Elite and was disappointed??? Glass picture tubes provide a more realistic picture. I can't imagine that I can do any better for my television than these cables.  I am completely happy with dvd movie watching on my Sony WEGA with these Monster component 3 cables August 3, 2006    The product was easy to load onto my Windows based computer using Windows XP.  I connected everything as instructed and as soon as I plugged in the TV cable to the back of the modem, My internet explorer picked up the signal and put me at the log in page for new accounts of my cable provider.    The modem comes with both a USB and 100T ethernet adapter port, so use whatever way works best for you.  I tried them both and they appear to work at the same speed.  I am guessing it all depends on the speeds your cable provide is delivering.  Amazon had the best price on the product if you have the time to wait for their free shipping.  I ordered some stuff from them in the past and the free shipping seemed to take forever.  You may want to factor in paying the additional cost for shipping when buying this product if you need it right away. The price, even with the additional shipping charge is still a little less expensive than Best Buy.  The cost difference between buying it at a Best Buy store and Amazon online will not be much, and you'll have to wait a few days to have it in your hands, but you get to avoid the drive to the store.  I went this route, paid the extra shipping and waited for my package to arrive.  If time is not an issue, then use the free shipping method and you will discover that Amazons Price can't be beat, it is the lowest price anywhere.  March 8, 2006    Short review: Have burned about twenty disks, all work perfectly. Have made home dvds out of them, all work in three different regular dvd players that I've tried. Very satisfied with them November 9, 2006    I am satisfied by the purchase of this Targus CVR600 15.4 Groove Notebook Backpack since it is super wide, comfortable and with many compartments to keep objects  apart of the laptop. I recommend it to you April 13, 2005    I got one of these a few years ago.  It's been to several countries, on camping trips, bicycle trips, subways, etc etc and held together very well.  I pop this and the handspring into my pocket and off I go, not lugging around a huge laptop anymore.  The typing is comfortable, this is just like a laptop keyboard, and while I too have worried about the little popup part where you connect the handspring, it's taken a beating so far.  I'm buying another preemptively because I'll be so bummed when I do eventually manage to break the current one.  The hinge in the middle is annoying   you have to put the thing on a book or other flat surface to hold it in your lap.  I think that when the new one comes, I'll try to create some kind of deadbolt mechanism to hold the middle hinge when it's open and then it will be the single most perfect gadget ever March 9, 2006    It says the keyboard is supposed to be easier and more comfortable to type with. I don't think it is that comfortable. It's a little hard getting used to, so be prepared to hit the backspace a couple of times. The keyboard is 100mA and uses USB connection. There is a USB to PS/2 converter included. Overall, it is an ok product for the money, as it is the cheapest USB keyboard I've found October 24, 2005    I have this card for a week, and what I can tell you is that this card has a quality that I've never heard from any sound card   the sound is so clean, balanced and accurrate. of coure, you will need a good set of spekaers. the CMSS surround is much better than Dolby Prologic 2 and DTS neo 6 for both music and movies. if you plan to connect the DIN cable for Integrated speakers control with the Megaworks or Gigaworks, you should know that it's not working, but Creative is going to add support for those speakers in the following drivers. I didn't like the new 24 bit Crystalizer sound, but belive me you will not need that feature, just use good mp3 player like Winamp 5 MAD mp3 decoder plug and ASIO plug for the output. I had many sound card like the Audigy 2 , Audigy 2 ZS, Audigy 4 Pro, ESI Juli@, M audio Revolution... and none of theme even close to this card!!! worth every $$$!!!! I recommend you buying from amazon beacuse of thier great service and warrnty, I could't do that because I am outside USA November 9, 2006    I bought this to replace an Epsom printer that refused to print accurate color, and an old Canon scanner. I am very, very pleased! It looks terrific my daughter said, "Wow, cool new printer!". Set up was easy. And the printing is fast and absolutely beautiful, even in draft mode. Better yet, the cartridges are much cheaper than my Epson ones. Scanning is easy and good, too. I don't use fax, so can't rate that function.  Overall, I am thrilled with this printer. It was well worth the $180 December 30, 2005    I got the newer model of these, with the blue light on the speakers . All I can say is that these speakers are worth the money. You get what you pay for. These speakers have pretty good highs in them, bass wise there decent. They hit alright, and sub decent. You pay more money, you get a better system you know. This system here isn't much money, so it isn't going to be the best. So there isn't no reason for the bad reviews. I think they work really good for the price their tagged at. So if your looking for a system with some good highs, and decent bass these are for you September 18, 2002    This TV weighs a ton, took three adult males to pick it up off of the floor and load it into an entertainment armoire. I have owned several Sony TVs and really thought hard about this purchase because of firmware issues that I have had with a 27&quot; Sony. Mainly compared this model with the corresponding Panasonic Tau, absolutely hated the Tau remote and am very familiar with the Sony. Note that the remote was not the deciding criteria, but it was a consideration. I have no real complaints about this TV, the menu system is nice and the picture very good. I do not normally use the built in speakers so really can't comment about their sound. This TV has a 16:9 enhanced mode that must be selected from the menus, I tried it once using a DVD as source input and liked the widescreen format that the DVD player provides better than the 16:9 mode. The 27&quot; Sony that I have has an auto volume feature, this 36&quot; does not and I do miss it. I would purchase this unit again. Note that there is a very similar Sony model that has upgraded sound, but not consider it because the added width would not fit in the armoire November 3, 2006    No problems w/ the phone. There is no mute button and it's annoying to hit two buttons to mute/unmute. I also couldn't find a way to change ringer volume but it's easy to change the ringer melody and there is one that's really soft.  The menu is not as intuitive as it could be but overall it works just fine as a phone. March 18, 2006    I purchased this headset for use with my Mac dG5 and Skype internet telephone.  The combination is killer.  I cannot compare to other similar equipment as this is my first and only, but for me, the quality is far better than what I have with my phone, and it was really as easy as plug and play.  I wish that the headset had thicker and stronger wires; I wish that the headset was more sold.  On the otherhand, I have not had any problems with the equipment up to now.  And the sound quality during telephone conversations is steller, which is important to me, especially as my hearing starts to deminish.  I saw some comments about the headset as an audiophile listening headphone.  IMO, this is too complementary.  For its price and features, a good buy and good sound quality, but IMO, this is not an audiophile headphone.  September 2, 2005    This is a overall convient carrying case. IT DOES NOT SCRATCH you ipod in anyway. This is a great case for jogging or everyday use, it has a belt clip that works very well. great and simple case, i highly recommend it for everyday use November 10, 2006    I bought this item rather than the cheaper products advertised because I trust Toshiba and because the picture quality was better than average.  Overall, I am very satisfied with the product.  We have used it on several aiplane trips and my toddler is very entertained.  We haven't had any problems with the mechanics of the player.  We also bought a case which I highly recommend so that we have enough Baby Einstein to keep her happy to our destination.  Also, the battery has never run out, and charges quickly.  My only problem with it is that the volume doesn't go up loud enough without earphones to hear it very well in a roaring commercial airliner.  But, my daughter mostly looks at the pictures anyway, so it wasn't that big a deal for us.  October 17, 2006    We bought this unit from Sam's Club right before a trip to Disney World. 8 hours in the car with a toddler  eek!  However, it was/is perfect!  We still use it for trips around town when we're in massive traffic or our son is being really fussy.  The case that keeps the dvd player on the back of the seat needs a little work, but we figured out a way to make it work for us.  Also, the remote doesn't work well, but we don't really need to use it as a DVD usually lasts long enough between stops April 24, 2006    I spent a lot of time reviewing Toaster Ovens to replace our 8 year old Delonghi Alfredo one. Most of the others had so so features or bad enough reviews that made me pass on them; however, with the 5 star review and Cuisinart name, I chose the TOB 30BC.  It toasts, it bakes, it looks nice and it has the knobs that my hubby likes in lieu of digital. Overall, it's a great oven and we have no complaints with it's cooking abilities or the sturdiness of the unit; but less than a month later, one of the knobs broke off the unit. They are completely plastic and no metal reinforcement to prevent this from happening. My hubby sent an email to Cuisinart and they are sending a replacement knob, but one would have expected better engineering from a name like Cuisinart January 4, 2006    I bought this headset and I must say it's a great buy. First off it's lightweight weighing in at about 16 grams. It's small which definately helps when your wearing it around. At times it's like you don't even feel liek your wearing anything. Exactly how a headset should be. I've place and recieved many calls with it already and having been using the the traditional wired headsets of the past this headset sound better and has no wires. The only problem I have found so far is that it takes some time getting used to the button placement and answering calls with the headset. Not to mention you only hear the standard ringtone rather than your custom ringtones. But that a small price to pay for such a great, inexpensive headset like this one March 9, 2006    I really likethe design on this Protector, and bought 3.  It allows you to plug multiple transformers in, and still have room for regular plugs. Slipping plus in is a firm push, but not that tough.   I also like the fact that it gives you a warning light if you get up around 12 amps.. Cool, but you have to keep in mind a 15 amp circuit shoulldn't have 12 amps to one plug..  The cord restraint system slides out to hold all the cords, then wedges backin to hold them in place. A bit hard to set up, and a zip tie could achieve the same thing, altough this is way easier if you change things November 14, 2006    These 2.0 speakers sound great and not just for their size, are adjustable, small, and good looking. I'm about half deaf and every speakers with a separate woofer had too much bass when I turned the volume up so I could understand human speech. I'm happy I spent the money. These are real quality in my opinion December 22, 2003    I've been using this CF card on my Nikon 4300 for a couple of months now.  It writes fast compared to my other CF Canon stock, from another camera.  However, start up of the camera takes longer because of the size, and as more pictures are stored, there is a noticeable degradation in speed in writing.  I've also used this on a Dell Axim, and it worked great!  No problem in formatting November 5, 2006    There are lots of reviews here and most appear to be on target relative to my experience with these headphones.  But here are my 2 cents: I got these to replace some aging Sony MDR V2's that I purchased maybe 10 years ago.  The ear cushions of the MDR V2's had begun to deteriorate, and I figured it was time to see what had improved in 10 years.  I just compared them to the older V2s and I can say that the V6 is definitely better.  They fully surround the ears V2s just sat on your ear, pressing on them.  The V6s also seem to offer more detailed sound.  I concur that they sound a little bright, but I can take care of this on my iPod by setting the EQ to ReduceTreble but I like the brightness, so sometimes I don't do that.  I do NOT concur with other review comments about weak bass.  They appear to have the right amount.  IMHO   it is a shame that bass has been overemphasized in the past decade, at the expense of flatness and non coloring of sound.  I also concur that the sensitivity of these is quite good plenty loud for me with the iPod   and I listen at good levels   albeit not ear damaging ones. As a last comment, I notice Amazon has these for about $65.  I paid $99 at a local store.  Buy from Amazon !  no   I don't work for or invest in them ;  May 14, 2006    This player is very convenient for long trips. If you want to save the money, you can get it Free from this web site:   awesomestufffree.com/portabledv November 9, 2006    i can't believe the unbelievable prices of flash drives these days.  i just bought this one from Wal mart for $20.00 dollars.  that's way cheaper than on amazon.com.  plus i've noticed that amazon.com has switched to third retailers and some don't even ship to hawaii, or do ship to hawaii at a hefty price.  this switching of amazon having the lowest price to third retailers is really turning me off.  possibly even towards purchasing books.  June 13, 2005    I'm not entirely sure how other people are finding ways to damage their earphones, but I have used the same pair since the summer of 2000 purchased from Amazon, and I have never had any difficulties besides losing the essential earpiece covers, which were easily replaced. When they are wound up in their little yellow case, the headphones' wires are well protected from stress unlike other models that don't offer such security.  Compared to other headphones I have used, especially noise cancelling of both active and passive varieties, these phones have superior bass response, and all levels of sound seem reasonably clear.  I have used these earphones with many different devices over five years: CD players, MP3 players including iPods, Pocket PCs, desktops, and notebooks. They always sound great, EXCEPT   due to their greater sensitivity to sound, I often am able to detect the hiss caused by poorly designed audio hardware, which I otherwise wouldn't hear with over ear phones. Pocket PCs especially seem prone to this, as their audio hardware is crammed so tightly in with noisy backlit screens and processors November 24, 2006    I love the iShuffle. It does the job. Not many features, but makes my 2 hour commute livable.  i put all my podcasts up top and list the songs in alpahbetical order by artist name so all is organized. It's like flying blind, but who said blind was impossible? Certainly not Helen Keller November 9, 2006    It doesn't have spectacular bass power, but I am happy for the product I got at such a feasible pric September 16, 2006    I ordered the 2 gb card twice....Fast shipping and both worked perfectly September 26, 2005    One of the least expensive ways out there to raise your computer screen to eye level. I am 6'3, so when I sit I am still pretty high in the air. With this stand I am able to sit with great posture and look straight ahead to my screen. I would definitely suggest getting one of these if you've ever thought about raising your monitor up off the desk November 9, 2006    I recently bought an HP 17" widescreen laptop and needed to find a case for traveling. This case is all that and more...on one side is a detachable cell phone case...the other side a HIDDEN drink holder. It has a pocket that it slides into if not needed  that came in handy in the airport.  This case looks extremely sturdy well built!and dirt just seems to wipe right off of it. It holds my 17" laptop, PDA, Cell phone, computer mouse, one time use cameras, Ipod, and all the wires and chargers for those electronics. I even fit two books, keys, a folder filled with directions and plane tickets, a notebook, and two dvd's in here. all of that at the same time Granted, all that stuff makes it pretty heavy to lug around the airport, so if you are doing that routinely you are going to want something with wheels or backpack form. The strap on this bag is extremely sturdy and cushiony. The strap was long enough for me to wear it diagonally accross my chest if I wanted, but it is not detachable which means it isn't likely to fall off easily.  This bag is extremely well designed. There is a strap for attaching it to wheeled luggage...it even fits under the window seat of the airplane and those areas for storage are much smaller than the aisle seats. Very well padded..I knocked my brand new computer around a bit during the travels and kept opening the case to make sure it was okay! Of course it was fine because there are 3 heavy duty layers of padding.  Because this bag does all that and more, it is large. It becomes larger the more you stuff it obviously. However, I am 5'1" and I carried it fine from North Carolina to New York. It looks great, if I needed to go to a meeting with my laptop I would gladly take it in this case. It looks professional enough.  happy buying! ps. let me add that finding a decently priced case for a 17" laptop that has all the features this one does is nearly impossible. Also, in the stores I checked this was sold for about 30 dollars more than here on amazon!! If you have a smaller laptop, this case will work just fine too! It has an adjustable divider. You will just gain more room for other stuff. I look foward to long usage of this case. December 3, 2005    I researched cases upon receipt of my 20 GB iPod and deemed this the best.  This case consists of a thin plastic sleeve inside a separate clear, hard shell.  The hard case protects the iPod from scratches and minor falls while still allowing easy access to the controls and inputs.  It also does not obscure the screen.  An enclosed plastic belt clip attaches to the back of the unit.   This case is not compatible with a Bose Sounddock as the user must remove the iPod from the case.  Also, Contour Design only enclosed one of the thin plastic sleeves.  I spent $5 at their website for 5 more sleeves and gave some to friends with the same case.   The price seems high for a couple pieces of plastic but a case is essential and this is the best one for the 20 GB iPod.  November 2, 2006    After reading the online reviews of this product vs. the portable product I went with this one. Portability is not much of a need, I plan on being around a power outlet. The sound is in line with a radio/boom box of the same size and it's about the same weight. I have a lot of trees around my house so I have to extend the antenna several feet out the back door in order to get a good signal. Keep that in mind if you have signal issues with your satellite unit. I have my unit placed next to the back door in the kitchen and I can hear it all over the first floor of my home. So far I'm happy that I bought it November 20, 2006    We bought this phone and two additional handsets eleven months ago.  One handset gave us problems from the start, but was promptly replaced when returned for service.  The system works fine in our 2 story, 2,300 sq. ft. home.  I did notice some reception problems carrying the handset into the closed garage with the base station upstairs on the opposite end of the house.  As a test I took the handset down the street about 100 yards away   it still got a clear dialtone to the base located in upstairs bedroom facing the street.  I like the features, including paging system, call transfer, and handset speakerphone.  Being able to have a phone at any 110v outlet location is a big plus.  I think the sound quality is very good, and the controls well laid out and pretty intuitive.  I agree that having to enter memory numbers into each handset is a drag. Overall I feel it works as advertised, and we'll be using it for a long time September 17, 2005    On the plus side, it's a great value for the games that do work on the T5.  SimCity alone is probably worth the price.  On the down side, although Amazon claims it's compatible with the "Tungsten Series" that was probably written before the T5 came out.  Four of the games appear to act as "trial" versions, although it's impossible to enter the registration codes.  See ... for an explanation.  Even with only 4 working games past the trial period, it's a good  buy.  Just know you're not getting what's advertised if you have a T5 October 2, 2005    I purchased the pouch & the carring case shortly after. I own more than one car and have four family menbers that are always on the go.The case holds the GPS, mount and all the different cables.The foam insert holds the GPS while still in the pouch or without.The velcro staps hold the mount & the ac cord.This way when you are looking for it,everthing is in one place.The case is made well and very plain looking on the outside,so not to draw any attention September 13, 2006    I ordered the 4 meter cable which was pictured with 24 pin connectors and received one with 18 pins.  Found out that the missing middle 6 pins are used to transmit audio which my monitor doesn't support anyway.  Originally, the DVI D specification allowed for both a video signal and an audio signal, but most manufacturer's have only used the video portion.  If you need a DVI D cable, an 18 pin connector will most likely work since most devices won't process the audio signal anyway.  There are a few very few devices that do use all 24 pins, but with the advent of HDMI, nobody really makes them anymore June 8, 2006    I needed new computer speakers after my Cyber Acoustics died after only 3 months. SO i wasn't going to buy the same brand since it died so fast. I use a Mac i wanted some nice sounding speakers, but couldn't decide to go with either the Sound Sticks, Creatures, or these. Well since i am saving up for a new Laptop, i wanted to save as much money as possible. Plus me and my dad had bought this brand over 7 years ago and they STILL work and sound great so i decided to give these a chance. Well first thing i did when i got them was turn the volume up to Max and Sub base up to Max. Yes i underestimated these speakers When i turned a song in in iTunes i nearley got blasted out of my chair! I was supprised by the sound clarity was pretty good even at higher volume, and sub was powerful shaking my whole desk!   Moral one:  Do not underestimate speakers my good brands even with low wattage.  I highley suggest these speakers for people who don't have much to spend or don't want to spend alot of money. If you want better quality i would go with Sound sticks or Creatures. But these look like they will serve me well August 20, 2006    Outstanding product as you would expect from Panasonic. Incoming calls loud and clear.  The scroll telephone directory is convenient and easy to use.  I do not like the "beep" sound when the hand set is placed back in the cradle it cannot be turned off April 7, 2003    The reader is fast.  Example: I took 56 2MP images from my camera recently.  I plugged this reader into my G4, plugged in the card, the card mounted, I dragged the images to my Pictures folder, and they copied immediately.  No waiting.  I was amazed, because with my MIA] USB reader, it could take a while to transfer that many images, over a minute.  A copy dialog didn't even pop up, because it transferred so fast.  It doesn't hurt that it's a cutie too.  5 stars October 4, 2006    These earphones are excellent quality. Noise that gets in from outside is so low that I can barely hear what someone next to me is telling me. In addition, the frequency response and quality of the sound is comparable to the much larger and bulkier insulated headphones.   These earphones do in fact rest in your ear. It can be slightly uncomfortable to put them in the first time, but you quickly get used to it, especially when sound is playing. In addition, the package includes three sets of differently sized earpieces including the default mid sized piece shown. November 9, 2006    Bought this mouse over 3 months ago, and its still going strong. The batteries last forever I've never replaced them yet. My only problem is that at times, I will turn off the mouse by attaching the receiver to the bottom, but it won't seem to turn off! I reset the mouse and then attach the receiver again, and this always does the trick. Other than that, very ergonomic, extremely smooth and precise.  I like the solid feel of a slightly weighty mouse, and with the batteries, this mouse feels just right. If only it weren't for the mouse not turning off sometimes, I'd give it a 5 September 21, 2006    My first purchase of the Q9b resulted in a return as the display wasn't mounted properly within the plastic housing. This resulted in the screen being tilted downwards about 1/4" and made the viewing unpleasant. The screen also wasn't very bright even with the brightness controlled up at 100%. Having to disassemble the unit to place it back in the box required the base stand to be taken apart but that was next to impossible without breaking it. Suffice to say, quality control missed this one.  After getting a new Q9b replacement, I unfortunately had a bad pixel. After using the Q9b for a week now, I noticed some red aliasing between characters. The crispness of the display is fine but I changed display fonts to 120dpi to make it look better. The control buttons on the monitor are too small. The built in speakers leave less than desired and useless.  The Q9b does not have DVI ports. At 1280x1024 mode its fine for doing basic computing like web surfing and office applications. Viewing DVD movies at full 1280x1024 mode was difficult to watch.  At smaller sizes 400x300 was fine.  All in all, the Q9b is not a bad monitor for the price for general computing work May 12, 2006    Hey, don't listen to those other schmucks. So maybe there are a few of these that are exceptable, but the rest just complain too much. I love this thing! I got it for Christmas, and now for $20, you can't beat that. I use a standard charger for it in my car, so I never have to worry about batteries. It seems that the best way to get it to sound the best, is work with your mp3 player or whatever your using equalizer. I have also used it on my portable DVD player in the car and it sounds awesome! For the price, I highly recommend this product May 20, 2006    I found this keyboard to be very helpful.  I am a graduate student and spend a lot of my time typing papers.  While my laptop can be used to type, when you type for hours at a time it gets very uncomfortable.  This keyboard is a great size and has a nice feel for long days spent typing.  The bluetooth is also reliable and allows me to get some distance from the computer if I would like without stopping the connection.  I would suggest getting a mouse to accompany it.  Overall, a very useful and reliable product that makes my life much easier January 20, 2005    I just recently move from dial up to DSL. Going DSL was not enough; I did not want to have cables running though the house so I started looking into going wireless. To make a long story short, after a little investigation I decided to make the leap into wireless technology. I purchased the WAP55AG router and the adapter cards, WMP55AG and WPC55AG.  Once the WAP55AG router was installed and set up, the installation of the WMP55AG PCI Adapter on each of the desktops were simple.  I had no difficulty setting up the hardware and software and with a few hours, I was on the net through the router. One desktop is running XP professional and the other desktops are running XP Home edition.   The LinkSys Web site has all the documentation you need for installation and setup. There is a "Knowledge Base" page that covers a lot of the products and answers to a lot of questions about various products and configurations; I found it to be very helpful.  Pulled from LinkSys Web Site:                                          The Linksys Dual Band Wireless AG PCI Adapter installs in most desktops and lets you put your computer almost anywhere in the building, without the cost and hassle of running network cables. Now you don't have to drill holes in your walls and climb through the attic or cellar to get connected to the network. Once you're connected, you can keep in touch with your e mail; access the Internet, use instant messaging to chat with friends, and share files and other resources such as printers and network storage with other computers on the network.   The Dual Band Wireless AG PCI Adapter connects you with Wireless A 802.11a and Wireless G draft 802.11g networks at an incredible 54Mbps! And for added versatility, it can also interoperate with all the 11Mbps Wireless B 802.11b products found in homes, businesses, and public wireless hotspots around the country. And whichever mode you choose, your wireless communications are protected by up to 152 bit encryption, so your data stays secure.   Features of the product:                                  One adapter connects to either 2.4 GHz 802.11b or draft 802.11g or 5 GHz 802.11a networks Advanced security features with up to 152 Bit WEP encryption Detailed monitoring and performance utility IEEE 802.11a, 802.11b and draft 802.11g compliant   System Requirements Minimum:                                               200MHz of Faster Processor 64MB RAM Available PCI Slot CD ROM Drive Windows 98SE, Me, 2000 or X September 28, 2006    I bought these Ear Headphones primarily to use when running and biking at the club. The sound quality is acceptable, not exceptional. The construction is a little flimsy and the big issue is that the cord is shorter for the left ear than the right. That places all the force on the left side and that one tends to pull out. I have no idea why Sony thought that this was a good design. For the money they could also have included a case rather than a clip for the cord. I would give these a B  good/not great January 15, 2006    Product nicely made , looks like quality product and performs fine March 22, 2006    Easy enough to pop off the normal ant RoadMate 700 and pop on this magmount version... and what a difference it made! Signals really are remarkedly improved. HIGHLY suggested for folks in hilly areas to nearly guarentee you'll get the birds July 31, 2006    I just recieved my HDMI cable and am very impressed. The price is just what it should be about $5 and makes me wonder how somebody would spend over $100 for this cable at a store. The service was excellent and the cable arrived in 4 days! I highly recommend this cable. I just plugged it into my cable box and the other end into the TV and WOW what a great picture all around. The color is just so much more vivid using HDMI compared to component 3 wire connectors. Get this cable for your system and stay away from those high priced others November 9, 2006    I upgraded from some speakers I purchased when I built my system.  The sound difference was wonderful.  It is a clean crisp fresh sound. Worth every penny November 9, 2006    The best headphones I ever had, good fit excellent sound on my SoundBlaster X FI!! March 17, 2006    This is a very nice set of paper and envelopes.  The price is really great. The paper is a little lighter than the ones that cost almost double.  The colors come out very bright and the folding is easy.  Overall it is a good deal March 3, 2006    I bought USB rudder pedals and yoke for use with X Plane on a Mac Dual G5. Plug and play no drivers needed, easily configured in x plane, works beautifully. Great price! Thanks Amazon! Shipping was 2 days early! Kudos to Fedex! I am a private pilot, and recommend this product August 4, 2006    This is a pretty decent cheapo case.  If you want something that you'll use every day in the car or at your DJ gigs, then you may want to get something a little sturdier.  For my archival] purposes, however, it works just fine August 15, 2006    i used canon ink and then decided to try one of the cheap imitations. it worked well for a few months and then my photos came out of my canon i900d with color changes. after 3 conversations with canon customer care, we decided it was not the printer, but the cheaper ink. i switched back to canon, bit the bullet on the price, and everything is fine. i found decent prices on amazon, particularly at eek industries November 18, 2006    I tried both Microsoft's LifeCam VX 3000 and VX 6000. Had 'em both home and ran trials with my Intel Pentium D Dual Core 3.00GHz CPU with 2 gigs of ram and, with both of those, the video lagged the audio distractingly so. Spent the better part of an hour on the phone with a friendly Microsoft customer service rep one evening got through on their toll free lineand he pointed me to new software for the VX 6000. Downloaded the 50 meg plus file, installed it, but the VX 6000 still produced out of sync video vs. audio when I created a simple 640 by 480 video file for viewing on Media Player or editing in Windows Movie Maker.   So, I talked to some technicians at our company and then talked to the webcam guru at the local assembler that built my, I believe, excellent computer. All recommended Logitech when buying webcams. I then marched back to Best Buy and traded my $99 Microsoft VX 6000 for a Logitech Quickcam Orbit MP for BB's price of $139.95. You can find this Logitech unit cheaper all over the place, including, of course, here at Amazon. The package I bought included an inexpensive headset, which I haven't used so far.  Although I haven't tried the Orbit in a video phone call yet, from the moment I turned it on I had that satisfing good feeling that I bought a winner. Installed fairly easily with a couple of bumps. Got a "USB composite device has not passed Windows Logo testing" screen a couple of times..BUT..I received the SAME screen on, get this, the Microsoft cams! I just continued installing and have not experienced system problems so far.  The audio sync with video in making a recording is right on remember, that was primary reason for taking back the Microsoft cameras AND the picture clarity on my LCD flat panel monitor at the 640 webcam capture setting produced a gorgeous picture. Excellent detail and smoothness of video. Besides the superior audio sync with video, the Orbit MP is remarkably better than the VX 6000 and way above the $49 Microsoft VX 3000 in all other criteria too, in my opinion after comparison testing.  The Orbit's special effects are interesting and fun. The pan, tilt, etc., excellent. The face tracking is vigorous and alive   fun to watch the little Orbit camera turn   but I haven't tested in actual live conferencing yet.  All in all   for webcams, I'm now saying what more experienced webcam users told me   head for Logitech. They've certianly hooked me with their apparent superior performance. The Orbit MP is a keeper! Not going to waste anymore time searching and testing. And, my advice to Microsoft, you'd better talk to the outfit that bought your name for those Lifecams. I've relied on the Microsoft name on peripherals, keyboards, etc., and I've generally been very satisfied. But, in webcams, with me, the Microsoft brand now takes a back seat to Logitech.  August 12, 2006    This phone was an additional phone for the Model IP811 2 phone system used for Vonage. This system has every feature that I could want, including range and quality, there are no negatives. I am highly recommending this phone and system October 27, 2006    The zen micro is brilliant I have dropped it a load of times and it still works fine i've dropped it on the kitchen tiles twice, i've dropped it a few times in the yard and it still works perfect. I had to buy new headphones for it which made the sound quality much better. It is very easy to transfer files to it I always use windows media player to transfer files as it is easier to use than the creative software. I use it everyday and the battery lasts a good while for me. Overall the zen micro is a very good product October 28, 2006    My favorite thing about this phone is that the caller ID captures 11 digit numbers 1 xxx xxx xxxx which are then very easy to store into the phone book and call.  My old phone only captured 10 digits xxx xxx xxxx which meant I had to reenter everything manually because of course you have to dial a 1 first.  This new phone also allows me to toggle between 11 digits and 7 digits on the same number.  I put together my phone book just by capturing calls as they came in.  Very handy.  As far as being a phone, it does everything well and after a couple of months I am still as happy as could be with it November 21, 2006    I had been talking about wanting an MP3 player, but I did NOT want an iPod, as I heard you cannot add files in Windows format and that's what all of my music is.  I received this e260 4 GB MP3 player for my birthday in June 2006, and this is the first MP3 player I have ever owned.  Although there are a few little quirks, overall I am not disappointed and would recommend this MP3 player.  Like many rechargeable battery powered items, it required a lengthy initial charge before first use.  After that, the future charges don't seem to take as long.  The MP3 player plays for hours on end without needing a new charge.  Although I've never run it completely down, I have used it continuously for about 4 hours with no battery issues.  I installed the software on my computer, and the disk is where you will find the owner's manual.  I was a bit irritated that there was no hard copy of the owner's manual, and just a few weeks ago it came up as an issue when my MP3 player froze and I had to turn on the computer to look up the troubleshooting guide turns out if the player freezes you need to hold the power button down for about 15 seconds to reset it.   It came pre loaded with 20 songs, only one of which I had ever heard of and it was one of those no name bands that played once on Saturday Night Live.  Although my first instinct was to delete the songs to make room for my own choices, I decided to leave them on there until I need the space.  About three of the songs have grown on me a little bit over the past 5 months.  I currently have 517 songs on there and still have room for more.  As far as performance goes, it performs pretty well.  The buttons are a little difficult to get used to, as you navigate through the functions and the song lists by scrolling a wheel.  Not too bad, but when you turn on the player and it begins at the beginning of the list and you want a song that's in the middle and you have a lot of songs on there, you will be scrolling a lot.    I do not use all the functions that came with this MP3 player.  It has music, fm radio, photo, voice, video and a settings option.  I have used the music function and the voice recorder option, both with good results.  The only downside to the voice recorder is that you can't get the recordings you made off the MP3 player and onto your computer.  It would have been nice to be able to record things and sync them onto your computer.  As for syncing music files, I have not had any problems, although I did have one instance where it shows a song was downloaded, but when you try to play it, it skips to the next song alphabetically in the list.  I don't know what caused this.  Also, you can only store a song as one genre, which is a little annoying.  Be sure you have your genres picked before you sync because once the song is on the MP3 player, you cannot change the genre.  It came with a headset, but I have never used it.  Instead I purchased some Panasonic folding travel speakers to use with it.    I do wish the MP3 player had some alternate form of charging other than needing to be connected to my computer's USB drive to charge.  Another con is that a scratch of some sort appeared on the inside surface of the screen.  I can't remember it being dropped or anything, so I don't know what caused this, but it's pretty noticeable.  It doesn't seem to affect the operation, just the aesthetics.  Overall, the cons are little irritations to me and I would recommend this player to someone who doesn't want an iPod October 22, 2006    I'm a skeptic. No, I mean I'm REALLY a skeptic... especially in today's marketplace because nothing is built like it used to be. I don't buy anything without checking it out first, and even then, I expect that it's probably going to fail me when I do. Yeah, wonderful view there, huh?  Well, needless to say, I was pleasantly and quite happily surprised when this device didn't fail me out of the box. I've been using my speedpad for almost a year now, and I have to say that it has been by far more solid, responsive and intuitive than I ever expected it to be. I will not play a PC game without it plugged in now, that's how well this gamepad has worked for me.  Here are the ins and outs:  1 Solid construction. As others have stated, this device feels very solid and is just generally "sturdy as hell". This, alone, surprised me. Not too many electronic devices are solidly made these days not too many at all!... so I'm glad to see that this one was. Belkin did an excellent job in this department.  2 Software. Do yourself a favor, when you get this device home, don't bother putting in the CD that comes with it. Instead, go directly to Belkin's website first thing, download the newer version of the software which is near exactly the same as what's on the CD, but updated and install that before plugging in your speedpad for the first time. Do that and you'll have everything updated immediately with little to no trouble at all.  I've had no problems with the software for this hardware and that's generally the part I have trouble with the most. The applications profiler and button editor function perfectly, and macros are a snap to program. Kudos to Belkin's programmers on writing the software suite for this, they did a good job.  4 Sticky keys. Most people have experienced this.. myself included. Being possibly a byproduct of the solid construction of the product, basically, what happens is the keys stick just a little bit coming out of the box. Though just "excercising" the device pressing the buttons down quickly and solidly over and over for a few seconds after plugging it in each time I went to use it cleared up this issue within the first week of using the gamepad, and I've never had it happen since.   5 Other buttons.   The mouse scroll wheel can be an annoyance, and I don't use it much at all because it's hard to scroll up and down with it Belkin may just have made that particular button a little too solid.   The orange button above the d pad also isn't that easy to press, though if you keep you pinky finger positioned on the side of the keypad for leverage, it's not impossible to press this button in fact, I use it as my default "map" button in most of the games I play. It's perfect for those functions you use enough to need a button for but not enough to need an easy spam button.  I haven't experienced any problems hitting the 'space' button below the d pad that others have experienced. My thumb taps that button as easily as it taps the space bar on a standard keyboard. My only complaint with it is that I can't simply twist my thumb a bit to hit the key, I have to actually lift my thumb off the d pad to do it   and that's not much of a complaint at all, really.  The d pad itself is a godsend! I'm a true console gamer, having used nothing but d pads for movement since all the time spent playing my old NES as a kid and using a joystick before that with my even older Atari. D pad is all I know, really. In fact, the one thing that's kept me away from PC gaming all these years is I've never, ever been able to accustom myself to using arrow keys or WASD for movement and probably never will get accustomed to that either. For the longest time I was looking for a device that could allow me to keep the sensitivity of mouse aiming to keep up with other PC players while giving me an actual d pad for movement... and that is EXACTLY what this gamepad did for me.   As I said at the top of this review, I will never play a PC game without my Nostromo speedpad plugged in. This gamepad has provided the one benefit that other pads haven't and that I really needed   a controller interface that's actually functional and intuitive enough to use that I forget I'm using it most of the time, allowing me to immerse myself completely in whatever game I'm playing... which is really the point of gaming in the first place, isn't it?   The Nostromo Speedpad gets 5 stars from me. I would recommend it to anyone who's looking for the type of benefits I've listed. And, for that matter, I'm recommending it right now in fact... November 11, 2006    The antenna works well and obtains more satellites than the GPS units internal antenna. This easily solved the issue of poor reception when the GPS is inside of a car; however, the best accuracy I am able to obtain is 13 feet with this external antenna vs. the 9 feet using the GPS's internal antenna when in an open area.  Garmin's external antenna connector plug does not attach very firmly and can disconnect easily when the units are moved around on my GPS.  I feel the antenna was worth purchasing November 13, 2006    I would highly recommend this phone set.  Easy to program and crystal clear reception.  A definite 5 star July 20, 2006    I found this on clearance at another retailer I guess not everyone likes pink, and it's fabulous.  I thought it might be just for skinny armed people, but not so!  I've got plenty of room, it fits great, and it doesn't move.  Still looking for a solution to keep the earbud cord out of the way, though.  Makes mowing the lawn WAY more fun October 31, 2006    Great all around backpack for lugging laptop and books to school.  It has a fairly large capacity but it also has tension straps so you can compact it.  One of the best features is the open compartment which is perfect for gym shoes or clothes September 6, 2005    Note:  This is a review of the Targus PA225U Retractable Phone & Ethernet Cord Plastic Casing.  It's the rectangular model, not the oval shaped one.  I'm on the road 50 75% of the time for work and have used this on almost every trip.  I initially bought it because I forgot my regular network cord while traveling and needed to buy something quickly.  I like to be able to move around in the hotel room and use this cord along with a cheap little plastic cable joiner to connect it to the hotel internet connection so I can sit on the couch or bed while connected to the internet.  I've experimented with a travel wireless router but keep coming back to the wired connection when the wireless connection has problems.  I've used it for over a year and have never had any problems with the retraction February 23, 2004    I tested my new Canon i960 with a variety of papers. Like most printers, the output is much better when using the manufacture's own paper as opposed to the cheaper generic paper, but there is no need to buy the most expensive &quot;Pro&quot; paper as neither I nor my wife could discern ANY difference between the two. There may be a benifit to the &quot;Pro&quot; paper that cannot be seen lasts longer? but at almost twice the cost it is not worth it   this paper will produce the highest quality prints on your Canon printer I think they look better than the ones I get from the photo lab 